California, session 20252026, SB105.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1. Section 19.57 of the Budget Act of 2021 is amended to read: SEC. 19.57. (a) The amounts appropriated pursuant to this section reflect legislative priorities to be implemented by state agencies. (b) Each allocation in this section shall include a designated state entity that shall allocate the funds to the recipients identified or to be used for specified state operations purposes by the relevant department for the state entity. The state entity shall determine the best method for allocation to ensure the funds are used for the purposes specified in this section. (c) Notwithstanding any other law, allocations made pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including as specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. (d) Notwithstanding any other law, a designated state entity administering an allocation pursuant to this section may provide the allocation as an advance lump sum payment, and the allocation may be used to pay for costs incurred prior to the effective date of the act adding this subdivision. (e) If no item number for the appropriate department for a state entity exists, and such an item number is required in order to make the specified allocations, then item numbers may be created for this purpose by the Department of Finance. (f) The amounts specified in this subdivision are hereby appropriated from the General Fund as follows: (1) $1,000,000 to the Government Operations Agency to complete the Statewide Latina Impact Report and expand the HOPE fellowship cohort for two years. (2) $24,750,000 to the California Workforce Investment Board for the following purposes: (A) $5,000,000 to fund Rapid Digital Upskilling and Workforce Development for Displaced Workers Pilot. (B) $15,000,000 for allocation on a one-time basis to Homeboy Industries workforce job training. (C) $1,750,000 for allocation to the Los Angeles Cleantech Incubator (LACI) for expanding workforce development for green jobs and creating LACI’s electric vehicle charging satellite training center, including: (i) $1,500,000 to support trainee recruitment for workforce development program and establish a satellite location. (ii) $250,000 for continued deployment of zero emission mobility solutions in Leimert Park. (D) $3,000,000 for allocation to the East Palo Alto JobTrain Center for Economic Mobility. (3) $1,000,000 to the Transportation Agency for a study of the Gold Line extension to Burbank. (4) $9,800,000 to the Department of Transportation for the following purposes: (A) $2,300,000 for street safety or active transportation projects in the San Fernando Valley, and to upgrade pedestrian access and finalize a complete streets project at the Louise Avenue U.S. Route 101 freeway over cross in Encino, while allowing the California Transportation Commission to extend the deadline for State Highway Operation and Protection Program funds. These funds shall be available for expenditure and encumbrance through June 30, 2028. (B) $2,500,000 for mural restoration at the Chicano Park Museum and Cultural Center in San Diego. (C) $5,000,000 for an Interstate 710 pedestrian walkway at Florence Avenue in the City of Bell Gardens. (5) $17,200,000 to the State Department of Social Services for the following purposes: (A) $1,400,000 for the Jewish Family Service of San Diego for a Universal Basic Income pilot in San Diego. (B) $100,000 for San Diego Food Bank. (C) $200,000 for a community action partnership of San Bernardino County Food Bank, Mobile Food Pantry Program. (D) $3,500,000 for Los Angeles Regional Food Bank for the West Valley Community Center for Social Services. (E) $1,500,000 to the Food Bank of Contra Costa and Solano Counties for expansion of the volunteer service area, including improvements to the production line, storage, and safety, and for purchase of additional trucks for delivery. (F) $500,000 for Feeding San Diego Food Bank. (G) $10,000,000 to assist refugees from Afghanistan. (6) $13,000,000 to the State Department of Public Health for the Transgender Wellness and Equity Fund. (7) $250,000 to the Department of General Services for the Sonoma Developmental Center Cemetery for Americans with Disabilities Act parking and memorial improvements. (8) $11,487,000 to the Natural Resources Agency for the following purposes: (A) $1,500,000 to the Natural Resources Agency for the Parks and Recreation Oceanography Program. (B) $8,000,000 to the Natural Resource Agency to acquire Banning Ranch in Orange County for the purpose of open space. (C) $1,000,000 to California Cultural and Historic Endowment for the Lark Musical Society Cultural Annex. (D) $987,000 to the California Cultural and Historical Endowment for replacement, repair, and improvements related to the Great Wall of Los Angeles Mural. (9) $50,000 to the Department of Fish and Wildlife to rename the “Eden Landing Ecological Reserve” the “Congressman Pete Stark Ecological Reserve at Eden Landing.” (10) $10,000,000 to the Wildlife Conservation Board to acquire Lone Pine Ranch. (11) $42,550,000 to the State Coastal Conservancy for the following purposes: (A) $50,000 to the Beach Erosion Authority for Clean Oceans and Nourishment for analysis of options for aligning regional sediment management and sea level rise adaptation on behalf of the California Coastal Sediment Management Workgroup. (B) $14,000,000 for the Santa Ana River Conservation Program. (C) $28,500,000 for West Coyote Hills. (12) $9,400,000 to the Department of Parks and Recreation for the following purposes: (A) $1,500,000 for Mount Diablo State Park for bicycle turn-outs in Mount Diablo State Park as described in Park District Project 2019-05. (B) $4,500,000 for Point Sur State Historic Park for the completion of bridges 4 and 5 and improvements to the Point Sur Lighthouse. (C) $1,400,000 for the John Marsh Ranch House for preservation and reconstruction of the historic John Marsh Ranch House at Marsh Creek State Park in the County of Contra Costa. (D) $2,000,000 for deferred maintenance at Topanga State Park and Will Rogers State Historic Park. (13) $72,600,000 to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy for the following purposes: (A) $3,300,000 for open space around the Los Angeles River in Long Beach. (B) $4,300,000 for a walking trail along San Gabriel River to the Pacific Ocean. (C) (i) $45,000,000 for the Southeast Los Angeles Cultural Center Project. (ii) The funds appropriated in this subparagraph shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2026. Up to $3,000,000 of the funds appropriated in this subparagraph shall be designated for public engagement efforts and community equitable development planning related to the Southeast Los Angeles Cultural Center Project, with the remainder dedicated to capital outlay for the project. All or part of these funds may be transferred to a local or state department or agency for the purposes specified in this subparagraph. (D) (i) $10,000,000 for brownfield remediation, clean up and conversion in the City of Bell Gardens. (ii) The funds appropriated in this subparagraph shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2025. (E) $10,000,000 for the Center Avenue and Green Street Improvement Project located in the City of Compton, available for expenditure or encumbrance through June 30, 2023. (14) $10,000,000 to the Coastal Trust Fund established pursuant to Section 31012 of the Public Resources for public access at Hollister Ranch. (15) $8,000,000 for the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy to acquire the Triangle Ranch property. (16) $13,000,000 to the Department of Food and Agriculture for the following purposes: (A) $12,000,000 for Cal Expo and the State Fair. (B) $1,000,000 for Impatiens Necrotic Spot Virus (INSV) and Pythium Wilt research in Monterey County. (17) $12,000,000 to the State Lands Commission to remove abandoned and derelict vessels from the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta region. (18) $3,000,000 for the Department of Community Services and Development for Farmworker Resource Centers. (19) $77,400,000 for the University of California for the following purposes: (A) $5,000,000 for the University of California, Los Angeles, (UCLA) Institute on Reproductive Health, Law, and Policy and UCLA School of Law. (B) $10,000,000 for the University of California, Riverside, School of Medicine Acute Care Teaching Hospital. (C) $35,000,000 for the University of California, San Diego, Scripps Reserve Vessel. The amount allocated shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. (D) $250,000 to UCLA for the Division of Social Sciences Hollywood Advancement Project. (E) $17,900,000 to the University of California, San Diego, Scripps Institution of Oceanography for the ALERTWildfire Fire Camera Mapping System. (F) $7,000,000 to the University of California, Los Angeles for the Climate Wildfire Institute. (G) $1,500,000 to the University of California, Berkeley for support of the UC Labor Center. (i) These funds are available to support the Labor Center for three years. (ii) These funds are available for expenditure and encumbrance until June 30, 2024. (H) $750,000 to the University of California, Agriculture and Natural Resources division for the UC Nutrition Policy Institute located at the University of California, Berkeley. (20) $16,360,000 for the California State University for the following purposes: (A) $1,000,000 for California State University, Fullerton, for the Titan Gateway Project pedestrian bridge. (B) $5,000,000 for the California Council on Science and Technology. (C) $6,000,000 for California State University, Bakersfield, for Nursing and Health Professional programs. (D) $1,800,000 for California State University, San Bernardino, for the Masters of Science Physician Assistant Program. (E) $2,500,000 for California State University, Humboldt, for the Humboldt State nursing program. (F) $60,000 to California State University, Northridge for the Vida Mobile Clinic. (21) $10,000,000 to the Department of Housing and Community Development for the Pet Assistance and Support program. (22) $4,500,000 to Hastings College of Law for the California Scholars Program. (23) $7,900,000 to the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls. Of this amount, $5,000,000 shall support regional women and girls commissions. (24) $5,000,000 to the Department of Justice for Missing and Murdered Indigenous Women. (25) $7,500,000 to the Arts Council for the Chicano Park Museum and Cultural Center in San Diego. (26) $10,000,000 to the Civil Rights Department for the administration and implementation of a Statewide Hate Crime Hotline. These funds are available for encumbrance and expenditure until June 30, 2025. (27) $250,000 to the Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation for the Strategic Growth Council to develop a report required by subdivision (c) of Section 65072.2 of the Government Code. (28) $300,000 to the California Victim Compensation Board for a contract with the Alliance for a Better Community for study of and outreach to survivors of forced or involuntary sterilization at previously named Los Angeles County Hospital, currently named Los Angeles County + USC Medical Center in Los Angeles, California. This amount shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2024. SEC. 2. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2021 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2021 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 21 of the Statutes of 2021 (Assembly Bill No. 128) (b) Chapter 43 of the Statutes of 2021 (Assembly Bill No. 161) (c) Chapter 69 of the Statutes of 2021 (Senate Bill No. 129) (d) Chapter 84 of the Statutes of 2021 (Assembly Bill No. 164) (e) Chapter 240 of the Statutes of 2021 (Senate Bill No. 170) (f) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2022 (Senate Bill No. 115) (g) Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2022 (Senate Bill No. 119) (h) Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2022 (Assembly Bill No. 180) (i) Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill No. 100) (j) Chapter 33 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill No. 103) SEC. 3. Section 19.564 of the Budget Act of 2023 (Chapter 12 of the Statutes of 2023) is amended to read: SEC. 19.564. (a) (1) The amounts appropriated pursuant to this section reflect legislative priorities related to housing. (2) For allocations in this section that include a designated state entity, the entity shall allocate the funds to the recipients identified in the paragraphs following each designation. The state entity shall determine the best method for allocation to ensure the funds are used for the purposes specified in this section. Self-attestation by the receiving entity is an acceptable method of verification of the use of funds, if determined appropriate by the state entity. (3) Notwithstanding any other law, allocations pursuant to this section are exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Title 2 of the Government Code. (4) If an item number for the appropriate department for a state entity does not exist, and such an item number is required in order to make the specified allocations, the Department of Finance may create an item number for this purpose. (5) Notwithstanding any other law, a designated state entity administering an allocation pursuant to this section may provide the allocation as an advance lump sum payment, and the allocation may be used to pay for costs incurred prior to the effective date of the act adding this paragraph. (6) The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of allocating authority to a different state entity to facilitate the expenditure of the funds for the intended legislative purpose. Any state entity that allocates funds may also, in consultation with the Department of Finance, use an alternative local fiscal agent that is not identified in this section instead of the fiscal agent designated in this section if necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. Any change to the allocating state entity or fiscal agent made pursuant to this paragraph shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing at least 30 days, or no sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine, prior to the change. It is the intent of the Legislature to revise this section during the 2023–24 fiscal year to reflect any changes necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. (7) Unless otherwise specified in this section, funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2025, and expenditure until June 30, 2027. (8) Unless otherwise specified, the funds appropriated in this section shall not be disbursed for any project prior to September 30, 2023. Future legislation may, but is not required to, specify further details concerning the manner of disbursement of these funds. (9) Funding provided in this section shall not be used for a purpose subject to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. If the Department of Finance determines that any allocation would be considered an appropriation for that purpose, the funding shall not be allocated, and the department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of that finding. (10) The amounts specified in subdivisions (b), inclusive, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund as follows: (b) To be allocated by the Department of Housing and Community Development as follows: (1) $225,000 to the City of West Sacramento, for the Recovery Café in West Sacramento. (2) $1,250,000 to the City of Half Moon Bay, for the City of Half Moon Bay: Coastside Farmworker Housing Development. (3) $1,250,000 to the County of San Mateo, for the County of San Mateo: Coastside Farmworker Housing Development. (4) $1,250,000 to the City of Alameda, for the Safe Parking and Homeless Day Center at Alameda Point. (5) $500,000 to the City of Culver City, for the Wende Museum: Affordable Housing for Artists at Risk. (6) $1,000,000 to the City of Culver City, for the Culver City – Jubilo Village Affordable Housing Development. (7) $1,000,000 to the Inland Equity Land Trust, for Plan Adelanto. (8) $500,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the Renovations and Security Improvements at Huntington Villas. (9) $2,000,000 to the County of Sonoma, in partnership with the Sonoma County Community Development Commission (SCCDC), for the Tierra de Rosas Infrastructure Project. (10) $500,000 to the County of Tulare, for the Tulare County Homeless Housing. (11) $600,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the RV Buyback and Disposal Program. (12) $2,000,000 for the San Fernando Valley Economic Development Center by New Economics for Women. (13) $300,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the City of Los Angeles for rehabilitation at the Sieroty/Howard Johnson Homekey Site. (14) $1,000,000 to the Habitat for Humanity of Butte County, for the Habitat for Humanity of Butte County Projects. (15) $2,500,000 to the San Diego State University, for the San Diego State Imperial Valley Student Housing. (16) $2,000,000 to the Riverside County Housing Authority, for the Galilee Center Housing Shelter. (17) $1,000,000 to the City of Concord, for the Yellow Roof Foundation. (18) $1,000,000 to GLIDE, for the GLIDE Modernization Project. (19) $250,000 to the Homeless Prenatal Program, for the Homeless Prenatal Program. (20) $750,000 to the Sigma Beta Xi, Inc., for the SBX: Youth and Family Services Youth Village Project. (21) $1,000,000 to the Los Angeles County Development Agency (LACDA), for the Treehouse Leimert Park Housing Project. (22) $500,000 to the Los Angeles County Development Agency (LACDA) for the Biddy Mason South Los Angeles Mixed-Use Housing Project. (23) $500,000 to the Los Angeles County Department of Health Services, for the Los Angeles Skid Row Action Plan. (24) $2,000,000 to the City of San Jose, for the Eviction Diversion Program. (25) $200,000 to the Comite Civico Del Valle, for the Universidad Popular. (26) $750,000 to the San Diego Housing Commission, for the Homelessness Outreach Task Force. (27) $1,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the City of Los Angeles motel to housing conversion. (28) $2,500,000 to the City of San Leandro, for the Nimitz Motel acquisition and renovation. (29) $200,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the City of Los Angeles – Chatsworth Travelodge Homekey Site Safety Improvements. (30) $136,000 to the Vida Mobile Clinic, for the Vida Mobile Clinic Outreach & Medical Supplies. (31) $1,250,000 to Bridge to Home Santa Clarita Valley, for the Bridge to Home Family Housing Units & Client Service Center. (32) $1,000,000 to the City of Orange, for the City of Orange: Homeless Resource Center. (33) $1,500,000 to the City of Anaheim, for the City of Anaheim: Mobile Family Resource Center. (34) $400,000 to the City of Stockton, for the City of Stockton – Loads of Hope – Mobile Laundromat Service Vehicles for Homeless Individuals. (35) $1,435,000 to the Life Plan Humboldt, for the Life Plan Humboldt. (36) $2,500,000 for the town of Danville for implementation of the ADU Accelerator Program to grant funds to cities in Contra Costa and Alameda Counties for the creation of pre-approved permit ready accessory dwelling unit plans and an incentive program. (37) $500,000 to the City of West Hollywood for refurbishing of existing log cabin structure. (38) $5,000,000 for Stanislaus County for infrastructure projects in South Modesto. (39) $2,000,000 for the San Diego Housing Commission for predevelopment of the densification of Casa Colina Phase 1 in City Heights. (40) $2,000,000 for the City of Half Moon Bay for the planning and development of affordable housing. (41) $1,000,000 for Alta Housing for the development of senior affordable housing. (42) $5,000,000 for the City of Vista for interim and permanent support housing units. (43) $2,000,000 for the County of Fresno for design and construction costs of improvements in the communities of Cantua Creek and El Porvenir. (44) $240,000 for Habitat for Humanity Greater Fresno Area for program support. (45) $150,000 for the City of Reedley for improvements to transitional housing facility. (46) $500,000 for Hijas del Campo for construction of farmworker housing in east central Contra Costa County. (47) $150,000 for El Camino Homeless Organization for the construction of a permanent dining structure for individuals experiencing homelessness. (48) $84,000 for the City of Monterey for the lighting improvement project on Old Fisherman’s Wharf. (49) $1,000,000 for the County of Sonoma for the Casa Roseland Project. (50) $500,000 for the City of Los Angeles for the LA Family Housing to renovate interim housing units. (51) $3,000,000 for Neighborhood Legal Service of Los Angeles for the construction of the NLSLA Pacoima Justice and Job Training Center. (52) $1,100,000 to the City of Huntington Beach to support Operations of the Navigation Center for homeless individuals. (53) $3,000,000 for the City of Imperial for support of the Imperial Corridor Safety Improvements Project. (54) $2,000,000 for the Burbank Housing Corporation for affordable housing projects. (55) $2,000,000 for the City of Perris for construction of multipurpose/nutrition room at the Perris Senior Center. (56) $500,000 for the City of Riverside for local historical preservation efforts by the Civil Rights Institute of Inland Southern California. (57) $1,000,000 for the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments for purposes of homeless services and public safety support. (58) $6,500,000 for Lao Family Community Development for infrastructure and capital improvements for units for unhoused people. (59) $3,000,000 for Eden Housing for Legacy Court housing project. (60) $2,000,000 for Unity Council for support of housing and community services and a housing and community project at the site of the Ghostship Warehouse fire. (61) $2,000,000 for St. Mary’s Center for property acquisition, maintenance, and operations for transitional housing for formerly homeless seniors. (62) $2,500,000 for the Los Angeles Black Worker Center for the establishment of a justice campus in the City of Los Angeles. (63) $3,000,000 for the City of Los Angeles for siting, design and construction of structures marking and identifying historic black neighborhoods in Los Angeles. (64) $3,500,000 for the California Black Freedom Fund for support of nonprofit organizations implementing civic engagement and voter education programs. (65) $4,750,000 for the City of Los Angeles, Mayor’s Office for neighborhood improvement, street safety, or active transportation projects in the San Fernando Valley. (66) $2,000,000 for the City of Orange for support of the Homeless Resource Center. (67) $4,000,000 for the City of Garden Grove for support of the Central Cities Navigation Center. (68) $2,500,000 for the City of Hayward for construction of the Stack Youth and Family Center Phase II. (69) $1,800,000 for the City for Santa Clara for support of Santa Clara Overnight Care locations. (70) $500,000 for the City of Fremont for support of Housing Navigation Center. (71) $1,500,000 for the City of Fremont for support of the Commercial District Wi-Fi Access Expansion Project. (72) $1,600,000 for the City of Milpitas for support of the Milpitas SMART program. (73) $1,500,000 for the National AIDS Memorial for establishment of the Center for Health and Social Justice. (74) $2,500,000 for the Southeast Asian Development Center for acquisition of a building to serve community members. (75) $1,000,000 for the City of Modesto for support of the Modesto Downtown Streets Teams. (76) $155,000 to Tuolumne County for the acquisition of property for the development of workforce housing. (77) $435,000 to the City of Turlock for parks and sewer infrastructure. SEC. 4. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2023 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 12 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 101). (b) Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill No. 102). (c) Chapter 189 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 104). (d) Chapter 862 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 105). (e) Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 106). (f) Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 2024 (Senate Bill No. 109). (g) Chapter 996 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 158). (h) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 100). (i) Chapter 6 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 103). SEC. 5. Item 3540-104-6093 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 3540-104-6093—For local assistance, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code for wildfire resiliency center infrastructure for the Karuk Tribe to provide training and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the amendment of existing program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the appropriation in this item. 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to facilitate the timely and efficient implementation of the Karuk tribal government’s wildfire resiliency center on their sovereign land, any applicable provisions of the Government Code, Labor Code, and the Public Contract Code, including, but not limited to, public works requirements, is suspended to the extent necessary for the design, construction, and delivery of the wildfire resiliency center for the Karuk Tribe. SEC. 6. Item 6100-113-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 6100-113-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education—​Title I, Part B, State Assessment Grant, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 18,326,000 Schedule: (1) 5205200-Assessment Review and Reporting ........................ 848,000 (2) 5205204-English Language Development Assessment ........................ 16,935,000 (3) 5205208-California Student Assessment System ........................ 543,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) are provided for contract costs for the implementation of the statewide pupil assessment system established pursuant to Chapter 489 of the Statutes of 2013, as approved by the State Board of Education, including funding for the Lexile® and Quantile® measures of learning and access to the Lexile® and Quantile® Hubs, and are contingent upon the Department of Finance’s review of the related contract during contract negotiations and prior to its execution. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available for approved contract costs for the development of, transition to, and administration of the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California, which include initial identification and annual assessments aligned to the state English language development standards in accordance with Chapter 478 of the Statutes of 2013, and are contingent upon the submittal of the related contract by the State Department of Education and the Department of Finance. Ongoing funding for the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California shall be contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act. 3. Funds appropriated in Schedule (1) are for providing local educational agencies information regarding federal requirements associated with assessments. 4. Funds provided to local educational agencies from Schedules (2) and (3) shall first be used to offset any state-mandated reimbursable costs, within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code, that otherwise may be claimed through the state mandates reimbursement process for the statewide pupil assessment system established pursuant to Chapter 489 of the Statutes of 2013, the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress, and the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California. Local educational agencies receiving funding from these schedules shall reduce their estimated and actual mandate reimbursement claims by the amount of funding provided to them from these schedules. 5. Federal funds provided in this item for statewide testing purposes shall be fully expended before General Fund resources provided in Item 6100-113-0001 are expended for the same purposes. 6. The Department of Finance, State Department of Education, Legislative Analyst’s Office and legislative staff, and the vendor or vendors of the state’s California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress and English Language Proficiency Assessments for California contract shall meet on an annual basis every October and April to review detailed fiscal information regarding the current components and costs of the contract. The group also shall explore ways to make annual improvements to the state’s assessment system or to achieve related savings. 7. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $314,000 in one-time federal fund carryover is available for contract costs associated with administering the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress. SEC. 7. Item 6100-220-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 6100-220-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program ........................ 99,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5205042-Summer Assistance Program ........................ 99,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for the Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program as specified in Section 45500 of the Education Code. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $9,000,000 is available in fiscal year 2024-25 on a one-time basis. 3. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2026. SEC. 8. Item 6120-011-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 6120-011-0001—For support of California State Library and California Library Services Board ........................ 30,577,000 Schedule: (1) 5310-State Library Services ........................ 24,934,000 (2) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 2,551,000 (3) 5314-Information Technology Services ........................ 3,392,000 (4) Reimbursements to 5310-State Library Services ........................ −300,000 SEC. 9. Item 6120-212-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is repealed. SEC. 10. Item 6980-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 6980-101-0001—For local assistance, Student Aid Commission ........................ 3,164,963,000 Schedule: (1) 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ 3,586,389,000 (2) Reimbursements to 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ −421,426,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for costs of all of the following: (a) The Cal Grant Program, pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (b) The Law Enforcement Personnel Dependents Scholarship Program, pursuant to Section 4709 of the Labor Code. (c) The Assumption Program of Loans for Education, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 69612) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (d) The State Nursing Assumption Program of Loans for Education (SNAPLE), pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 70100) of Chapter 3 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (e) The Middle Class Scholarship Program, pursuant to Article 22 (commencing with Section 70020) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. The Director of Finance, no later than February 1, 2025, shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the total proposed funding amount for the Middle Class Scholarship Program for the 2025–26 budget year to provide the California Student Aid Commission guidance for planning award amounts for newly, continuing, and returning eligible students. Within 30 days of receipt of the notification, the Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee may respond with additional guidance for the California Student Aid Commission. Funding provided in the Budget Act of 2025 for the Middle Class Scholarship Program will ultimately determine available funding. (f) The Cash for College Program, pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 69551) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (g) The Student Opportunity and Access Program (Cal-SOAP), pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 69560) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (h) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,400,000 is available on an ongoing basis to support the Inland Empire Cal-SOAP projects. 1.1. The Student Aid Commission shall report to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by December 1, 2025, regarding the use of funds specified in subprovision (f) of Provision 1. The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information regarding the Cash for College program in 2024–25: (a) A list of regional coordinating organizations specifying, for each organization, whether it was newly added to the program in 2024–25, and the areas of the state that it covers. (b) The services provided by the program, including the number of financial aid application workshops hosted. (c) The number of students participating in financial aid application workshops and the number of those students who completed a Free Application for Federal Student Aid or California Dream Act Application. (d) A description of the coordination between the program and other financial aid outreach efforts conducted by state agencies, local educational agencies, and other entities. 1.2. Of the reimbursements identified in Schedule (2) of this item, $500,000 is for the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) support for the Golden State Teacher Grant Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. 1.3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,000,000 is for Federal Title II, Part A support for the Golden State Teacher Grant Program and shall be available for encumbrance and expenditure through June 30, 2026. 1.5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $7,500,000 is to fund the activities pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 69438) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 1.6 Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,500,000 shall be available on a one-time basis to support the California College of the Arts located in San Francisco California. The California College of the Arts shall submit a report to the Department of Finance by November 2026, regarding how the college used the funds to support or maintain programming or services for students attending the college. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the maximum Cal Grant award for: (a) New recipients attending private, for-profit institutions that are not accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges as of July 1, 2023, shall be $4,000. (b) New recipients attending private, for-profit institutions that are accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges as of July 1, 2023, shall be $8,056. (c) All recipients attending private, nonprofit institutions shall be $9,358. (d) All recipients of Cal Grant B access awards shall be $1,648. (e) All recipients receiving Cal Grant C tuition and fee awards shall be $2,462. (f) All recipients attending community colleges receiving Cal Grant C book and supply awards shall be $1,094. (g) All recipients not attending community colleges receiving Cal Grant C book and supply awards shall be $547. (h) All University of California student recipients receiving Cal Grant awards shall be the amount approved for mandatory systemwide tuition and fees by the Regents of the University of California for the 2024–25 academic year. (i) All California State University student recipients receiving Cal Grant awards shall be the amount approved for mandatory systemwide tuition and fees by the Trustees of the California State University for the 2024–25 academic year. 3. Notwithstanding Provision 2 of this item and any other law: (a) All Cal Grant A award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, or a private nonprofit institution and who have a dependent child or dependent children shall also receive an access award. The maximum amount of this access award shall be $6,000. (b) All Cal Grant B access award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, California Community College, or a private nonprofit institution and who have a dependent child or dependent children shall have a maximum access award of $6,000. (c) All Cal Grant C book and supply award recipients attending a California Community College and who have a dependent child or dependent children shall have a maximum book and supply award of $4,000. 4. Notwithstanding Provision 2 of this item and any other law: (a) All Cal Grant A award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, California Community College, or a private nonprofit institution and who are former or current foster youth shall have a maximum access award of $6,000. (b) All Cal Grant B award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, California Community College, or a private nonprofit institution and who are former or current foster youth shall have a maximum access award of $6,000. (c) All Cal Grant C book and supply award recipients attending a California Community College and who are former or current foster youth shall have a maximum book and supply award of $4,000. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize an augmentation, from the Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties established pursuant to Section 16418 of the Government Code, of the amount appropriated in this item to make Cal Grant awards, pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. No augmentation may be authorized pursuant to this provision sooner than 30 days after the Department of Finance provides notice of the intended augmentation to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund for cashflow purposes, in an amount not to exceed $125,000,000, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from a delay in the receipt of reimbursements from federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds. (b) The Student Aid Commission has received confirmation from the State Department of Social Services that there are no available TANF resources that could be advanced to them. (c) The loan is for a short-term need and shall be repaid within 90 days of the loan’s origination date. (d) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. SEC. 11. Item 6980-101-8099 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 6980-101-8099—For local assistance, Student Aid Commission, payable from the Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Account ........................ 1,159,000 Schedule: (1) 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ 1,159,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030, and liquidation through June 30, 2032, to align with the expenditure timeline pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 69740) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. SEC. 12. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2024 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 22 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 107). (b) Chapter 35 of the Statutes of 2024 (Senate Bill No. 108). (c) Chapter 994 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 157). (d) Chapter 995 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 180). (e) Chapter 1 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Assembly Bill No. 4). (f) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 3). (g) Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 1). (h) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 2). (i) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 100). (j) Chapter 6 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 103). SEC. 13. Item 0509-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0509-001-0001—For support of Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz) ........................ 85,671,000 Schedule: (1) 0220-GO-Biz ........................ 49,794,000 (2) 0225-California Business Investment Services ........................ 3,499,000 (3) 0230-Office of the Small Business Advocate ........................ 29,276,000 (4) 0235010-California Film Commission ........................ 3,232,000 (5) 0235019-Tourism ........................ 860,000 (6) 0235028-California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank ........................ 212,000 (7) 0235037-Small Business Expansion ........................ 492,000 (8) Reimbursements to 0220-GO-Biz ........................ −19,000 (9) Reimbursements to 0225-California Business Investment Services ........................ −50,000 (10) Reimbursements to 0230-Office of the Small Business Advocate ........................ −256,000 (11) Reimbursements to 0235019-Tourism ........................ −670,000 (12) Reimbursements to 0235028-California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank ........................ −212,000 (13) Reimbursements to 0235037-Small Business Expansion ........................ −487,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $3,000,000 shall be used to draw down federal funds in the California Small Business Development Center Program. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $23,000,000 shall be used for the California Small Business Development Technical Assistance Expansion Program. Notwithstanding any other law, this funding shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 3. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available in Schedule (1) may be augmented by up to $650,000 to cover the required state match to receive a federal award for the State Trade Expansion Program. Any augmentation shall be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $7,500,000 shall be for the SEED Initiative. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,000,000 shall be for the Initiating Change in Our Neighborhoods Community Development Corporation. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $4,000,000 is available for GO-Biz to support quantum research and innovation and to convene stakeholders in supporting California’s leadership in quantum. These resources are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. Up to five percent of the total amount may be available for administrative costs. SEC. 14. Item 0509-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0509-101-0001—For local assistance, Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz) ........................ 120,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0220-GO-Biz ........................ 100,000,000 (2) 0235019-Tourism ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $100,000,000 shall be available to the City of Fresno to support the city’s Public Infrastructure Plan. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available for the California Travel and Tourism Commission to promote travel and tourism. SEC. 15. Item 0511-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0511-001-0001—For support of Secretary of Government Operations ........................ 22,448,000 Schedule: (1) 0250-Office of the Secretary of Government Operations ........................ 9,066,000 (2.5) 0254-Education and Workforce Development Coordinating Council ........................ 1,500,000 (3) 0257-Cradle to Career ........................ 15,665,000 (4) Reimbursements to 0250-Office of the Secretary of Government Operations ........................ −3,783,000 Provisions: 1. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,000,000 shall be available for digital harms prevention education. (b) Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology. SEC. 16. Item 0521-101-3228 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 0521-101-3228—For local assistance, Secretary of Transportation, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 368,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0276-Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program ........................ 368,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure and liquidation until June 30, 2031. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $188,000,000 is for the Formula Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program and $180,000,000 is for the Competitive Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program. Funding provided in Schedule (1) for the Formula Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program, when combined with the funding appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 0521-131-0001 identified for the Formula Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program, shall be allocated through the Formula Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program on a population-based formula to each recipient of funding described in subdivision (a) of Section 99313 of the Public Utilities Code in whatever proportion the Transportation Agency determines is appropriate. It is the intent of the Legislature that use of these funds will be consistent with the uses described in Item 0521-131-0001 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). SEC. 17. Item 0530-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0530-001-0001—For support of Secretary of California Health and Human Services ........................ 41,379,000 Schedule: (1) 0280-Secretary of California Health and Human Services ........................ 21,537,000 (2) 0286-Office of Youth and Community Restoration ........................ 28,387,000 (3) 0290-Office of Technology and Solutions Integration ........................ 2,365,000 (4) 0296-Center for Data Insights and Innovation ........................ 338,000 (5) 0297-Office of Surgeon General ........................ 1,404,000 (6) Reimbursements to 0280-Secretary of California Health and Human Services ........................ −2,599,000 (7) Reimbursements to 0286-Office of Youth and Community Restoration ........................ −10,000,000 (8) Reimbursements to 0296-Center for Data Insights and Innovation ........................ −53,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), $2,365,000 shall be used for the Office of the Agency Information Officer and Office of Technology and Solutions Integration and Enterprise Capabilities. The California Health and Human Services Agency shall report to the Legislature at regular intervals and at least on an annual basis on the benefits to participants and beneficiaries of impacted government programs, and which specific programs in the agency improved. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $10,000,000 shall be available to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration for purposes including, but not limited to, providing technical assistance, disseminating best practices, and issuing grants to counties and probation departments for the purpose of transforming the juvenile justice system to improve outcomes for justice involved youth. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,000,000 shall be available to counties for county probation departments for the purposes specified in subdivision (g) of Section 2200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. These funds shall be allocated to the counties by the Controller for county probation departments according to a schedule provided by the Department of Finance and developed in collaboration with the Office of Youth and Community Restoration and Chief Probation Officers of California. The Department of Finance shall provide the schedule to the Controller by September 1 of each year and the Controller shall allocate these funds no later than October 1 of each year, consistent with the schedule provided by the Department of Finance. SEC. 18. Item 0540-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0540-001-0001—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency ........................ 11,659,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 11,659,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be for a study to evaluate wildfire risk. SEC. 19. Item 0540-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 0540-001-6093—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,264,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 2,264,000 SEC. 20. Item 0540-002-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 0540-002-6093—For support of Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 670,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 670,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for Ocean Protection Council program delivery costs related to the funds appropriated in Item 0540-102-6093. SEC. 21. Item 0540-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 0540-101-6093—For local assistance, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 89,150,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 89,150,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item: (a) $46,125,000 is available for competitive grants for urban greening. (b) $15,000,000 is available for geologic heritage sites, including, but not limited to, the La Brea Tar Pits. (c) $10,000,000 is available for the California Academy of Sciences for natural science collection digitization. (d) $9,225,000 is available for the Tribal Nature-Based Solutions Program. (e) $5,000,000 is available for Discovery Cube. (f) $1,800,000 is available to improve the climate resiliency of, or for the protection of, the Clear Lake Watershed. (g) $1,000,000 is available to the Wolf Museum of Exploration and Innovation in Santa Barbara for an interactive water exhibit. (h) $1,000,000 is available to the University of California Davis Integrative Center for Alternative Meat and Protein. 2. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 22. Item 0540-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 0540-102-6093—For local assistance, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 54,500,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 54,500,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item: (a) $7,500,000 is available to the Ocean Protection Council for grants to increase resilience from the impacts of climate change, with preference given to projects that conserve, protect, and restore marine wildlife and healthy ocean and coastal ecosystems, including, but not limited to, those that maintain the state’s system of marine protected areas, and support sustainable fisheries. (b) $12,000,000 is available to the Ocean Protection Council for grants to support restoration efforts to recover rocky reef and kelp forest habitats and their associated species, including, but not limited to, bull kelp, white abalone, and sunflower sea stars; and to advance related workforce development. Eligible purposes include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) support for a statewide rocky reef and kelp forest restoration network; (2) implementation of in-water restoration and infrastructure improvements, and development of a climate-ready workforce to advance species and habitat recovery, prioritizing bull kelp, white abalone, and sunflower sea star; and (3) marine restoration workforce development and capacity building. (c) $3,000,000 is available to the Ocean Protection Council for grants to improve working waterfront infrastructure along the North Coast. (d) $20,000,000 is available to the Ocean Protection Council to implement the California Sea Level Rise Mitigation and Adaptation Act of 2021. (e) $7,000,000 is available to the Ocean Protection Council to support the restoration and management of kelp ecosystems. (f) $5,000,000 is available for a grant to the Wildlife Conservation Board to protect and restore island ecosystems by mitigating the threat of island invasive species and advancing biosecurity initiatives. 2. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 23. Section 0540-103-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0540-103-0001—For local assistance, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency ........................ 61,795,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 61,795,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $13,620,000 shall be available for Clear Lake Restoration. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,400,000 shall be available to the Jewish Community Center of the East Bay for security and infrastructure. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available for the Los Angeles Holocaust Memorial. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,095,000 shall be available to the Child and Family Center for facility purchase, infrastructure improvements, vehicle purchases, and services. 5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,500,000 shall be available to the City of San Diego for the Rancho Bernardo Community Park. 6. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available to the City of San Diego for vegetation management. 7. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available to the Escondido YMCA for infrastructure improvements and repairs. 9. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the San Francisco Parks and Recreation Department for Portsmouth Square. 10. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available to the City of Healdsburg for the Healdsburg Villa Community Center Modernization project. 11. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $50,000 shall be available to the County of Humboldt for the McKinleyville City Incorporation exploration feasibility study. 12. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $500,000 shall be available to the County of Sonoma for ADA improvements and rehabilitation of the County Veterans Building in Cloverdale. 13. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the City of La Puente for the completion of an animal shelter expansion and service K9 training center. 14. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the City of San Pablo for the McNeil Park Project. 15. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $500,000 shall be available to the City of Sacramento for infrastructure projects within City Council District 1. 16. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,175,000 shall be available to the City of Mission Viejo for the Mission Viejo Oso Creek Trail Improvement project. 17. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,590,000 shall be available to the City of Oceanside to support the expansion of the Oceanside Museum of Art. 18. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $265,000 shall be available to the City of San Juan for support of the La Novia urban garden project. 19. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $300,000 shall be available to the City of Solana Beach for the Coastal Rail Trail extension. 20. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be available to the City of San Jose to support the planning and construction of the School of Arts and Culture at the Mexican Heritage Plaza. 21. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the City of Avalon for pier repairs. 22. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the Bixby Knows Community Foundation to support the Clean and Safe program and assist small business and non-profit engagement. 23. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,385,000 shall be available to the City of San Diego for public improvements to the Lake Hodges Dam, the Hodges Reservoir, the El Capitan Dam, and the El Capitan Reservoir. 24. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $615,000 shall be available to the San Diego Mountain Biking Association for building and maintaining public trails for mountain biking. 25. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $50,000 shall be available to the City and County of San Francisco for ADA restroom improvement at the Charity Cultural Services Center. 26. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $750,000 shall be available to the University of Southern California for ONE Archives and for distribution to other non-profit entities for the purposes of archiving LGBTQ+ historical materials. 27. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the City of Newark for support of the improvements plan for Ash Street Park facilities. 28. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be available to the City of Los Angeles Department of Parks and Recreation to rebuild and rehabilitate library and other recreation facilities affected by the Palisades Fire. 29. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be available to the California Community Foundation for collaboration with the CONSORTIUM (Community-Oriented Network for Scientific Observation, Recovery, and Tracking of Impacts of Urban Megafires) on a pilot project to remediate homes with the highest levels of lead contamination in the Eaton burn area. 30. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available to the City and County of San Francisco to support the preservation and revitalization of a historic LGBTQ+ venue that will advance economic development in the Castro neighborhood. 31. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available for support costs to administer the funding appropriated in this item. SEC. 24. Item 0540-491 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0540-491—Reappropriation, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance, or expenditure until June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 0540-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), as reappropriated by Items 0540-490 and 0540-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Item 0540-494, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (2) Item 0540-102-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), including the funding transferred for administrative costs per Provision 1. (3) Paragraph (33) of subdivision (g) of Control Section 19.561 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as allocated to Item 0540-102-0001. 6051—Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006 (1) Item 0540-101-6051, Budget Act of 2008 (Chs. 268 and 269, Stats. 2008), as reappropriated by Item 0540-490, Budget Act of 2011 (Ch. 33, Stats. 2011), Item 0540-490. Budget Act of 2014 (Chs. 25 and 663, Stats. 2014), Item 0540- 490, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017), and Item 0540-490, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs.6 and 7, Stats. 2020). SEC. 25. Item 0650-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 0650-001-6093—For support of Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,334,000 Schedule: (1) 0360-State Planning and Policy Development ........................ 1,050,000 (2) 0370-Strategic Growth Council ........................ 284,000 SEC. 26. Item 0650-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 0650-101-6093—For local assistance, Governor’s Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 23,500,000 Schedule: (1) 0360-State Planning and Policy Development ........................ 22,000,000 (2) 0370-Strategic Growth Council ........................ 1,500,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be available for the Extreme Heat and Community Resilience Program. Of this amount, $2,000,000 shall be available for the Sierra Vista and Placerita Junior High School Green Pathways project. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $500,000 shall be available for the Community Resilience Centers Program. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,000,000 shall be available for the Transformative Climate Communities Program. 4. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. SEC. 27. Item 0690-008-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 0690-008-6093—For support of Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,050,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 1,050,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 123,000 (3) 9900200-Administration— Distributed ........................ −123,000 SEC. 28. Item 0690-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0690-101-0001—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services ........................ 58,296,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 12,500,000 (2) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 45,796,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Office of Emergency Services may provide advance payment of up to 25 percent of grant funds awarded to community-based, nonprofit organizations, cities, school districts, counties, and other units of local government that have demonstrated cashflow problems according to the criteria set forth by the Office of Emergency Services. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $17,000,000 shall be used for grants related to services for victims of human trafficking. 5. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $12,500,000 shall be used for the Listos California Grant Program. The Listos California Grant program shall be managed by the Office of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion within the Executive Office of the Office of Emergency Services. The grants shall be used to provide accessible and culturally competent outreach and resources with assessment and criteria for allocation of funds prioritized for, but not limited to, geographic areas of greatest all hazard risk and vulnerability as highlighted in and demonstrated by the California State Hazard Mitigation Plan; underresourced communities as defined in Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, subdivision (d) of Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code, or subdivision (g) of Section 75005 of the Public Resources Code. The grants shall be administered consistent with the emergency management system described in Section 8607 of the Government Code, including, but not limited to, being informed by community-based and nongovernmental organizations and local emergency service networks, including county emergency officials. The Office of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion shall provide eligible organizations within the identified geographic areas an opportunity to apply to the Listos California Grant Program. The Office of Emergency Services shall report to the appropriate budget committees of the Legislature, the Senate Committee on Governmental Organization, the Assembly Committee on Emergency Management, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on the expenditure of these funds on or before February 1 of each year, including the following: (1) How funds were allocated. (2) What methods of outreach the Office of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion used to inform eligible entities of the funding. (3) The entity or community that received the funding. (4) A description of projects funded. (b) This provision does not diminish or otherwise impact any of the Office of Emergency Services’ responsibilities under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), including, but not limited to, Sections 8550, 8569, 8570, and 8570.3 of, and subdivision (e) of Section 8585 of, the Government Code. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $7,000,000 shall be used to fund Internet Crimes Against Children Task Forces. No more than $250,000 of this amount may be used for administrative support costs. This amount is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 29. Item 0690-102-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0690-102-0001—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services ........................ 25,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 25,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available to support activities directly related to regional response and readiness. These activities include, but are not limited to, predeployment of the Office of Emergency Services’ fire and rescue and local government resources that are part of the California Fire and Rescue Mutual Aid System or additional resources upon the authority and approval of the Office of Emergency Services to meet the requirements for state resources called up for predisaster and disaster response. Prepositioning shall be based upon predesignated criteria and a predicted scale of the emergency event and shall be consistent with this state’s current procedures under the mutual aid system. This funding shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 2. No later than February 1 of each year, the Office of Emergency Services shall report to the appropriate budget subcommittees of the Legislature, the Assembly Committee on Governmental Organization, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on the requests approved for prepositioning resources made by local agencies in the previous fiscal year. The information provided shall be organized by mutual aid region and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following for each request for prepositioning resources: (a) The entity or operational area that requested resources; type of prepositioning event; risk factors (criteria) prompting the request, including a summary of red flag events; description of the resources requested; location where resources were placed; the start date and time and the end date and time of prepositioned resources; and the reimbursement amount associated with the response. (b) An assessment, with input from local fire departments, of the effectiveness of the criteria the Office of Emergency Services uses to approve requests for prepositioning of mutual aid resources. (c) A summary of the extent to which the Office of Emergency Services initiated the prepositioning of resources due to forecasts of inclement weather. (d) If an emergency event happened, data describing the outcomes of the event. This could include, but is not limited to, the total number of acres affected, the number of structures affected, and the total number of deaths and injuries. Because California is subject to a variety of potential events, including, but not limited to, fires, floods, earthquakes, and tsunamis, the nature of this information may vary based on the type of the event. The information provided shall identify whether the event resulted in a federal- or state-declared disaster. SEC. 30. Item 0690-104-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0690-104-0001—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services ........................ 53,685,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 53,685,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $10,000,000 shall be available for grants to family justice centers throughout the state to support and provide legal services to victims of domestic violence, intimate partner violence, sexual assault, child abuse, elder abuse, transnational abandonment, and human trafficking, and to help victims file petitions for protective orders, including domestic violence restraining orders and gun violence restraining orders. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $10,000,000 shall be available for World Cup security in the Bay Area and the Los Angeles region. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available to Fresno County Fire Protection District for Mid Valley Regional Fire Training Center upgrades and expansion. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $150,000 shall be available to Mendocino County for the Covelo fire hydrant system. 5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $585,000 shall be available to the South Lake County Fire Protection District for a water tender. 6. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $560,000 shall be available to the Lake County Fire Protection District for a water tender. 7. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $850,000 shall be available to the Lakeport Fire Protection District for ladder truck refurbishment. 8. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available to the City of Rio Dell to purchase land to support the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection (CAL FIRE) Regional Headquarters. 9. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 is available to County of Del Norte for harbor-related maintenance, including, but not limited to, repairing docks that were damaged during the July 29, 2025, tsunami. 10. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 is available to City of Santa Rosa for neighborhood and school-based safety programs. 11. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $180,000 is available to County of Trinity for allocation to the Weaverville Fire Department for energy communications equipment. 12. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $250,000 is available to Oscar’s Place Adoption Center and Sanctuary to support a farmland water management program and infrastructure on farm animal rescue locations in Hopland and Potter Valley. 13. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 is available to City of Montebello for Wildland Fire Station improvements. 14. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 is available to City of Whittier for fire station improvements. 15. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $500,000 is available to City of Reedley for police department infrastructure rehabilitation. 16. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 is available to Kern County for fire department sheep and goat grazer operations for wildfire prevention. 17. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $8,000,000 is available to the City of Los Angeles for fire engine purchases. 18. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $4,000,000 is available to the City of Azusa for a fire recovery project to clean up hazardous waste and develop land for public space. 19. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $500,000 is available to the City of Los Angeles for the Los Angeles Fire Department for firefighting resources. 20. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $360,000 is available to the Chino Valley Fire District for communications infrastructure. 21. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,550,000 is available to the Milken Community School, East Campus for security and other infrastructure. 22. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,200,000 is available for support costs to administer the funding appropriated in this item. SEC. 31. Item 0690-108-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 0690-108-6093—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 11,950,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 11,950,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for a wildfire mitigation program and may be used to provide loans, rebates, direct assistance, and matching funds for projects that prevent wildfires, increase resilience, maintain existing wildfire risk reduction projects, reduce the risk of wildfires to communities, or increase home or community hardening. Projects shall benefit disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations. This funding is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 32. Item 0977-490 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0977-490—Reappropriation, California Health Facilities Financing Authority. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purpose of the completion of open projects for the Community Services Infrastructure Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—​General Fund (1) $5,000 in Item 0977-001-0001, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) as reappropriated by Item 0977-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (2) $20,626,000 in Item 0977-101-0001, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) as reappropriated by Item 0977-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) SEC. 33. Item 0977-491 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 0977-491—Reappropriation, California Health Facilities Financing Authority. Notwithstanding any other law, the balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated to fund crisis residential treatment, crisis stabilization, mobile crisis support teams, and family respite care approved by the California Health Facilities Financing Authority and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 0977-101-0001, Budget Act of 2013 (Chs. 20 and 354, Stats. 2013), as reappropriated by Item 0977-490, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016), Item 0977-491, Budget Act of 2017 (Chs. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017) and Item 0977-490, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) appropriated in Program 50-Mental Health Wellness Grants. 3085—Mental Health Services Fund (1) Item 0977-101-3085, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016), as reappropriated by Item 0977-490, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) appropriated in program 0890-Mental Health Wellness Grants. (2) Item 0977-101-3085, Budget Act of 2017 (Ch. 14, 22, and 54, Stats. 2017), as reappropriated by item 0977-490, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) appropriated in program 0890-Mental Health Wellness Grants. SEC. 34. Item 1111-001-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 1111-001-0001—For support of Cemetery and Funeral Bureau, Department of Consumer Affairs ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1435019-Cemetery and Funeral Bureau ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for the support of maintenance and upkeep costs of the Lincoln Memorial Park Cemetery and the Woodlawn Cemetery. SEC. 35. Item 1700-101-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 1700-101-0001—For local assistance, Civil Rights Department ........................ 6,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1490-Administration of Civil Rights Law ........................ 6,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available to support implementation of pending legislation that establishes the Bureau for Descendants of American Slavery, subject to enactment. SEC. 36. Item 2240-107-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 2240-107-0001—For local assistance, Department of Housing and Community Development ........................ 32,170,000 Schedule: (1) 1665-Financial Assistance Program ........................ 32,170,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 shall be available to the San Benito High School District for workforce housing project infrastructure. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $7,500,000 shall be provided to the County of Marin for the Oak Hill Housing project. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be provided to the Middletown Rancheria of Pomo Indians of California for affordable housing projects. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,670,000 shall be provided to the County of San Diego for a Homelessness Prevention Program. 5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be provided to the County of Santa Clara for land acquisition and construction costs associated with a new family shelter. 6. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be provided to the City of Oakland to support the Mobile Assistance Community Responders of Oakland program. 7. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be provided to the City of Fresno for downtown Fresno housing projects. 8. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be provided to the California Community Foundation as follows: (a) $2,000,000 for capacity building grants to affordable housing developers to support activities related to utilizing properties owned by faith-based organizations for development of affordable housing in the Altadena area. (b) $2,000,000 for remediation and repair projects at the Altadena Vista Senior Apartments, or other comparable senior housing developments, located within the same community that are fully restricted as 100 percent affordable housing. (c) $2,000,000 for administration of a grant program to provide financial assistance for the development of prefabricated and modular housing in the Altadena area for individuals and families impacted by the Eaton Fire. 9. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be provided to the Altadena CDC for the Rebuild Altadena Pilot Project. SEC. 37. Item 2240-491 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 2240-491—Reappropriation, Department of Housing and Community Development. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance, expenditure, and liquidation as specified below: (1) Provision 2, Item 2240-101-0890, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), until August 20, 2027. (2) Provision 3, Item 2240-101-0890, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), until August 18, 2028. (3) Provision 2, Item 2240-101-0890, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), until August 14, 2032. SEC. 38. Item 2240-493 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 2240-493—Reappropriation, Department of Housing and Community Development. Notwithstanding any other law, the amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until December 31, 2027, and liquidation until December 31, 2028: (1) Up to $372,000 of the amount available in Item 2240-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (2) Up to $48,000,000 of the amount available in Item 2240-106-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (3) Up to $314,000,000 of the amount available in Item 2240-106-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (4) Up to $8,500,000 of the funding transferred to the Department of Housing and Community Development for the Regional Early Action Planning Grants of 2021 by Executive Order E 22/23 – 4 Revised and Executive Order E 24/25 – 158 Revised 2, pursuant to subdivision (o) of Control Section 11.96, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). SEC. 39. Item 2660-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 2660-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Transportation ........................ 9,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 9,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $4,000,000 shall be available to the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District for freight rail operations and capital, and deferred maintenance. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to Sonoma County for the Geyserville ADA Sidewalk and Street Project. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 shall be available to the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District for North County Rail and Great Redwood Trail planning and development. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to Kern County for the Meadows Field Airport rehabilitation and taxiway widening construction. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, a designated state entity administering an allocation pursuant to this item may provide the allocation as an advance lump sum payment, and the allocation may be used to pay for costs incurred prior to the effective date of the act adding this provision. 6. Each allocation in this item includes a designated state entity that shall allocate the funds to the recipients identified in the applicable provision. The state entity shall determine the best method for allocation to ensure the funds are used for the purposes specified in this item. Self-attestation by the receiving entity is an acceptable method of verification of the use of funds, if determined appropriate by the state entity. SEC. 40. Item 2660-301-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 2660-301-0001—For capital outlay, Department of Transportation ........................ 1,500,000 Schedule: (1) 1835019 – Capital Outlay Projects ........................ 1,500,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be for the Hopland ADA Street Project 2. Funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 2660-001-0001. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. SEC. 41. Item 2740-004-0044 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 2740-004-0044—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 10,001,000 Schedule: (1) 2135-Driver Licensing and Personal Identification ........................ 10,001,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 830,000 (3) 9900200-Administration— Distributed ........................ −830,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, the Department of Motor Vehicles may use resources to design and develop the State-to-State Verification System. Expenditure authority under this provision includes information technology planning and project costs to build an IT solution to meet federal REAL ID compliance requirements. The system shall not be activated for the purpose of transmitting or sharing data unless specifically authorized by statute prior to July 1, 2026. SEC. 42. Item 3125-002-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3125-002-6093—For support of California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 150,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 150,000 SEC. 43. Item 3125-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3125-102-6093—For local assistance, California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 5,222,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 5,222,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to reduce the risks of climate change impacts upon communities, fish, wildlife, and natural resources, and to increase public access and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The funds appropriated in this item are available for expenditure for state operations, local assistance, or capital outlay. The term “state operations” as used in conjunction with this appropriation means work completed on land owned by the state and under the jurisdiction of the California Tahoe Conservancy. The term “capital outlay” as used in conjunction with this appropriation means the acquisition, design, or construction of improvements on land owned, or leased, by the state and under the jurisdiction of the California Tahoe Conservancy. SEC. 44. Item 3340-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3340-001-0001—For support of California Conservation Corps ........................ 96,827,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 96,827,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,725,000 shall be available for use by the California Conservation Corps to respond to natural disasters and other emergencies, including the fighting of forest fires. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,098,000 shall be available for grants to the Greater Valley Conservation Corps and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. SEC. 45. Item 3340-001-0318 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3340-001-0318—For support of California Conservation Corps, payable from the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account ........................ 47,531,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 47,531,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 14316 of the Public Resources Code, the Director of Finance may make a loan from the General Fund to the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account in the amount of 25 percent of the reimbursements anticipated in the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account, not to exceed an aggregate total of $7,300,000, to meet cashflow needs from delays in collecting reimbursements. Any loan made by the director pursuant to this provision shall only be made if the California Conservation Corps has a valid contract or certification signed by the client agency that demonstrates that sufficient funds will be available to repay the loan. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid to the General Fund as soon as possible, but not later than one year from the date of the loan. 2. Notwithstanding Section 28.50, the Director of Finance may augment this item to reflect increases in reimbursements to the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account received from another officer, department, division, bureau, or other agency of the state that has requested services from the California Conservation Corps. Any augmentation that is deemed to be necessary on a permanent basis for future budget acts shall be submitted for review as a part of the regular budget process. 3. Notwithstanding Section 28.00, the Director of Finance may augment this item to reflect increases in reimbursements to the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account received from a local government, the federal government, or nonprofit organizations requesting emergency services from the California Conservation Corps after it has notified the Legislature through a letter to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Any augmentation that is deemed to be necessary on a permanent basis shall be submitted for review as a part of the regular budget process. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 is from the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for forest health projects and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,500,000 shall be available for the repair and replacement of the Los Piños Center and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 46. Item 3340-001-3228 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3340-001-3228—For support of California Conservation Corps, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 8,342,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 8,342,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 15.14. SEC. 47. Item 3340-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3340-001-6093—For support of California Conservation Corps, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 200,000 SEC. 48. Item 3340-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3340-101-6093—For local assistance, California Conservation Corps, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 9,949,000 Schedule: (1) 2360-Training and Work Program ........................ 9,949,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to certified community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5 of the Public Resources Code, for demonstrated jobs projects, as described in Section 91545 of the Public Resources Code, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 49. Item 3355-490 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3355-490—Reappropriation, Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026: 0462—Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account (1) Up to $9,555,000 in Item 3355-001-0462, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) as reappropriated by Item 3355-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 944, Stats. 2024) 3302—Safe Energy Infrastructure and Excavation Fund (1) Up to $1,140,000 in Item 3355-001-3302, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) as reappropriated by Item 3355-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 944, Stats. 2024) SEC. 50. Item 3360-001-3228 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3360-001-3228—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2390010-Transportation Technology and Fuels ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be used for administrative costs to support the deployment of charging infrastructure for heavy-duty zero-emission vehicles. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 3360-101-3228. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2033. SEC. 51. Item 3360-002-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3360-002-6093—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 497,000 Schedule: (1) 2390028 — Renewable Energy ........................ 497,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for administrative costs to implement Section 94530 of the Public Resources Code. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2030. SEC. 52. Item 3360-003-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3360-003-6093—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2380010— Power Plant Site Certification and Transmission Line Corridor Designation Program ........................ 2,500,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission for the administration of Section 94540 of the Public Resources Code, including for the Offshore Wind Waterfront Facility Improvement Program established pursuant to Section 25666 of the Public Resources Code. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2030. SEC. 53. Item 3360-101-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3360-101-0001—For local assistance of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2390028-Renewable Energy ........................ 5,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission for support and grants for fusion projects, including for the Fusion Research and Development Innovation Initiative. 2. Fusion projects that have received federal funding and will leverage additional private investment shall be prioritized and expedited for funding. 3. Up to 5 percent of funding in this item may be available to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission for administrative costs to implement this funding. 4. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2029. SEC. 54. Item 3360-101-3228 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3360-101-3228—For local assistance, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 38,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2390010-Transportation Technology and Fuels ........................ 38,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be used to support the deployment of charging infrastructure for heavy-duty zero-emission vehicles. 2. With the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission shall administer a program to fund projects consistent with Section 44272 of the Health and Safety Code, and consistent with the following requirements: (a) The commission may add these funds to existing competitively awarded agreements if existing competitive agreements are consistent with the use of funds described in Provision 1 of this item. (b) The commission may adopt guidelines or other standards for this program at a commission business meeting following at least one public workshop. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to guidelines or other standards for the program adopted at a commission business meeting. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2033. SEC. 55. Item 3360-102-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3360-102-0001—For local assistance, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission ........................ 4,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2380010-Power Plant Site Certification and Transmission Line Corridor Designation Program ........................ 4,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this Item shall be available to support the CADEMO offshore wind demonstration project. SEC. 56. Item 3360-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3360-102-6093—For local assistance, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 46,144,000 Schedule: (1) 2390028 — Renewable Energy ........................ 46,144,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be used for the Distributed Electricity Backup Assets Program, consistent with Section 94530 of the Public Resources Code, to provide project funding and to fund ongoing incentives exclusively for new clean microgrids, or new non-residential or aggregated residential distributed clean energy and storage projects. Projects receiving federal funding that support critical infrastructure, such as water utilities, shall be prioritized and expedited for funding only if that federal funding is secure and in place. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, no less than $12,500,000 of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1) for the Distributed Electricity Backup Assets Program shall provide state cost sharing for water utility projects that have received awards from the United States Department of Energy Grid Resilience and Innovation Partnerships program only if that federal funding is secure and in place. The State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission may award these funds expeditiously and non-competitively. 3. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2030. SEC. 57. Item 3360-103-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3360-103-6093—For local assistance, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 225,719,000 Schedule: (1) 2380010— Power Plant Site Certification and Transmission Line Corridor Designation Program ........................ 225,719,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission for the purposes authorized in Section 94540 of the Public Resources Code, including for the Offshore Wind Waterfront Facility Improvement Program established pursuant to Section 25666 of the Public Resources Code. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2030. 3. No later than January 10, 2026, the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission shall report to the relevant policy committees and budget committees of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on the use of Proposition 4 funding for offshore wind. The report shall include the following information on each project has received a grant award as of January 10, 2026: name, description, Proposition 4 award amount, amount of non-state funding secured to date, and estimated total project cost. The report shall also include the commission’s proposed plan for the use of any Proposition 4 funds designated for offshore wind that have not yet been awarded to projects of January 10, 2026. This plan shall include the following information: (1) estimated schedule for when the remaining unawarded Proposition 4 funds are anticipated to be appropriated, awarded to grantees, and expended; (2) description of the process that will be used to award the remaining funds to grantees; (3) identification of the criteria that are anticipated to be used to award the remaining funds to grantees; (4) summary of the types of projects anticipated to be funded and the amount of funding expected to be provided to each type of project, if available; (5) summary of how the commission’s approach to awarding the remaining funds is anticipated to differ, if at all, from the approach taken to awarding the grants made prior to January 10, 2026; (6) summary of rationale for the commission’s proposed approach to allocating the remaining Proposition 4 funds, rather than other potential approaches; and (7) explanation for how the commission plans to maximize the effectiveness Proposition 4 funds to attract private and federal funding to complete the port infrastructure necessary to meet the state’s 2030 and 2045 goals for offshore wind as well as align with the findings in the port readiness plan prepared pursuant to Chapter 231 of the Statutes of 2021. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, $42,750,000 of the funding in this item may be used to provide incentives to support offshore wind infrastructure improvements consistent with the Offshore Wind Waterfront Facility Improvement Program established pursuant to Section 25666 of the Public Resources Code. SEC. 58. Item 3480-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3480-001-6093—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 95,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 95,000 SEC. 59. Item 3480-002-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3480-002-6093—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 105,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 105,000 SEC. 60. Item 3480-003-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3480-003-6093—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 630,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 630,000 SEC. 61. Item 3480-004-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3480-004-6093—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 150,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 150,000 SEC. 62. Item 3480-101-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3480-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Conservation ........................ 1,100,000 Schedule: (1) 2425-Geologic Energy Management Division ........................ 1,100,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to the City of Santa Clarita for oil well capping. SEC. 63. Item 3480-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3480-101-6093—For local assistance, Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 32,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 32,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the Multi-benefit Land Repurposing Program for groundwater sustainability projects that reduce groundwater use, repurpose irrigated agricultural land, provide wildfire habitat, improve drought resilience or floodwater management, or support implementation of the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6 of the Water Code). Groundwater sustainability projects may include land acquisitions for the purposes specified in this provision. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 64. Item 3480-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3480-102-6093—For local assistance, Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the Regional Forest and Fire Capacity Program to increase regional capacity to prioritize, develop, and implement projects that improve forest health and fire resilience, implement community fire preparedness demonstration projects, facilitate greenhouse gas emissions reductions, and increase carbon sequestration in forests and other landscapes across regions and throughout the state. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 65. Item 3480-103-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3480-103-6093—For local assistance, Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for projects in California that provide long-term capital infrastructure to use forest and other vegetative waste removed for wildfire mitigation for noncombustible uses that maximize reductions in greenhouse gas emissions, provide local air quality benefits, and increase local community resilience against climate change impacts. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 66. Item 3480-104-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3480-104-6093—For local assistance, Department of Conservation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 6,850,000 Schedule: (1) 2430-Land Resource Protection ........................ 6,850,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,850,000 shall be available for projects for the protection, restoration, conservation, and enhancement of farmland and rangeland, including, but not limited to, the acquisition of fee title or easements, that improve climate resilience, open-space soil health, atmospheric carbon removal, soil carbon sequestration, erosion control, watershed health, water quality, or water retention. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be for grants for the planning, design, and implementation of projects to protect, restore, conserve, and enhance farmlands and rangelands to improve climate resilience and protect biodiversity. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 67. Item 3540-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3540-001-0001—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 1,396,397,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ 33,618,000 (2) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 2,108,851,000 (3) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 21,268,000 (4) 2475-Board of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 370,000 (5) 2480-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 6,828,000 (6) 9900100-Administration ........................ 215,314,000 (7) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −214,944,000 (8) Reimbursements to 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ −25,567,000 (9) Reimbursements to 2465-Fire Protection ........................ −747,395,000 (10) Reimbursements to 2470-Resource Management ........................ −1,576,000 (11) Reimbursements to 9900100-Administration ........................ −370,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize the temporary or permanent redirection of funds from this item for purposes of emergency fire suppression and detection costs and related emergency revegetation costs. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 45 percent of reimbursements appropriated in Schedule (9) of this item, to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by November 15 of the fiscal year following that in which the loan was authorized. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) Within 10 days after approval, the Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the loan approved pursuant to this provision. 3. The Director of Finance may adjust amounts in Schedule (2) to provide equivalent fire protection base funding changes to contract counties in accordance with Section 4130 of the Public Resources Code. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item for purposes of Division 10.5 (commencing with Section 12200) of the Public Resources Code shall be available for purposes of support or capital outlay. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may adjust this item for the direct and indirect cost reimbursements received pursuant to Sections 4142 and 4144 of the Public Resources Code. Any increase shall occur no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity of the increase to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may provide contractual services pursuant to Sections 4142 and 4144 of the Public Resources Code without an executed agreement from July to September of each fiscal year to better align contract start times with the budget process and to finalize staff benefit rates that are dependent upon actions by the Public Employees’ Retirement System and passage of the annual Budget Act. 7. Notwithstanding any other law or administrative procedure, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may amend its pilot and mechanic contract, along with its parts contract, for both scope changes and contracted amounts to address unanticipated workload resulting from higher than anticipated demand for these contracted services. The Department of Finance may augment this item and authorize expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in this item no sooner than 30 days after providing notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the Chairperson of the committee in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations, the Chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the joint committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 9. Notwithstanding Section 28.00 of this act, upon request of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Finance may adjust Schedules (2) and (9) of this item to reflect increases in reimbursements from non-state entities providing assistance-by-hire emergency fire suppression services. The Director of Finance may authorize expenditures in excess of the amount appropriated in this item after the receipt of the request from the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. Within 10 days of approval, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification of any such augmentation to the Chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the Chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 11. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,250,000 shall be available for deferred maintenance and special repair projects at existing Department of Forestry and Fire Protection facilities to accommodate additional hand crews. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 12. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,000,000 shall be available for a home hardening program, contingent upon passage of future legislation. 13. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,804,000 shall be exempt from any applicable law requiring competitive bidding or the supervision or approval of another department or agency of state government for the procurement of or contracting with vendors for logistical support, including, but not limited to, feeding, lodging, training, and the purchase of personal protective equipment for additional fire suppression staff hired for the implementation of the 66-hour workweek. 14. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $39,000,000 shall be used to begin transitioning a portion of Firefighter I positions within the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection to a permanent firefighter employment classification. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $78,000,000 in 2026-27 and ongoing for this purpose. It is the intent of the Legislature to transition the remainder of the existing Firefighter I positions to a permanent firefighter employment classification, subject to enactment of future legislation and appropriation of necessary funding. SEC. 68. Item 3540-001-3228 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3540-001-3228—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 1,000,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 1,207,584,000 (2) Reimbursements to 2465-Fire Protection ........................ −207,584,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may reduce the amount of this appropriation by any amount necessary if the actual amount of Cap-and-Invest auction proceed receipts are lower than projected and it determines the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund balance is projected to be insufficient to support the full amount of this appropriation. The Department of Finance may also augment Item 3540-001-0001 by the same amount of any reduction to maintain full funding for the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection’s fire protection operations. The Department of Finance may also establish any schedules in Item 3540-001-0001 that are necessary to facilitate any such augmentation. Any provisions of this item that are necessary to effectuate the purposes of any funding shifted from this item to Item 3540-001-0001 pursuant to this provision shall also apply to Item 3540-001-0001. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon the order of the Department of Finance, one or more loans, not to exceed a cumulative total of 75 percent of the amount appropriated in this item, shall be made available from the General Fund to the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, to be transferred as needed to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of Cap-and-Invest auction proceeds. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid as soon as sufficient Cap-and-Invest auction proceeds have been collected to meet immediate cash needs, but not later than June 30 of the fiscal year in which the loan was authorized. Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 45 percent of reimbursements appropriated in Schedule (2) of this item, to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by November 15 of the fiscal year following that in which the loan was authorized. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) Within 10 days after approval, the Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the loan approved pursuant to this provision. 4. Notwithstanding any other law or administrative procedure, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may amend its pilot and mechanic contract, along with its parts contract, for both scope changes and contracted amounts to address unanticipated workload resulting from higher than anticipated demand for these contracted services. The Department of Finance may augment this item and authorize expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in this item no sooner than 30 days after providing notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the chairperson of the committee in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $86,995,000 shall be exempt from any applicable law requiring competitive bidding or the supervision or approval of another department or agency of state government for the procurement of or contracting with vendors for logistical support, including, but not limited to, feeding, lodging, training, and the purchase of personal protective equipment for additional fire suppression staff hired for the implementation of the 66-hour workweek. 6. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 15.14. The funds appropriated in this item are exempt from Sections 39712, 39715, and 39718 to 39721, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code and Section 16428.9 of the Government Code. Additionally, the funds appropriated in this item shall not be included in the calculation of funding appropriated from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund for the purposes of Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be included in the report produced pursuant to Section 39720 of the Health and Safety Code, and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall not be required to submit information pursuant to Section 39721 of the Health and Safety Code for the funds appropriated in this item. 7. Notwithstanding Section 28.00 of this act, upon request of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Finance may adjust Schedules (1) and (2) of this item to reflect increases in reimbursements from non-state entities providing assistance-by-hire emergency fire suppression services. The Director of Finance may authorize expenditures in excess of the amount appropriated in this item after the receipt of the request from the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. Within 10 days of approval, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification of any such augmentation to the Chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the Chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 8. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature and the Governor to appropriate the following amounts from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund for the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection’s fire protection activities if the General Fund is projected to be in a deficit: $1,250,000,000 in the 2026–27 fiscal year, $500,000,000 in the 2027–28 fiscal year, and $500,000,000 in the 2028–29 fiscal year. (b) It is the intent of the Legislature and the Governor to appropriate the following amount from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund for the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection’s fire protection activities if the General Fund is not projected to be in a deficit: $500,000,000 in the 2026–27 fiscal year. SEC. 69. Item 3540-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-001-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,107,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 1,107,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the administration of regional projects to improve local fire prevention capacity, improve forest health and resilience, and reduce the risk of wildfire spreading into populated areas from wildlands pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. SEC. 70. Item 3540-003-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-003-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,100,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 100,000 (2) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 1,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the administration of local fire prevention grants and workforce development for fire prevention and wildfire resiliency work. SEC. 71. Item 3540-004-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-004-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,225,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 1,225,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for administration of the Forest Health Program. SEC. 72. Item 3540-006-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-006-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 500,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for administration of the urban forestry program. SEC. 73. Item 3540-007-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-007-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 200,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the administration of funding to the Wildfire Conservancy to improve firefighter health and safety, advance fire attack effectiveness, and promote community resilience and awareness. SEC. 74. Item 3540-008-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-008-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 200,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the administration of funding to the California Fire Foundation to support vegetation mitigation and fuels reduction projects, public education and outreach, personal protective equipment, specialized firefighting equipment, and firefighter health and safety. SEC. 75. Item 3540-009-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-009-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 23,262,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 23,262,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for technologies that improve detection and assessment of new fire ignitions. These funds shall be available for support or local assistance, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $16,812,000 shall be available for low earth orbit satellite technology, including FireSat satellites and related resources. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available for AlertCalifornia for wildfire detection camera-related technology. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,250,000 shall be available for a study within the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection to test and evaluate use cases related to the use of autonomous aircraft for early ignition detection as well as suppression. SEC. 76. Item 3540-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-101-6093—For local assistance, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 30,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 30,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for regional projects to improve local fire prevention capacity, improve forest health and resilience, and reduce the risk of wildfire spreading into populated areas from wildlands pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031. SEC. 77. Item 3540-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-102-6093—For local assistance, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 2,500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the creation or expansion of a fire training center and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031. SEC. 78. Item 3540-103-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-103-6093—For local assistance, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 80,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 80,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for local fire prevention grants and workforce development for fire prevention and wildfire resiliency work and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $70,000,000 shall be available for local fire prevention grants. (a) For purposes of the funds appropriated pursuant to this provision, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall, as part of its prioritization criteria in grant guidelines, include prioritization of fire protection projects that benefit the most populous fire-threatened communities. (b) The funds appropriated pursuant to this provision may be used for emergency equipment, including, but not limited to, backup generators, pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 4124.5 of the Public Resources Code. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available for the Future Fire Academy. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,000,000 shall be available for the Forestry and Fire Recruitment Program. 5. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,500,000 shall be available for the California Conservation Corps. 6. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be available for local conservation corps. SEC. 79. Item 3540-104-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-104-6093—For local assistance, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 80,938,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 80,938,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the Forest Health Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031. SEC. 80. Item 3540-105-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-105-6093—For local assistance, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 30,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 30,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for grants to conduct fuel reduction, structure hardening, create defensible space, reforestation, or targeted acquisitions to improve forest health and fire resilience. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $20,000,000 shall be available for grants to conduct fuel reduction, structure hardening, and create defensible space in the counties of Santa Barbara, Ventura, Los Angeles, San Bernardino, Orange, Riverside, San Diego, and Imperial. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031. SEC. 81. Item 3540-107-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-107-6093—For local assistance, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 13,837,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 13,837,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to the Wildfire Conservancy to improve firefighter health and safety, advance fire attack effectiveness, and promote community resilience and awareness. SEC. 82. Item 3540-108-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-108-6093—For local assistance, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 13,837,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 13,837,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the California Fire Foundation to support vegetation mitigation and fuels reduction projects, public education and outreach, personal protective equipment, specialized firefighting equipment, and firefighter health and safety. SEC. 83. Item 3540-490 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3540-490—Reappropriation, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and as partially reverted by Item 3540-495, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. (1) 0005192-Fresno Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (2) 0005193-Ramona Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (3) 0005212-Paso Robles Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Preliminary plans (2) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. (1) 0005212-Paso Robles Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Working drawings (3) Up to $463,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. (1) 000678-Chico Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Working drawings (4) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0003210-Perris Emergency Command Center: Remodel Facility (a) Construction (5) Up to $842,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. (1) 0003213-Alhambra Valley Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (6) Up to $1,000,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. (1) 0008988-Riverside Unit Headquarters: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (7) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. (1) 0005014-Elsinore Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (2) 0006679-Intermountain Conservation Camp: Replace Facility (a) Acquisition (8) Up to $289,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (1) 0000176-Higgins Corner Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Preliminary plans (9) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0001380-Macdoel Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Preliminary plans (2) 0005020-Hemet Ryan Air Attack Base: Replace Facility (a) Working drawings (3) 0005192-Fresno Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Construction (4) 0005193-Ramona Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Construction (5) 0006681-Howard Forest Helitack Base: Replace Facility (a) Preliminary plans (10) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), and as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), and Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. (1) 0000176-Higgins Corner Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Working drawings (2) 0000971-Shasta Trinity Unit Headquarters/Northern Operations: Relocate Facilities (a) Working drawings (3) 0001380-Macdoel Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Working drawings (4) 0009701-Self-Generating Power Projects in Tehama-Glenn and Fresno-Kings Units (a) Preliminary plans (11) Up to $500,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0009702-Tehama Glenn Unit Headquarters: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (12) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats, 2022) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 000678-Chico Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Construction (2) 0005212-Paso Robles Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Construction (3) 0000186-Potrero Forest Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Construction (4) 0009704-Bear Valley Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (13) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023), as reappropriated by Item 3540-490, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. (1) 0009701-Self-Generating Power Projects in Tehama-Glenn and Fresno-Kings Units (a) Working drawings (2) 0011022-Rohnerville Air Attack Base: Replace Fuel System (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (3) 0005023-Growlersburg Conservation Camp: Replace Facility (a) Working drawings (14) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. (1) 0008424-Boggs Mountain Helitack Base: Relocate Facility (a) Preliminary plans (2) 0005032-Hollister Air Attack Base/Bear Valley Helitack Base: Replace Facilities (a) Working drawings (3) 0014062-Sonoma Lake Napa Unit Headquarters and Glen Ellen Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Performance criteria 0660—Public Buildings Construction Fund (1) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats 2022) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (1) 0003211-Prado Helitack Base: Replace Facility (a) Construction SEC. 84. Item 3540-495 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3540-495—Reversion, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. As of June 30, 2025, the unencumbered balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations shall revert to the fund balances of the funds from which the appropriations were made. 0001—General Fund (1) 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (1) 0006678-Chico Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Preliminary plans (2) Up to $500,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) (1) 0006678-Chico Air Attack Base: Infrastructure Improvements (a) Working drawings (3) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (2) 0008424-Boggs Mountain Helitack Base: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (4) Up to $1,500,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (1) 0003213-Alhambra Valley Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (5) Up to $450,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (1) 0000176-Higgins Corner Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Preliminary plans (6) Up to $2,510,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) (1) 0008988-Riverside Unit Headquarters: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (7) Up to $849,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (1) 009701-Tehama Glenn Unit Headquarters: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition (8) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (1) 005020-Hemet-Ryan Air Attack Base: Replace Facility (a) Construction (2) 0006681-Howard Forest Helitack Base: Replace Facility (a) Working drawings (3) 0008987-Columbia Helitack Base: Replace Facility (a) Preliminary plans (4) 0008990-North Lake Tahoe Fire Station: New Facility (a) Acquisition (9) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) (1) 0011286-Additional CAL FIRE Training Center (a) Acquisition (10) Item 3540-301-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (1) 0011024-Hayfork Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Preliminary plans (2) 0011286-Additional CAL FIRE Training Center (a) Acquisition (11) Up to $8,000 appropriated through an augmentation approved by the State Public Works Board at the board’s December 13, 2019, meeting. (1) 000176-Higgins Corner Fire Station: Replace Facility (a) Acquisition 0660—Public Building Construction Fund (1) Up to $62,000 appropriated through an augmentation approved by the State Public Works Board at the board’s March 8, 2019, meeting. (1) 000164-Altaville Forest Fire Station: Replace Automotive Shop (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (c) Construction (2) Up to $135,000 appropriated through an augmentation approved by the State Public Works Board at the board’s July 12, 2019, meeting. (1) 0000006-Academy: Construct Dormitory Building and Expand Mess Hall (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (c) Construction (3) Up to $938,000 appropriated through an augmentation approved by the State Public Works Board through delegated authority at the board’s November 2019 meeting. (1) 0000169-Butte Unit Fire Station/Unit Headquarters: Replace Facility (a) Preliminary plans (b) Working drawings (c) Construction (4) Up to $1,089,000 appropriated through an augmentation approved by the State Public Works Board through delegated authority at the board’s July 13, 2020, and July 23, 2021, meetings. (1) 0000165-Badger Forest Fire Station: Replace Facility (c) Construction (5) Up to $16,000 appropriated through an augmentation approved by the State Public Works Board at the board’s October 14, 2016, meeting. (1) 0000179-Las Posadas Forest Fire Station: Replace Facility (b) Working drawings (c) Construction (6) Up to $2,004,000 appropriated through an augmentation approved by the State Public Works Board at the board’s May 17, 2021, and May 16, 2022, meetings. (1) 0000189-San Mateo/Santa Cruz Unit Headquarters: Relocate Automotive Shop (a) Construction (7) Item 3540-301-0660, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (14) 0005016-Humboldt-Del Norte Unit Headquarters: Relocate Facility (a) Working drawings 0668—Public Building Construction Fund Subaccount (1) Up to $4,000 appropriated through an augmentation approved by the State Public Works Board at the board’s June 14, 2019, meeting. (1) 0000182-Parkfield Fire Station: Relocate Facility (a) Acquisition SEC. 85. Item 3600-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3600-001-6093—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 774,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 774,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. SEC. 86. Item 3600-002-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3600-002-6093—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 22,850,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 22,850,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for state operations or local assistance to protect and restore island ecosystems, advance climate-ready fisheries management, and support the restoration and management of kelp ecosystems, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The Department of Fish and Wildlife may transfer funds to be used for local assistance from this item to Item 0540-102-6093 for direct expenditure in such amounts as needed to meet operational needs. SEC. 87. Item 3600-003-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3600-003-6093—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 327,000 Schedule: (1) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 327,000 SEC. 88. Item 3600-004-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3600-004-6093—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 4,673,000 Schedule: (1) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 4,673,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for hatchery upgrades and expansions that increase fish production and include the latest technologies to support species conservation and reintroduction efforts necessary to support genetically diverse populations of Central Valley Chinook Salmon and is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 89. Item 3600-005-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3600-005-6093—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for reduction of climate impacts on disadvantaged communities and vulnerable populations and the creation, protection, and expansion of outdoor recreation opportunities, and is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 90. Item 3600-102-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3600-102-0001—For local assistance, Department of Fish and Wildlife ........................ 1,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 1,500,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for Eel River Fisheries management, science, and monitoring. 2. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for support or local assistance. SEC. 91. Item 3600-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3600-102-6093—For local assistance, Department of Fish and Wildlife, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available to protect and restore island ecosystems, advance climate-ready fisheries management, and support the restoration and management of kelp ecosystems, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. If additional funds are needed beyond the amount appropriated in this item, the Department of Fish and Wildlife may transfer funds from Item 3600-002-6093 to this item, pursuant to Provision 2 of Item 3600-002-6093. SEC. 92. Item 3640-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3640-001-6093—For support of Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 1,500,000 SEC. 93. Item 3640-002-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3640-002-6093—For support of Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 1,000,000 SEC. 94. Item 3640-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3640-101-6093—For local assistance, Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 235,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 235,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for grant programs to protect and enhance fish and wildlife resources and habitat and achieve the state’s biodiversity, public access, and conservation goals, and is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $16,000,000 shall be granted for the purchase of a conservation easement at San Julian Ranch. The grant agreement for San Julian Ranch shall include provisions for public recreational opportunities consistent with the rights of private property owners, and without having a significant adverse impact on agricultural operations and environmentally sensitive areas. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $6,300,000 shall be available for Native Seed Banking. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $10,003,000 shall be granted to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for migratory bird programs as follows: (a) $1,670,000 for the California Winter Wild Rice Habitat Incentive Program. (b) $333,000 for the Bid4Birds Program. (c) $8,000,000 for the BirdReturns Program. 5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $21,500,000 shall be granted for floodplain and habitat restoration projects in the counties of Kern, Kings, and Tulare. 6. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available for the Miles Creek and Bear Creek Infrastructure and Flood Protection Initiative. SEC. 95. Item 3640-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3640-102-6093—For local assistance, Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for projects to improve habitat connectivity and establish wildlife crossings and corridors, and is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 96. Item 3640-103-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3640-103-6093—For local assistance, Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 3,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 3,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for the Lower American River Conservancy Program and is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 97. Item 3640-104-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3640-104-6093—For local assistance, Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for projects pursuant to the guidelines of the Stream Flow Enhancement Program and is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 98. Item 3640-105-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3640-105-6093—For local assistance, Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for the Habitat Enhancement and Restoration Program and is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 99. Item 3640-106-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3640-106-6093—For local assistance, Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for climate change adaptation improvements to protect, conserve, and restore the health and resilience of the southern Ballona Creek Watershed. The funds shall be granted to the Baldwin Hills Conservancy and are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 100. Item 3640-107-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3640-107-6093—For local assistance, Wildlife Conservation Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2710-Wildlife Conservation Board ........................ 5,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for the protection, restoration, and enhancement of the natural resource values of the state park system and for projects to expand recreational opportunities and public access to state and public park nonmotorized trails. 2. The amount appropriated in this item shall be utilized for the 40 Acre Conservation League to acquire and protect critical desert habitat in the Mojave and Colorado Deserts. 3. The amount appropriated in this item may be used for support or local assistance and are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 101. Item 3720-101-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3720-101-0001—For local assistance, California Coastal Commission ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2730-Coastal Management Program ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to the City of Petaluma for the Petaluma River Foundation. SEC. 102. Item 3760-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3760-001-6093—For state operations, State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 3,420,000 Schedule: (1) 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ 3,420,000 SEC. 103. Item 3760-101-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3760-101-0001—For local assistance, State Coastal Conservancy ........................ 6,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ 6,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the Great Redwood Trail Agency for general operations and trail and restoration planning, design, construction, and implementation. SEC. 104. Item 3760-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3760-101-6093—For local assistance, State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 181,835,000 Schedule: (1) 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ 181,835,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item: (a) $62,000,000 is available for coastal resilience projects and programs, including, but not limited to, grants and expenditures to protect, restore, and increase the resilience of beaches, bays, coastal dunes, wetlands, coastal forests, watersheds, trails, and public access facilities. Of this amount, $3,000,000 is available for projects that support the restoration and enhancement of native oyster beds and $5,000,000 is available for projects that support the conservation and restoration of native steelhead trout populations, including species translocations. (b) $40,000,000 is available for projects that are consistent with the San Francisco Bay Restoration Authority Act or the San Francisco Bay Area Conservancy Program, including, but not limited to, projects that address sea level rise, flood management, and wetland restoration. (c) $32,835,000 is available for coastal and combined flood management projects and activities for developed shoreline areas, including, but not limited to, areas with critical community infrastructure, including, but not limited to, transportation and port infrastructure, that is at risk of current flooding and flooding due to sea level rise. (d) $20,000,000 is available to facilitate the Matilija Dam removal. (e) $10,000,000 is available for the Santa Ana River Conservancy Program. (f) $8,500,000 is available for grants or expenditures to remove outdated or obsolete dams and for related water infrastructure. (g) $5,500,000 is available for fish passage barrier removal and habitat restoration for the Potter Valley Project. (h) $3,000,000 is available for the Coyote Valley Conservation Program. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 105. Item 3760-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3760-102-6093—For local assistance, State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 50,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ 50,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $650,000 is for the Great Redwood Trail Agency for completion of a master plan for the Great Redwood Trail Project. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $41,350,000 is for the Great Redwood Trail Agency for completion of the Great Redwood Trail Project. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 is for the Great Redwood Trail Agency for environmental restoration in the Eel River Canyon. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 is for the Great Redwood Trail Agency for preservation of tribal cultural resources along the Great Redwood Trail. 5. For the purposes of this item, the Great Redwood Trail shall be defined as a non-motorized trail between the Dividing line, as defined in Government Code Section 93004, and the terminus of the former Northern Pacific Railroad main line at Mile Post 300.5 in Samoa, California, along the historical Northern Pacific Railroad Line right-of-way or adjacent thereto, and the supporting auxiliary facilities to the trail, including, but not limited to, signage, access improvements, and restrooms. 6. The Great Redwood Trail Project shall be defined as the design and construction of the Great Redwood Trail, including, but not limited to, reconstruction, demolition, modification, or repair of existing facilities. 7. The funds appropriated in this item are from Section 94030 of Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 106. Item 3790-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3790-001-6093—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 3,550,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 3,550,000 SEC. 107. Item 3790-002-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3790-002-0001—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 19,960,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 19,960,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for support or capital outlay and shall be available for expenditure or encumbrance until June 30, 2028. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be available for restoration of Will Rogers and Topanga Canyon State Parks. SEC. 108. Item 3790-002-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3790-002-6093—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 84,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 84,000,000 Provisions: 1. As part of its project prioritization criteria, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall include projects that advance climate resilience and support equitable access to parks. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 109. Item 3790-003-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3790-003-6093—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 56,750,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 56,750,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. SEC. 110. Item 3790-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3790-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 3,200,000 Schedule: (1) 2855047-Local Grants ........................ 3,200,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be available for the following: (a) $3,000,000 shall be available for a grant to the California Museum. (b) $200,000 shall be available to the City and County of San Francisco for Sunset Dunes striping and signage. SEC. 111. Item 3790-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3790-101-6093—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 188,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2855036-Local Assistance Grants ........................ 188,500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the creation, expansion, and renovation of safe neighborhood parks in park-poor neighborhoods in accordance with the Statewide Park Development and Community Revitalization Act of 2008’s competitive grant program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and liquidation until June 30, 2031. SEC. 112. Item 3790-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3790-102-6093—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 105,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2855036-Local Assistance Grants ........................ 105,500,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item: (a) $20,000,000 is available for the reduction of climate impacts on disadvantaged communities and vulnerable populations and the creation, protection, and expansion of outdoor recreation opportunities. Of this amount, $10,000,000 is available for the restoration, rehabilitation, protection, and capital improvement of former airport lands to create parks and open space. (b) $20,000,000 is available for the purposes of the Hollister Ranch Public Access Plan, including public access improvements at Hollister Ranch. Of this amount, $5,000,000 is available immediately for a pilot program to inform the final Environmental Impact Statement. (c) $22,000,000 is available for Sepulveda Basin Park Cleanup. (d) $16,200,000 is available for the Eaton Canyon Natural Area and Nature Center. (e) $5,500,000 is available for the Charles White Park. (f) $5,000,000 is available for City of San Marcos Park improvements. (g) $5,000,000 is available for the Hughes Fire Recovery at Castaic Lake. (h) $5,000,000 is available for Rosemead Park improvements. (i) $4,300,000 is available for the Grove Neighborhood Park project. (j) $2,000,000 is available for the Don Fernando Pacheco Adobe rehabilitation. (k) $500,000 is available for Flat Top Park. 2. The funds in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 113. Item 3810-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3810-001-6093—For support of Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 2940-Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ 400,000 SEC. 114. Item 3810-003-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3810-003-6093—For support of Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 2940-Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ 400,000 SEC. 115. Item 3810-004-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3810-004-6093—For support of Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 200,000 Schedule: (1) 2940-Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ 200,000 SEC. 116. Item 3810-005-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3810-005-6093—For support of Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 47,000 Schedule: (1) 2940-Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy ........................ 47,000 SEC. 117. Item 3810-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3810-101-6093—For local assistance, Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2945-Local Assistance Grants ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for projects that improve the climate resiliency or the protection of the Los Angeles River Watershed and are a part of the revitalization plan developed by the Upper Los Angeles River and Tributaries Working Group and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 118. Item 3810-103-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3810-103-6093—For local assistance, Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 25,000,00 Schedule: (1) 2945-Local Assistance Grants ........................ 25,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to reduce the risks of climate change impacts upon communities, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and increase public access, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 119. Item 3810-104-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3810-104-6093—For local assistance, Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 15,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2945-Local Assistance Grants ........................ 15,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for regional projects to improve local fire prevention capacity, improve forest health and resilience, and reduce the risk of wildfire spreading into populated areas from wildlands pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031. SEC. 120. Item 3810-105-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3810-105-6093—For local assistance, Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2945-Local Assistance Grants ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the Randall Preserve for work that supports the reduction of climate impacts on disadvantaged communities and vulnerable populations and the creation, protection, and expansion of outdoor recreation opportunities pursuant to Section 94020 of the Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 121. Item 3815-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3815-001-6093—For support of the Salton Sea Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,638,000 Schedule: (1) 2970-Salton Sea Conservancy ........................ 1,638,000 SEC. 122. Item 3825-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3825-001-6093—For support of San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 100,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 100,000 SEC. 123. Item 3825-003-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3825-003-6093—For support of San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 300,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 300,000 SEC. 124. Item 3825-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3825-101-6093—For local assistance, San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 500,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for projects that improve the climate resiliency or the protection of the Los Angeles River Watershed or are consistent with the Lower Los Angeles River Revitalization Plan and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 125. Item 3825-103-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3825-103-6093—For local assistance, San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to reduce the risks of climate change impacts upon communities, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and increase public access, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 126. Item 3830-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3830-001-6093—For support of San Joaquin River Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 192,000 Schedule: (1) 3050-San Joaquin River Conservancy ........................ 192,000 SEC. 127. Item 3830-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3830-101-6093—For local assistance, San Joaquin River Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 5,115,000 Schedule: (1) 3050-San Joaquin River Conservancy ........................ 5,115,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to reduce the risks of climate change impacts upon communities, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and increase public access, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 128. Item 3835-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3835-001-6093—For support of Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 3090-Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ 400,000 SEC. 129. Item 3835-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3835-101-6093—For local assistance, Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 12,460,000 Schedule: (1) 3090-Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy ........................ 12,460,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to reduce the risks of climate change impacts upon communities, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and increase public access, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 130. Item 3845-002-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3845-002-6093—For support of San Diego River Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 100,000 Schedule: (1) 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ 100,000 SEC. 131. Item 3845-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3845-102-6093—For local assistance, San Diego River Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 8,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ 8,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to reduce the risks of climate change impacts upon communities, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and increase public access, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 132. Item 3850-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3850-001-6093—For support of Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 100,000 Schedule: (1) 3180-Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy ........................ 100,000 SEC. 133. Item 3850-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3850-101-6093—For local assistance, Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,200,000 Schedule: (1) 3180-Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy ........................ 2,200,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to reduce the risks of climate change impacts upon communities, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and increase public access, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 134. Item 3855-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3855-001-6093—For support of Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 50,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 50,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the administration of regional projects to improve local fire prevention capacity, improve forest health and resilience, and reduce the risk of wildfire spreading into populated areas from wildlands pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. SEC. 135. Item 3855-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3855-101-6093—For local assistance, Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 45,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 45,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for regional projects to improve local fire prevention capacity, improve forest health and resilience, and reduce the risk of wildfire spreading into populated areas from wildlands pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031. SEC. 136. Item 3855-103-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3855-103-6093—For local assistance, Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 9,925,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 9,925,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to reduce the risks of climate change impacts upon communities, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and increase public access, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 137. Item 3860-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-001-6093—For support of the Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,156,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 2,156,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in such amounts needed to meet operational needs. SEC. 138. Item 3860-002-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-002-6093—For support of the Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in such amounts needed to meet operational needs. SEC. 139. Item 3860-003-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-003-6093—For support of the Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 9,459,000 Schedule: (1) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 9,459,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in amounts needed to meet operational needs. SEC. 140. Item 3860-004-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-004-6093—For support of the Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 375,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 375,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item are for the California Water Commission for projects under the Water Storage Investment Plan. 2. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in amounts needed to meet operational needs. SEC. 141. Item 3860-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-101-6093—For local assistance, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amounts appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 is for subsidence repair projects related to existing conveyance projects. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 142. Item 3860-102-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-102-0001—For local assistance, Department of Water Resources ........................ 4,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 4,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available for sewer line improvements in the City of Sanger. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,500,000 shall be available for resiliency improvements to the Los Angeles County Waterworks District 29 System. 3. The amounts appropriated in this item shall be available for support or local assistance. SEC. 143. Item 3860-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-102-6093—For local assistance, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 30,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 30,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item may be used for local assistance or state operations. 2. Of the amounts appropriated in this item, $28,000,000 shall be allocated for projects related to groundwater storage, groundwater banking, groundwater recharge, or instream flow projects that support the conjunctive use of groundwater and surface water supplies. 3. Of the amounts appropriated in Provision 2, $3,500,000 shall be for grants to groundwater sustainability agencies that pump less than 10,000 acre-feet annually. 4. Of the amounts in Provision 2, $6,500,000 shall be available for the Underrepresented Communities, California Tribes, and Small Farmers Groundwater Technical Assistance Program at the Department of Water Resources. 5. Of the amounts appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be allocated to the Urban Streams Restoration Program pursuant to Section 7048 of the Water Code. 6. Of the amounts appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be allocated to the Riverine Stewardship Program pursuant to Section 7049 of the Water Code. 7. The amounts appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 8. The amounts appropriated in this item may be transferred to the Water Resources Revolving Fund for direct expenditure in such amounts needed to meet operational needs. SEC. 144. Item 3860-103-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-103-6093—For local assistance, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 276,800,000 Schedule: (1) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 276,800,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $48,600,000 is for projects related to the systemwide evaluation, repair, rehabilitation, reconstruction, expansion, or replacement of levees, weirs, bypasses, and facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $228,200,000 is for the Dam Safety and Climate Resilience Local Assistance Program for competitive grants for projects that enhance dam safety and reservoir operations and protect public benefits pursuant to Section 6700 of the Water Code. 3. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 145. Item 3860-104-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-104-6093—For local assistance, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 74,063,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 74,063,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item are for the California Water Commission for projects under the Water Storage Investment Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 146. Item 3860-105-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-105-6093—For local assistance, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 117,900,000 Schedule: (1) 3245-Public Safety and Prevention of Damage ........................ 117,900,000 Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item are for projects that implement the Flood Control Subventions Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. Of the amounts appropriated in this item, $13,400,000 shall be available for the state’s share of the nonfederal share of a state and federally authorized flood control project that increase the level of flood protection for multiple counties and disadvantaged communities. SEC. 147. Item 3860-106-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-106-6093—For local assistance, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 7,785,000 Schedule: (1) 3230-Continuing Formulation of the California Water Plan ........................ 7,785,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is to improve water data management and to implement Section 144 of the Water Code to reactivate existing stream gages and deploy new gages, and is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 148. Item 3860-301-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-301-6093—For capital outlay, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 147,600,000 Schedule: (1) 0000958-Salton Sea Management Plan ........................ 147,600,000 (a) Study ........................ 5,500,000 (b) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,000 (c) Construction ........................ 141,848,000 (d) Equipment ........................ 250,000 (e) Various ........................ 1,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is to implement the Salton Sea Management Program 10-Year Plan, and any subsequent revisions to that plan, or any subsequent plans, to provide air quality, public health, and habitat benefits, and is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. Notwithstanding the subschedules identified in this item, the Department of Water Resources may use any capital outlay project delivery method within its authority for projects funded through this item. SEC. 149. Item 3860-302-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3860-302-6093—For capital outlay, Department of Water Resources, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 13,900,000 Schedule: (1) 0000743-Urban Flood Risk Reduction Program ........................ 13,900,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 300,000 (b) Construction ........................ 13,600,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for projects related to the systemwide evaluation, repair, rehabilitation, reconstruction, expansion, or replacement of levees, weirs, bypasses, and facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control, and is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 150. Item 3860-490 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3860-490—Reappropriation, Department of Water Resources. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $14,500,000 of subdivision (b) of Control Section 6.10, Budget Act of 2018 (Chs. 29 and 30, Stats. 2018), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (2) Up to $1,500,000 of Provision 2 of Schedule (1) of Item 3860-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (3) Up to $1,000,000 in Schedule (1)(d) of Item 3860-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), as reappropriated by Item 3860-491, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (4) Up to $165,000,000 in Schedule (1) of Item 3860-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), transferred by Provision 3 in Item 0540-101, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 3228—Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund (1) Item 3860-001-3228, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 3398—California Emergency Relief Fund (1) Up to $20,000,000 in Schedule (1)(a), (b), (c), and (f) of Item 3860-101-3398, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). 6083—Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Fund of 2014 (1) Item 3860-101-6083, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Control Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (2) Item 3860-301-6083, Budget Act of 2016 (Ch. 23, Stats. 2016), as reappropriated by Item 3860-490, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs, 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), as reappropriated by Control Section 20.00, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). SEC. 151. Item 3875-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3875-001-6093—For support of Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 300,000 Schedule: (1) 3350-Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ 300,000 SEC. 152. Item 3875-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3875-101-6093—For local assistance, Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 4,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3350-Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy ........................ 4,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to reduce the risks of climate change impacts upon communities, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and increase public access. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for Jersey Island acquisition, Bethel Island restoration, and the small rice farmer incentive program. 3. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 153. Item 3900-001-3237 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3900-001-3237—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 81,965,000 Schedule: (0.5) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 289,000 (1) 3510-Climate Change ........................ 81,676,000 Provisions: 1. When evaluating the efficacy, safety, and viability of CCUS technology pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 39741.1 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Air Resources Board shall prioritize technologies that are well-suited to help decrease emissions from sectors that are difficult to decarbonize, such as cement and steel production. SEC. 154. Item 3900-002-3237 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3900-002-3237—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Cost of Implementation Account, Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 5,400,000 Schedule: (1) 3510-Climate Change ........................ 5,400,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the State Air Resources Board may provide advance payment of up to 25 percent of quarterly membership costs to Western Climate Initiative, Incorporated. SEC. 155. Item 3900-101-3228 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3900-101-3228—For local assistance, State Air Resources Board, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 125,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3510-Climate Change ........................ 25,000,000 (2) 3530-Community Air Protection ........................ 100,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be available for the Clean Cars 4 All Program pursuant to Section 44124.5 of the Health and Safety Code, exclusively for districts participating in the Clean Cars 4 All Program. Of this amount, funding shall be prioritized for districts that have insufficient funds to meet processed demand. Any vehicles that are voluntarily retired pursuant to Section 44125 of the Health and Safety Code shall be model year 2004 or older. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be used as follows: (a) $50,000,000 shall be available for financial incentives to reduce mobile and stationary sources of criteria air pollutants or toxic air contaminants consistent with community emissions reduction programs developed pursuant to Section 44391.2 of the Health and Safety Code. (b) $45,000,000 shall be available to support local air districts’ implementation of Chapter 136 of the Statutes of 2017, notwithstanding any other law. (c) $5,000,000 shall be used for technical assistance grants to community-based organizations pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 44391.2 of the Health and Safety Code. These grants may be used to support community participation, including activities that enable meeting attendance, consistent with State Air Resources Board grant guidelines and agreements, in the implementation of subdivision (d) of Section 44391.2 and Section 42705.5 of the Health and Safety Code. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be subject to the provisions of Section 15.14. 4. Not more than 5 percent of the amounts appropriated in this item may be used for administrative costs of the State Air Resources Board. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2030. Funds used for the State Air Resources Board’s administrative costs shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. SEC. 156. Item 3940-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3940-001-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,604,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 2,604,000 SEC. 157. Item 3940-002-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3940-002-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 475,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 475,000 SEC. 158. Item 3940-003-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3940-003-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 3,400,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 3,400,000 SEC. 159. Item 3940-004-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3940-004-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 25,000 Schedule: (1) 3570-Water Rights ........................ 25,000 SEC. 160. Item 3940-005-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3940-005-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,100,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 1,100,000 SEC. 161. Item 3940-006-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3940-006-6093—For support of State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 400,000 SEC. 162. Item 3940-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3940-101-6093—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 180,563,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 180,563,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for grants and loans that improve water quality or help provide clean, safe, and reliable drinking water. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2033. SEC. 163. Item 3940-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3940-102-6093—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 10,680,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 10,680,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for tribal water infrastructure projects that provide safe, clean, and reliable drinking water to tribal communities. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2033. SEC. 164. Item 3940-103-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3940-103-6093—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 150,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 150,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for grants and projects related to water reuse and recycling. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2033. SEC. 165. Item 3940-104-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3940-104-6093—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 331,000 Schedule: (1) 3570-Water Rights ........................ 331,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to improve water data management. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 166. Item 3940-106-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3940-106-6093—For local assistance, State Water Resources Control Board, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 46,151,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 46,151,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for loans or grants for projects that will address water quality problems arising in the California-Mexico cross-border rivers and coastal waters. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2031. SEC. 167. Item 3960-101-0890 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3960-101-0890—For local assistance, Department of Toxic Substances Control, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3620011-Other Site Mitigation Activities ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. Upon receipt of the federal Revolving Fund Grant, the Department of Toxic Substances Control is authorized to make loans and grants as authorized under federal regulations in accordance with all applicable federal laws and guidelines. SEC. 168. Item 4140-001-0143 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4140-001-0143—For support of Department of Health Care Access and Information, payable from the California Health Data and Planning Fund ........................ 41,666,000 Schedule: (1) 3831-Health Care Quality and Affordability ........................ 565,000 (2) 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ 7,727,000 (3) 3855-Health Care Information and Quality Analysis ........................ 21,356,000 (4) 3860-Administration ........................ 12,994,000 (5) Reimbursements to 3835-Health Care Workforce ........................ −782,000 (6) Reimbursements to 3855-Health Care Information and Quality Analysis ........................ −194,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize an increase in Schedule (3) of this item to support legal services costs associated with Chapter 603 of the Statutes of 2017. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $597,000 is available to support health care data reporting related to new federal regulations promulgated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. These funds shall only be available to the extent the relevant federal regulations remain operative. 3. The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall transfer an amount not to exceed $4,900,000 to the Health Care Payments Data Fund from the California Health Data and Planning Fund in the 2025–26 fiscal year. 4. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $1,000,000 shall be available to support the department’s development of the federal Rural Health Transformation Program funding proposal. Funds shall be used to develop and carry out stakeholder engagement and outreach, collect and analyze information to support the proposal, and plan, develop, and submit the federal Rural Health Transformation Program application. (b) Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2026, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval by any division of the Department of General Services. (c) Contingent upon federal approval of the Rural Health Transformation Program application and funding awarded for this program specified in Public Law 119-21, the Director of Finance may authorize a transfer amount not to exceed $1,000,000 to the California Health Data and Planning Fund from the Federal Trust Fund in the 2025–26 fiscal year at the request of the department. SEC. 169. Item 4140-491 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4140-491—Reappropriation, Department of Health Care Access and Information. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes of the California Health and Human Services Agency entering into partnerships for the manufacturing, procurement, and distribution of generic or brand name drugs to address emerging health concerns, pursuant to Section 127697 of the Health and Safety Code. The reappropriated funds may also be used for pharmaceutical drugs and medical devices related to reproductive health care in Program 3831-Health Care Quality and Affordability. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 4140-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), up to $2,870,000 in Program 3835-Health Care Workforce. (2) Item 4140-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), up to $2,750,000 in Program 3840-Hospital Building. SEC. 170. Item 4260-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4260-001-0001—For support of State Department of Health Care Services ........................ 315,087,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 345,092,000 (2) Reimbursements to 3960-Health Care Services ........................ −30,005,000 Provisions: 1. The State Department of Health Care Services, in coordination with other state entities involved in the Medi-Cal Enterprise Systems modernization project efforts, shall provide the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Department of Technology, and the California State Auditor with annual project status updates, including newly executed contracts, their purpose, and cost. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $605,000 is to reimburse the State Department of Public Health for lease-revenue bond base rental payments associated with the State Department of Health Care Services’ occupancy in the State Department of Public Health’s Richmond Laboratory. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item to the State Department of Public Health, in the amount shown in this provision as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. 3. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $350,000 is available to support the development of a reimbursement policy manual or similar resources for Federally Qualified Health Centers in Medi-Cal. The authority to make expenditures pursuant to this provision, and any associated federal funds, shall be available without regard to fiscal year. (b) For purposes of implementing this provision, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 4. The Department of Finance may decrease this item by up to $3,908,000 if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Medicaid and Children’s Health Insurance Program Managed Care Access, Finance, and Quality Final Rule (CMS-2439-F), the Ensuring Access to Medicaid Services Final Rule (CMS-2442-F), the Streamlining Medicaid: Medicare Savings Program Eligibility Determination and Enrollment Final Rule (CMS-2421-F), or the Medicaid Program: Streamlining the Medicaid, Children’s Health Insurance Program, and Basic Health Program Application, Eligibility, Determination, Enrollment, or the Renewal Processes Final Rule (CMS-2421-F2) is rescinded or repealed. Any adjustment of this item shall be reported in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of the date the adjustment is approved. 5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $1,382,000 is allocated for project activities associated with the department’s Human Resources Plus Modernization (HR+ Modernization) project. Expenditure of these funds is contingent upon approval by the Department of Technology of the appropriate Project Approval Lifecycle documentation. 6. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,250,000 is available to support technical assistance to ensure alignment with provisions of Public Law 119-21 and for verification of citizenship and immigration status of Medi-Cal members pursuant to August 2025 federal direction or related federal direction. (b) For purposes of implementing this provision, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2026, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. (d) The Department of Finance may decrease this item by up to $2,256,000 if federal policy provisions related to Medicaid Eligibility within Public Law 119-21 are rescinded or repealed. Any adjustment of this item shall be reported in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of the date the adjustment is approved. 7. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,638,000 is available to support the State Department of Health Care Services in development of a comprehensive hospital value strategy to advance access to high-quality inpatient and outpatient hospital services, financially incentivize appropriate care delivery, and improve health outcomes for Medi-Cal beneficiaries. (b) The State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid, nonbid, or negotiated basis to support the design, implementation, and ongoing support of the hospital value strategy and state directed payments for hospitals. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2026, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. SEC. 171. Item 4260-001-0143 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 4260-001-0143—For state operations, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the California Health Data and Planning Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3960- Health Care Services ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 127280 of the Health and Safety Code, the funds appropriated in this item are available to support the State Department of Health Care Services in development of a comprehensive hospital value strategy to advance access to high-quality inpatient and outpatient hospital services, financially incentivize appropriate care delivery, and improve health outcomes for Medi-Cal beneficiaries. 2. (a) The State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid, nonbid, or negotiated basis to support the design, implementation, and ongoing support of the hospital value strategy and state directed payments for hospitals. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2026, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. SEC. 172. Item 4260-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4260-001-0890—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 612,886,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 612,886,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $605,000 is to reimburse the State Department of Public Health for lease-revenue bond base rental payments associated with the State Department of Health Care Services’ occupancy in the State Department of Public Health’s Richmond Laboratory. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item to the State Department of Public Health in the amount shown in this provision as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available for the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with stakeholders, to develop a Comprehensive Value Strategy for Skilled Nursing Facility Services, to inform the reauthorization of the Medi-Cal Long-Term Care Reimbursement Act for dates of service on or after January 1, 2027. The State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis to implement this provision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 3. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $350,000 is available to support the development of a reimbursement policy manual or similar resources for Federally Qualified Health Centers in Medi-Cal. The authority to make expenditures pursuant to this provision, and any associated federal funds, shall be available without regard to fiscal year. (b) For purposes of implementing this provision, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $1,382,000 is allocated for project activities associated with the department’s Human Resources Plus Modernization (HR+ Mod) project. Expenditure of these funds is contingent upon approval by the Department of Technology of the appropriate Project Approval Lifecycle documentation. 5. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,250,000 is available to support technical assistance to ensure alignment with provisions of Public Law 119-21 and for verification of citizenship and immigration status of Medi-Cal members pursuant to August 2025 federal direction or related federal direction. (b) For purposes of implementing this provision, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2026, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. (d) The Department of Finance may decrease this item by up to $2,256,000 if federal policy provisions related to Medicaid Eligibility within Public Law 119-21 are rescinded or repealed. Any adjustment of this item shall be reported in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of the date the adjustment is approved. 6. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $5,638,000 is available to support the State Department of Health Care Services in development of a comprehensive hospital value strategy to advance access to high-quality inpatient and outpatient hospital services, financially incentivize appropriate care delivery, and improve health outcomes for Medi-Cal beneficiaries. (b) The State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid, nonbid, or negotiated basis to support the design, implementation, and ongoing support of the hospital value strategy and state directed payments for hospitals. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2026, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. SEC. 173. Item 4260-001-3213 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4260-001-3213—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Long-Term Care Quality Assurance Fund ........................ 4,196,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 4,196,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available for the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with stakeholders, to develop a Comprehensive Value Strategy for Skilled Nursing Facility Services, to inform the reauthorization of the Medi-Cal Long-Term Care Reimbursement Act for dates of service on or after January 1, 2027. The State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis to implement this provision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 2. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,247,000 shall be available to support healthcare data reporting related to new federal regulations promulgated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, including the Minimum Staffing Standards for Long-Term Care Facilities and Medicaid Institutional Payment Transparency Reporting Final Rule. These funds shall only be available to the extent the relevant federal regulations remain operative. (b) Of the amount appropriated in Provision 2(a), $500,000 are contract resources to be used to support the implementation of necessary system changes. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision, through June 30, 2026, shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. SEC. 174. Item 4260-001-3362 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4260-001-3362—For support of State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the PACE Oversight Fund of the State Department of Health Care Services ........................ 748,000 Schedule: (1) 3960-Health Care Services ........................ 748,000 Provisions: 1. To effectively administer the Medi-Cal program, the Department of Finance may decrease or increase this item to conform the appropriation to revised revenue estimates pursuant to Section 14592 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. SEC. 175. Item 4260-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4260-101-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, California Medical Assistance Program, payable from the Health Care Deposit Fund after transfer from the General Fund ........................ 44,054,804,000 Schedule: (1) 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ 1,351,167,000 (2) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 45,747,773,000 (3) Reimbursements to 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ −49,311,000 (4) Reimbursements to 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ −2,994,825,000 Provisions: 1. The aggregate principal amount of disproportionate share hospital general obligation debt that may be issued in the current fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 14085.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be $0. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, both the federal and nonfederal shares of any moneys recovered for previously paid health care services, provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, are hereby appropriated and shall be expended as soon as practicable for medical care and services as defined in the Welfare and Institutions Code. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, accounts receivable for recoveries as described in Provision 2 shall have no effect upon the positive balance of the General Fund or the Health Care Deposit Fund. Notwithstanding any other law, moneys recovered as described in this item that are required to be transferred from the Health Care Deposit Fund to the General Fund shall be credited by the Controller to the General Fund without regard to the appropriation from which it was drawn. 4. Without regard to fiscal year, the General Fund shall make one or more loans available not to exceed a cumulative total of $1,000,000,000 to be transferred as needed to the Health Care Deposit Fund to meet cash needs. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid as soon as sufficient revenue or reimbursements have been collected to meet immediate cash needs and in installments as revenue or reimbursements accumulate if the loan is outstanding for more than one year. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Health Care Services may give public notice relative to proposing or amending any rule or regulation or administrative directive that could result in increased costs in the Medi-Cal program only after approval by the Department of Finance. Additionally, any rule or regulation adopted by the State Department of Health Care Services and any communication that increases costs in the Medi-Cal program shall be effective only after the date upon which it is approved by the Department of Finance. 6. Change orders to the medical or the dental fiscal intermediary contract for amounts exceeding a total cost of $250,000 shall be approved by the Department of Finance not sooner than 30 days after written notification of the change order is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal and policy committees in each house of the Legislature and to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification as the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. The semiannual estimates of Medi-Cal expenditures provided to the Legislature in January and May may constitute the notification required by this provision. 7. Recoveries of advances made to counties in prior years pursuant to Section 14153 of the Welfare and Institutions Code are reappropriated to the Health Care Deposit Fund for reimbursement of those counties where allowable costs exceeded the amounts advanced. Recoveries in excess of the amounts required to fully reimburse allowable costs shall be transferred to the General Fund. When a projected deficiency exists in the California Medical Assistance Program, these funds, subject to notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, are appropriated and shall be expended as soon as practicable for the state’s share of payments for medical care and services and county and other local assistance administration. 8. The Department of Finance may transfer funds representing all or any portion of any estimated savings that are a result of improvements in the Medi-Cal claims processing procedures from the Medi-Cal services budget or the support budget of the State Department of Health Care Services (Item 4260-001-0001) to the fiscal intermediary budget item for purposes of making improvements to the Medi-Cal claims system. 9. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between schedules within this item and between this item and Items 4260-102-0001, 4260-111-0001, 4260-114-0001, and 4260-117-0001 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance may revise reimbursement authority in this item in order to effectively administer the programs funded in those items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or for which funds are being reduced. 10. If a federal grant that provides 75 percent federal financial participation to allow individuals in nursing homes to voluntarily move into a community setting and still receive the same amount of funding for services is awarded to the State Department of Health Care Services during the current fiscal year, then, notwithstanding any other law, the department may count expenditures from the appropriation made to this item as state matching funds for that grant. 11. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize an increase to this appropriation to address costs resulting from adverse court rulings. The Department of Finance shall provide a 30-day notice of any proposed increase to the Legislature. The notification shall include the specifics of any cases with adverse rulings and the overall fiscal impact. Submission of the semiannual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature in January and May shall be considered meeting the notification requirement of this provision if the required information is included in the estimate. 12. To the extent practicable and consistent with existing procedures, the State Department of Health Care Services, in its sole discretion, shall seek favorable terms from the federal government regarding the repayment of federal funds for state-only populations in order to minimize the annual impact on the General Fund in any individual fiscal year. 16. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may adjust amounts in this item, Item 4260-111-0001, or any other related item resulting from the State Department of Health Care Services obtaining federal approval to claim federal financial participation for expenditures associated with Designated State Health Programs as part of the CalAIM Demonstration. Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Department of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Submission of the semiannual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature in January and May shall be considered meeting the reporting requirement of this provision if the required information is included in the estimate. 17. (a) The nonfederal share amounts received by the department as monetary sanctions collected in the 2024–25 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 14197.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (q) of Section 14197.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, be deposited into the General Fund. (b) This item shall be augmented by the amount deposited into the General Fund pursuant to subprovision (a), which shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026, for the department to award grants to qualifying, nonprofit legal aid programs and organizations that serve Medi-Cal managed care enrollees in the County of Los Angeles or other impacted counties, as necessary. (c) The department shall determine the eligibility criteria, methodology, and distribution of funds appropriated in this provision. (d) The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis for purposes of implementing this provision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and from the State Administrative and State Contracting manuals, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 19. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $10,000,000 is available for the Hearing Aid Coverage for Children Program for the purpose of providing medically necessary hearing aids and related services to eligible persons as described in subprovision (b). (b) A person is eligible for the program described in this provision if they meet all of the following criteria: (1) (A) The person is under 18 years of age; or (B) effective January 1, 2023, the person is under 21 years of age. (2) The person’s household income does not exceed 600 percent of the federal poverty level. (3) The person is not eligible for the Medi-Cal program or the California Children’s Services Program. (4) The person does not have health insurance coverage for hearing aids. (c) For purposes of paragraph (4) of subprovision (b), a person is deemed to have no health insurance coverage if any of the following apply: (1) The person has no health insurance coverage. (2) The person has health insurance coverage that excludes coverage for hearing aids. (3) Effective January 1, 2023, the person has health insurance coverage that has a coverage limit of $1,500 or less for hearing aids. (d) The State Department of Health Care Services shall specify the benefits and services provided to eligible persons under the program described in this provision. This shall include hearing aids, including bone conduction devices, when medically necessary. (e) The State Department of Health Care Services shall develop processes to ensure, to the extent practicable, health insurance coverage for hearing aids and related services covered pursuant to this provision is used before the Hearing Aid Coverage for Children Program is billed. (f) The State Department of Health Care Services may contract with public and private entities in order to implement this provision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14600) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the State Department of General Services. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletin or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. 20. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (2), $12,130,000 is available for encumbrance or expenditure for the State Department of Health Care Services to support the urgent needs and emergent issues of children and youth, including wellbeing and mindfulness programs, peer-to-peer programs, and the development of a video series to provide parents with resources and skills to support their children’s mental health and to develop next generation digital supports for remote mental health assessment and intervention as a component of the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative. 21. (a) The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid, non-bid, or negotiated basis with a drug rebate aggregator or another entity that provides rebate aggregation services to consolidate and manage drug rebate negotiation, invoicing, collection, dispute resolution, and other related activities with manufacturers, distributors, dispensers, or suppliers of single-source and multiple source drugs, appliances, durable medical equipment, medical supplies, and other product type health care services. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual and the State Administrative Manual and shall be exempt the from review or approval of any division of the State Department of General Services. (b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. 22. Notwithstanding Section 16531.1 of the Government Code, the General Fund cash loans made to the Medical Providers Interim Payment Fund in fiscal years 2024–25 and 2025–26 are available over the 2024–25 and 2025–26 fiscal years for programs funded within this item. No later than June 30, 2034, an allocation from the General Fund shall be made to recognize for budgetary financial reporting the cost of the loans made to the Medical Providers Interim Payment Fund in the 2024–25 and 2025–26 fiscal years. The Director of Finance may order the repayment of all or a portion of the loans sooner if the Department of Finance, in consultation with the Department of Health Care Services, determines that the funds appropriated in this item exceed the required costs for programs funded within the item. 24. (a) Of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (2), $15,000,000 shall be made available for Title X family planning funding to maintain and support the delivery of equitable, affordable, high quality, client-centered family planning services to eligible patients with low-incomes across the state. (b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall receive and provide the funds to Essential Access Health, the designated statewide federal Title X grantee, no later than September 30, 2025. (c) Funding provided to Essential Access Health may be used for the following purposes: (1) Funding administration and distribution to current members of the 2024–25 statewide federal Title X provider network to prevent any disruption in the delivery of family planning and related services during the 2025–2026 state fiscal year. (2) Technical assistance, training, and other capacity-building support for subrecipients to ensure quality of care. (3) Provider network meetings. (4) Linking community members to family planning services provided by subrecipients. (5) Data collection and evaluation. (6) Drafting and submission of a final report under subprovision (d). (d) Essential Access Health shall prepare and submit a report of expenditures, numbers of patient served, and other information that aligns with Title X Family Planning Annual Report requirements and guidelines, to the State Department of Health Care Services no later than September 30, 2026. (e) The State Department of Health Care Services shall submit the report to the Legislature no later than October 1, 2026. (f) Eighty-five percent of funding shall be distributed to current members of the 2024–25 statewide Title X provider network that includes federally qualified health centers, city and county health departments, Urban Indian Health Centers, universities, hospitals, Planned Parenthood affiliates, and other stand-alone family planning and women’s health centers, and to fund activities to support subrecipients and patient access outlined in (c) 2- 4. (g) Fifteen percent of funds allocated may be used by Essential Access Health to cover administrative costs related to completing activities consistent with this provision. 25. The Legislature finds that the total funds appropriated in this item exceeds the amount of General Fund revenue appropriated to support the Medi-Cal program prior to the effective date of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code (Proposition 35). The Legislature further finds that, for purposes of Proposition 35, increases in Medi-Cal base managed care capitation rates reflect an expansion of healthcare benefits, healthcare services, healthcare workforce, and payment rates above and beyond those already in effect or in existence as of January 1, 2024, and are in addition to existing reimbursement rates and any other payments made by the department as of January 1, 2024, and do not supplant amounts that would otherwise be payable by a Medi-Cal managed care plan or the department, as applicable, to a recipient of moneys provided by Article 4 (commencing with Section 141900.109) of Chapter 7.5 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 26. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), a one-time $50,000,000 allocation shall be available for the Department of Health Care Services (DHCS) to provide non-competitive grants to county behavioral health departments to support the implementation of Proposition 36 (2024). (b) Grants shall be provided to counties according to an allocation methodology determined by DHCS, in consultation with the Judicial Council. (c) Counties shall spend at least 50 percent of the funds allocated pursuant to this provision to support planning and capacity building activities to expand and accelerate services, including, but not limited to, capital for housing and treatment, including recovery housing; hiring, training, and development of policies and procedures; support for information technology infrastructure costs, including, but not limited to, changes needed to electronic medical record systems; and changes needed for reporting data, and case tracking. No matching funds are required for any portion of a county’s allocation that is expended solely on planning and capacity building activities. (d) Any portion of a county’s allocation expended on behavioral health treatment services shall be matched by a 25 percent match from local funding sources. County behavioral health departments must maximize federal reimbursements for eligible services, in collaboration with the courts and other partners. Funding allocated under this provision may not be used to pay for services that are covered by an individual’s commercial insurance coverage. These provisions are not intended to replace or relieve current county funding obligations required to draw down federal matching funds for Medi-Cal covered services. (e) Funding spent on services pursuant to subprovision (d) may be used to cover costs associated with Proposition 36 (2024) that are not Medi-Cal reimbursable, including workload and behavioral health evaluations related to court proceedings and treatment not covered by Medi-Cal, or private commercial insurance. (f) As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this provision, county behavioral health departments shall provide data and outcomes, including, but not limited to, information on how funds were expended and the number of people served, in a manner determined by DHCS, in consultation with the Judicial Council. DHCS shall coordinate with the Judicial Council to ensure that the data is collected and reported necessary for the Judicial Council to comply with the reporting requirement in Provision 20 of Item 0250-101-0001. (g) Up to 5 percent of this funding may be retained by DHCS for administering this funding. (h) The funding allocated in this provision shall be available for expenditure or encumbrance until June 30, 2028. (i) In providing the funding allocated in this provision, it is the intent of the Legislature to help offset county responsibilities related to the initial implementation of Proposition 36 (2024). (j) For purposes of implementing this section, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, and make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, information notices, or similar instructions. 27. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,000,000 is available for encumbrance or expenditure for the State Department of Health Care Services to support the urgent needs and emergent issues of children and youth, including the promotion and enhancement of next generation digital support tools for mental health as a component of the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative, as well as the development of single-session interventions and tools to support children, youth and families affected by wildfires. 28. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,000,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to Equality California. (a) Of the amount allocated in this provision, $1,250,000 shall be available to support the healthcare of transgender individuals and families. (b) Of the amount allocated in this provision, $750,000 shall be available to support health access and education. 29. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $300,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to the El Centro de Amistad for infrastructure. 30. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $5,000,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to the County of Humboldt for support of the Mad River Behavioral Health Triage Center. 31. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $750,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to the County of Humboldt for support of the Sorrel Leaf Healing Center. 32. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,500,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to the County of Sonoma for the Alexander Valley Healthcare Center Project. 33. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,000,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to the City and County of San Francisco for the new oncology clinic and chemotherapy center for Chinese Hospital. SEC. 176. Item 4260-101-3451 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4260-101-3451—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Behavioral Health Schoolsite Fee Schedule Administration Fund. ........................ 69,300,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 69,300,000 SEC. 177. Item 4265-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4265-001-0001—For support of State Department of Public Health ........................ 396,043,000 Schedule: (1) 4040-Public Health Emergency Preparedness ........................ 17,036,000 (2) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 601,817,000 (3) 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ 28,250,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 101,555,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −101,555,000 (6) Reimbursements to 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ −235,412,000 (7) Reimbursements to 4050-Licensing and Certification ........................ −15,648,000 Provisions: 1. Except as otherwise prohibited by law, the State Department of Public Health shall promulgate emergency regulations to adjust the public health fees set by regulation to an amount such that, if the new fees were effective throughout the 2025–26 fiscal year, the estimated revenues would be sufficient to offset at least 95 percent of the approved program level intended to be supported by those fees. The General Fund fees of the department that are subject to the annual fee adjustment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 100425 of the Health and Safety Code shall be increased by 20.3 percent. The special fund fees of the department that are subject to the annual fee adjustment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 100425 of the Health and Safety Code may be increased by 20.3 percent only if the fund condition statement for a fund projects a reserve less than 10 percent of estimated expenditures and the revenues projected for the 2024–25 fiscal year are less than the appropriation contained in this act. 2. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 100450 of the Health and Safety Code, departmental fees that are subject to the annual fee adjustment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 100450 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be increased for the 2025–26 fiscal year. This adjustment shall not be applied to fees established by subdivisions(g), (h), (n) and (t) of Section 1300 of the Business and Professions Code. 3. The State Department of Public Health shall limit expenditures in this item to implement the Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7150) of Part 1 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code) to the amount of actual fees collected from tissue banks. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, and upon approval of the Director of Finance, the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be increased to adjust for federal reimbursement from the Federal Emergency Management Agency for wildfires and related emergencies. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing an augmentation pursuant to this provision. The notification to the Legislature shall describe the reason for the augmentation. 5. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $370,000 shall be available to support a Public Health Workforce Development and Engagement Program aimed at supporting worker upskilling to improve retention of the public health workforce and help incumbent workers develop their skills to meet future public health demands. The State Department of Public Health may use up to $160,000 of the funding in this provision to administer the program. (b) (1) “Eligible employee” means a full or part-time employee within a local health department who has been employed by that entity for a minimum of one year. (2) “Eligible educational pursuits” includes any of the following: (A) educational programs at regionally accredited institutions in the public health field, such as nursing, microbiology, public health, public administration, epidemiology, lab science, and community health; (B) industry-recognized training programs related to the public health field; (C) continuing education units required to maintain an individual’s license or certification; or (D) earn and learn programs, as defined in subdivision (q) of Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, in the public health field. (c) The State Department of Public Health shall use funds to award grants to local health departments for education and training opportunities for incumbent employees within the governmental public health workforce. Eligible uses of funding shall include any of the following: (1) Providing stipends to eligible employees to offset the loss of compensation for up to 12 hours per workweek for eligible educational pursuits. Stipends shall be up to $600 per week per eligible employee for up to 12 weeks per year. (2) Hiring additional employees to support the goals of the program, such as covering employees while they participate in eligible educational pursuits. (3) Reimbursement for educational costs for eligible employees, such as tuition, registration fees, or other related educational expenses when participating in eligible educational pursuits. (d) The State Department of Public Health shall solicit applications from local health departments to participate in the program. (e) Applications shall include all of the following: (1) the proposed use of the funds; (2) the total amount requested; and (3) any other information required by the department for the purpose of implementing this program. (f) No later than July 1, 2026, the State Department of Public Health shall, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, submit to the Legislature a report regarding the uses and outcomes of funds appropriated for the program. The report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information: (1) the amount of funding provided to local health departments; (2) the total number of applicants that apply for funding; (3) the number of individuals participating in eligible educational pursuits; (4) a summary of the types of credentials and skills attained through the program; (5) the number of workers hired to cover for employees attaining educational opportunities; and (6) an evaluation of the effectiveness of the program. 14. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $13,700,000 shall be available for the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision are exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Administrative Manual, and the State Contracting Manual, and are further exempt from the review or approval of the Department of General Services, including as specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 15. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,196,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, for the State Department of Public Health to develop an online accreditation and certification application system. (a) Up to $1,760,000 of these funds shall be available for the System Integrator Solution upon approval of Project Approval Lifecycle project documents by the Department of Technology. 16. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $4,000,000 shall be available to support enhanced public health functions. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 178. Item 4265-001-8141 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4265-001-8141—For support of State Department of Public Health, payable from the Electronic Cigarette Settlements Fund ........................ 6,960,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 6,960,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, to support media and outreach campaigns, research, surveys, focus groups, and other targeted outreach involving youth and young adults, training and technical assistance, and special projects related to awareness of the harms of vaping, vaping cessation, and tobacco addiction intervention. SEC. 179. Item 4265-111-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4265-111-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health ........................ 350,094,000 Schedule: (1) 4040-Public Health Emergency Preparedness ........................ 4,960,000 (2) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 696,965,000 (3) Reimbursements to 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ −351,831,000 Provisions: 1. The Office of AIDS in the State Department of Public Health, in allocating and processing contracts and grants, shall comply with the same requirements that are established for contracts and grants for other public health programs. Notwithstanding any other law, the contracts or grants administered by the Office of AIDS shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and shall not require approval by the Department of General Services prior to their execution. 2. The appropriation in this item for the California Alzheimer’s Research Centers shall be used for direct services, including, but not limited to, diagnostic screening, case management, disease management, support for caregivers, and related services necessary for positive client outcomes. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,500,000 shall be available to the ALS Network, to provide a wraparound model of care for individuals diagnosed with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis and their caregivers. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,000,000 shall be available to Kern County for valley fever testing, soil health protection programs and support services. SEC. 180. Item 4265-111-8141 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4265-111-8141—For local assistance, State Department of Public Health, payable from the Electronic Cigarette Settlements Fund ........................ 820,000 Schedule: (1) 4045-Public and Environmental Health ........................ 820,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, to support local tobacco and vaping cessation activities. SEC. 181. Item 4265-490 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4265-490—Reappropriation, Department of Public Health. All remaining amounts in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes specified below and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—​General Fund (2) Provision 4 of Item 4265-001-0001, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), for activities that address lesbian, bisexual, and queer women’s health disparities. (3) Provision 4 of Item 4265-111-0001, Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019), for activities that address lesbian, bisexual, and queer women’s health disparities. (4) Provision 21 of Item 4265-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), to support the Increased Capacity, Training, and Care for LGBTQ+ Foster Youth. (5) Provision 14 of Item 4265-111-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), to support the Increased Capacity, Training, and Care for LGBTQ+ Foster Youth. (6) Provision 16 of Item 4265-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), to promote awareness of reproductive health rights and services and research into disparities in reproductive health access. (7) Provision 9 of Item 4265-111-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), to support grants to community-based organizations to provide comprehensive reproductive health and sexual health education. SEC. 182. Item 4440-011-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4440-011-0001—For support of State Department of State Hospitals ........................ 2,886,028,000 Schedule: (1) 4400-Administration ........................ 275,007,000 (2) 4410-State Hospitals ........................ 2,076,329,000 (3) 4420-Conditional Release Program ........................ 92,942,000 (4) 4430-Contracted Patient Services ........................ 575,842,000 (5) 4450-Evaluation and Forensic Services ........................ 44,635,000 (6) Reimbursements to 4400-Administration ........................ −250,000 (7) Reimbursements to 4410-State Hospitals ........................ −178,477,000 Provisions: 1. The reimbursements shall include amounts received in Schedule (7) by the State Department of State Hospitals as a result of billing state hospital bed day expenditures attributable to conservatees who are gravely disabled as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code (Murphy Conservatee). 2. The Controller shall transfer the total amount attributable in the 2025–26 fiscal year to patient-generated collections as revenue to the General Fund. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated to accommodate projected hospital population levels in excess of those that actually materialize, if any, shall revert to the General Fund. However, the Department of Finance may approve an increase in expenditures that are not related to caseload for the state hospitals through the redirection of funding that is reasonably believed not to be needed for accommodating projected hospital population levels if the approval is made in writing and filed with the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees of each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval, or prior to whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. All notifications shall include (a) the reason for the proposed redirection of caseload funding to expenditures that are not related to caseload, (b) the approved amount, and (c) the basis of the Director of Finance’s determination that the funding is not needed for accommodating projected hospital population levels. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, and until the 2025–26 fiscal year, $250,000 shall be used for candidates participating in psychiatric technician assistant 20/20 training programs, subject to the terms and conditions in the Memorandum of Understanding with Bargaining Unit 18 that were agreed upon on June 16, 2010, and renewed on July 1, 2022. 5. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be used to provide community services as provided in Section 4360 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. These funds shall support direct community services, as well as administrative and ancillary services related to the provision of direct services. 6. The State Department of State Hospitals shall provide forensic conditional release services mandated either in Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2 of the Penal Code or in Article 4 (commencing with Section 2960) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, through contracts with programs which integrate the supervision and treatment roles and providers selected consistent with Section 1615 of the Penal Code. 7. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), it is intended that funds shall not be available for the payment of treatment services to persons on court visit from state hospitals to the community as designated in subdivision (a) of Section 4117 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 8. Upon approval of the State Department of State Hospitals, a portion of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available to reimburse counties for the cost of treatment and legal services to patients in the five state hospitals, pursuant to Section 4117 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Expenditures made under this item shall be charged to either the fiscal year in which the claim is received or the fiscal year in which the Controller issues the warrant. Claims filed by local jurisdictions for legal services may be scheduled by the Controller for payment. 9. The Director of State Hospitals shall submit, as part of the annual Governor’s Budget and May Revision estimate, each institution’s expenditures for its approved allotments. If any institution’s expenditures are trending above the allotments provided to it, the Director of State Hospitals shall detail the reasons why the institution is spending at a level above its allotments and list the actions the State Department of State Hospitals is undertaking in order to align expenditures with approved allotments. The report shall contain a yearend summary and an operating budget for each of the institutions under the control of the department. Specifically, the report shall include all of the following: (a) The year-end expenditures by line-item detail for each institution. (b) The budgeted amounts for each institution in the past year, current year, and budget year, and past year actual, projected current, and budget year expenditures for each institution including staffing, overtime, benefits, registry, and operating expenses. (c) The number of authorized and vacant positions for each institution. (d) The number of authorized and vacant positions for each institution specific to: (1) psychiatric technicians, (2) nurses, (3) physicians, (4) psychiatrists, (5) social workers, and (6) rehabilitation therapists. (e) The number of positions in the temporary help blanket for each institution. 10. The State Department of State Hospitals shall provide a status update on the recruitment and retention of hospital police officers, to be included in the department’s 2026–27 Governor’s Budget estimate and subsequent May Revision estimate. The update shall include the number of authorized and vacant positions for each hospital, the actual attrition rate for the 2025–26 fiscal year, the projected attrition rate for the 2026–27 fiscal year, and the rate of success pertaining to the number of hospital police officer cadet graduates of the OPS Police Academy. 11. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $11,565,000 shall be expended for ligature risk special repair projects at Atascadero, Metropolitan, Napa, and Patton State Hospitals. The amount allocated shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 12. Contracts entered into or amended from funding included in this item to address the Incompetent to Stand Trial waitlist are exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 13. It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent possible, the Department of State Hospitals hire civil service psychiatric and mental health staff rather than utilizing contractors. It is also the intent of the Legislature that any cost savings realized from using fewer contractors should be prioritized towards hiring civil service employees or recruitment and retention efforts, as needed. 14. (a) The State Department of State Hospitals may enter into agreements with educational institutions and hospitals for the purpose of providing clinical training and educational opportunities related to providing care to patients. The training may take the form of, but not be limited, to rotations, residencies, fellowships, internships, or externships at a state-operated hospital, as described in Section 4100 of Welfare and Institutions Code, or internships for the State Department of State Hospital’s employees and interns to receive clinical training and educational opportunities at a hospital or clinical program. (b) These agreements shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Section 18670 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services 15. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for the costs associated with an updated project schedule and negotiated vendor costs for the Electronic Health Record Continuum Project, upon notification from the State Department of State Hospitals. Any such increase shall be authorized not less than 30 days following written notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or a lesser period if requested by the department and approved by the chairperson or the chairperson's designee. SEC. 183. Item 4700-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 4700-001-6093—For support of Department of Community Services and Development, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildlife Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 230,000 Schedule: (1) 4181–Energy Programs ........................ 230,000 SEC. 184. Item 4800-101-3381 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4800-101-3381—For local assistance, California Health Benefit Exchange, payable from the Health Care Affordability Reserve Fund ........................ 207,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4202-State Subsidy Program ........................ 192,000,000 (2) 4203-Gender Affirming Care Program ........................ 15,000,000 Provisions: 1. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $2,000,000 is available to support health care coverage for striking workers, pursuant to Chapter 695 of the Statutes of 2022. (b) Upon notification from the California Health Benefit Exchange that the program to support health care for striking workers will exceed the appropriation referenced in subprovision (a), the Department of Finance shall authorize one or more increases in this appropriation totaling up to $3,000,000 to pay for health care coverage for striking workers pursuant to Chapter 695 of the Statutes of 2022. The authorizations shall be contingent upon sufficient funding in the Health Care Affordability Reserve Fund, and subject to revenue availability, pursuant to Section 61035 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The Department of Finance shall provide notification in writing of the necessity and amount of each of the augmentations to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than 10 days prior to the effective date of each of the augmentations. The Department of Finance shall also provide notification in writing when the funding authorized in this item has been fully spent. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $190,000,000 is available to support a program of financial assistance, which may include premium subsidies, for coverage year 2026. 3. The amount appropriated in this item shall also provide any retroactive premium assistance subsidies owed to qualified health plan issuers under Item 4800-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2019 (Chs. 23 and 55, Stats. 2019) and Item 4800-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020) due to eligibility and enrollment reconciliations. 4. Pursuant to and consistent with the enabling 2024 Budget Act agreement (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), the Department of Finance may transfer $109,000,000 from idle resources within the Health Care Affordability Reserve Fund to the General Fund as a budgetary loan during the 2025–26 fiscal year. 5. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $15,000,000 shall support the Gender Affirming Care Program, pursuant to Section 100503.6 of the Government Code. (b) The Director of Finance may authorize an increase in this appropriation to pay for gender affirming care benefits deemed in addition to essential health benefits for the 2026 coverage year pursuant to Section 100503.6 of the Government Code. Any augmentation under this provision shall be authorized no sooner than 10 days after notification in writing of the necessity thereof to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after notification the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. (c) Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated for the 2026 coverage year pursuant to this item may be encumbered until December 31, 2027. SEC. 185. Item 5180-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5180-001-0001—For support of State Department of Social Services ........................ 368,850,000 Schedule: (1) 4270-Welfare Programs ........................ 87,727,000 (2) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 282,434,000 (3) 4285-Disability Evaluation and Other Services ........................ 67,477,000 (4) Reimbursements to 4270-Welfare Programs ........................ −2,668,000 (5) Reimbursements to 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ −29,693,000 (6) Reimbursements to 4285-Disability Evaluation and Other Services ........................ −36,427,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds from Schedule (2) of this item to Schedule (1), Program 4275019, of Item 5180-151-0001, Children and Adult Services and Licensing, in order to allow counties to perform the facilities evaluation function. 2. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds from Schedule (2) of this item to Schedule (1), Program 4275019, of Item 5180-151-0001, Children and Adult Services and Licensing, in order to allow counties to perform the adoptions program function. 3. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item that have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 4. Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1778 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Department of Social Services may use no more than 20 percent of the fees collected pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1770) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code for overhead costs, facilities operation, and indirect department costs. 5. Upon request of the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services, the Director of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts from Item 4260-101-0001, State Department of Health Care Services, to this item to fund the cost of the administrative hearing process associated with changes in aid or service payments in the Medi-Cal program. The Department of Finance shall report to the Legislature the amount to be transferred pursuant to this provision. The transfer shall be authorized at the time the report is made. 6. Provision 1 of Items 5180-001-0270 and 5180-001-0279 also applies to this item. 7. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure and position authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services: Items 6100-001-0001, 5180-001-0001, and reimbursements. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $6,000,000 shall be available for this purpose upon approval of the Department of Finance. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this item during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. This provision supports the continuity of care in the programs transitioned from the State Department of Education to the State Department of Social Services. 8. The State Department of Social Services may contract with a vendor to provide direct deposit to childcare contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall allow for advance payment. The department is hereby authorized to provide advance payment in order to implement direct deposit to childcare contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of this provision, the State Department of Social Services is exempt from the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code. 9. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in this item, upon notification from the State Department of Social Services, to cover costs associated with increased fair hearing requests due to Medi-Cal redeterminations. 10. For the funds appropriated in this item for Child and Family Services Acute Review and Response, the State Department of Social Services shall report annually on January 10 to the policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on key metrics, including, but not limited to, shelter stays for children under six years of age and overstays for youth at short-term residential therapeutic program placements. 11. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item up to $250,000 to comply with the federal Able-Bodied Adult Without Dependents (ABAWD) rule. 12 Upon approval of the Department of Finance, Schedule (1) may be augmented to continue the contract to provide direct deposit payments with vendors until the FI$Cal EFT system is fully integrated into the State Department of Social Services’ accounting and payment business practices. The State Department of Social Services is hereby authorized to provide advance payment in order to implement direct deposit to childcare contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall allow for advance payment. The department is hereby authorized to provide advance payment in order to implement direct deposit to childcare contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of this provision, the State Department of Social Services is exempt from the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code. 13. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Plan for Operations and Management and the Implementation Advance Planning Document Update by the United States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service, the Department of Finance may augment this item for costs associated with the implementation and administration of the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1762, also known as SUN Bucks, no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 14. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $14,784,000 is allocated for project activities associated with the Facility Management System project. The expenditure of funds is contingent upon project approval by the Department of Technology. Expenditures shall be in alignment with approved project documents. 15. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $200,000 shall be allocated for the purposes of developing a strategic plan for how the State Department of Social Services’ methodology and outreach strategies will be implemented and executed to maximize benefits to those eligible for CalFresh benefits, pursuant to the requirements of Section 18901.58 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. SEC. 186. Item 5180-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5180-001-0890—For support of State Department of Social Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 628,121,000 Schedule: (1) 4270-Welfare Programs ........................ 159,350,000 (2) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 147,782,000 (3) 4285-Disability Evaluation and Other Services ........................ 320,989,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of federal funds from this item to Item 5180-151-0890 in order to allow counties to perform the adoption program functions and the facilities evaluation function in the Community Care Licensing Division of the State Department of Social Services. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure and position authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services: Items 6100-001-0890, 5180-001-0890, and reimbursements. The aggregate amount of appropriation increases provided under this section during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of appropriation decreases. This provision supports the continuity of care in the programs transitioned from the State Department of Education to the State Department of Social Services. 3. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure and position authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services: Items 6100-001-0890, 5180-001-0890, and reimbursements. The aggregate amount of appropriation increases provided under this provision during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of appropriation decreases. This provision supports the administration and implementation of the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, the allocation of these funds by the State Department of Social Services shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the review or approval of the Department of General Services. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, upon selection of the State of California, the Department of Finance may augment this item in Schedule (1) for future annual expenditure authority to expend funding awarded through the Preschool Development Grant, no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 5. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item by up to $250,000 to comply with the federal able-bodied adults without dependents (ABAWD) time limit specified in Section 273.24 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $186,000 is available for administrative costs related to the Elder Justice Award, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 7. Provision 15 of Item 5180-001-0001 also applies to this item. SEC. 187. Item 5180-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5180-101-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services ........................ 6,814,190,000 Schedule: (1) 4270010-CalWORKs ........................ 1,529,922,000 (2) 4270019-Other Assistance Payments ........................ 963,151,000 (3) 4270020-Child Care ........................ 4,361,317,000 (4) Reimbursements to 4270010-CalWORKs ........................ 0 (5) Reimbursements to 4270019-Other Assistance Payments ........................ −40,200,000 Provisions: 1. (a) Funds appropriated in this item shall not be encumbered unless every rule or regulation adopted and every all-county letter issued by the State Department of Social Services that adds to the costs of any program is approved by the Department of Finance as to the availability of funds before it becomes effective. In making the determination as to availability of funds to meet the expenditures of a rule, regulation, or all-county letter that would increase the costs of a program, the Department of Finance shall consider the amount of the proposed increase on an annualized basis, the effect the change would have on the expenditure limitations for the program set forth in this act, the extent to which the rule, regulation, or all-county letter constitutes a deviation from the premises under which the expenditure limitations were prepared, and any additional factors relating to the fiscal integrity of the program or the state’s fiscal situation. (b) Notwithstanding Sections 28.00 and 28.50, the availability of funds contained in this item for rules, regulations, or all-county letters that add to program costs funded from the General Fund in excess of $500,000 on an annual basis, including those that are the result of a federal regulation, but excluding those that are (1) specifically required as a result of the enactment of a federal or state law or (2) included in the appropriation made by this act, shall not be approved by the Department of Finance sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or sooner than such lesser time after notification as the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 2. Notwithstanding Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, a loan not to exceed $500,000,000 shall be made available from the General Fund, from funds not otherwise appropriated, to: (a) cover the costs of a program or programs when the federal funds have not been received or funds in any subaccount within the Local Revenue Fund have not been deposited prior to the usual time for the state to transmit payment to the counties or (b) ensure cash disbursement needs in this item are met when abatements have not yet posted in time for disbursement. For this purpose, the Department of Finance may authorize an augmentation to this item to ensure cash disbursement requirements are met. This loan from the General Fund shall be repaid when the federal funds or the funds for any subaccounts within the Local Revenue Fund for the program or programs becomes available. 3. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0001 in order to fund the costs of the administrative hearing process associated with the CalWORKs program. 4. (a) The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures in those amounts made necessary by changes in either caseload or payments, including, but not limited to, the timing of federal payments, or any rule or regulation adopted and any all-county letter issued as a result of the enactment of a federal or state law, the adoption of a federal regulation, or a court action, during the 2025–26 fiscal year that are within or in excess of amounts appropriated in this act for that year. (b) If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditures authorized for this item, the department shall so report to the Legislature. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made in this item shall be increased by the amount of the excess unless and until otherwise provided by law. 5. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item which have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 6. In the event of a declared disaster and upon county request, the State Department of Social Services may act in the place of any county and assume direct responsibility for the administration of eligibility and grant determination. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds from this item and Item 5180-101-0890 to Items 5180-001-0001 and 5180-001-0890, for this purpose. 7. Pursuant to the Electronic Benefits Transfer (EBT) Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10065) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) and in accordance with the EBT System regulations (Manual of Policies and Procedures Section 16-401.15), in the event a county fails to reimburse the EBT contractor for settlement of EBT transactions made against the county’s cash assistance programs, the state is required to pay the contractor. The State Department of Social Services may use funds from this item to reimburse the EBT contractor for settlement on behalf of the county. The county shall be required to reimburse the department for the county’s settlement via direct payment or administrative offset. 8. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures for the California Food Assistance Program in those amounts made necessary by changes in the CalFresh Program Standard Utility Allowance, including changes that result from midyear Standard Utility Allowance adjustments requested by the state and any adjustments necessary to maintain parity with federal program changes. If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditure authority of this item, the department shall so report to the Legislature. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made in this item shall be increased by the amount of the excess unless and until otherwise provided by law. 9. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (2), upon notification from the State Department of Social Services, to replenish the State Emergency Food Bank Reserve. 10. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services: Items 6100-194-0001, 5180-101-0001, and reimbursements. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this section during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. This provision supports the continuity of care in the programs transitioned from the State Department of Education to the State Department of Social Services. 11. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize a cash loan from the General Fund for cashflow purposes, in an amount not to exceed $20,000,000, under the following conditions: (a) The loan shall meet cash needs resulting from a delay in the receipt of reimbursements from the General Child Care program (CCTR) funds. (b) The loan shall be used for a short-term need and shall be repaid within 90 days of the loan origination date. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to Section 16314 of the Government Code. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $1,618,271,000 shall be allocated for Alternative Payment Program, General Child Care and Migrant Child Care slots to expand childcare access, with a priority for General Child Care slots serving children who are 0 to 3 years of age. 13. Funds allocated for Resource and Referral, California Child Care Initiative, Quality Improvement, and Local Planning Councils shall be allocated to meet federal requirements to improve the quality of childcare and shall be used in accordance with the approved California State Plan for the federal Child Care and Development Fund that is developed pursuant to the requirements of Section 10211.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 14. Notwithstanding any other law, funds in accounts payable are available for alternative payment programs for actual and allowable costs incurred for additional services, pursuant to Section 10228.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The State Department of Social Services shall give priority for the allocation of these funds for accounts payable. 15. (a) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall conduct monthly analyses of CalWORKs Stage 2 and Stage 3 caseloads and expenditures and adjust agency contract maximum reimbursement amounts and allocations as necessary to ensure funds are distributed proportionally to need. (2) Notwithstanding any other law or any other provision of this act, the Department of Finance may augment the appropriation for CalWORKs Stage 3 if the estimate of expenditures, as determined by the Department of Finance, will exceed the expenditures authorized in Schedule (3). The Department of Finance shall report any augmentation pursuant to this paragraph to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made in Schedule (3) shall be increased by the amount of the augmentation. (3) An augmentation may be authorized not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity to exceed the limitations is provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee may determine. Any request made by the State Department of Social Services to augment the CalWORKs Stage 3 appropriation shall be approved only in order to cover increases in costs that are consistent with assumptions of this act. This provision shall not be construed to treat Stage 3 as an entitlement. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, the funds in Schedule (3) are reserved exclusively for continuing childcare for the following families: (1) Former CalWORKs families who are working, have left cash aid, and have exhausted their two-year eligibility for transitional services in either Stage 1 or Stage 2 pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10371 or Section 10372 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, respectively, but still meet eligibility requirements for receipt of subsidized childcare services. (2) Families who received lump-sum diversion payments or diversion services under Section 11266.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and have spent two years in Stage 2 off of cash aid, but still meet eligibility requirements for receipt of subsidized childcare services. (c) Notwithstanding any other law, each local planning council receiving funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall meet the requirements of Section 10486 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to the extent feasible and to the extent data is readily accessible. (d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, families shall be disenrolled from subsidized childcare services consistent with the priorities for services specified in subdivision (b) of Section 10271 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Families shall be disenrolled in the following order: (A) Families with the highest income below 85 percent of the State Median Income (SMI) adjusted for family size. (B) Of families with the same income level, those that have been receiving childcare services for the longest period of time. (C) Of families with the same income level, those that have a child with exceptional needs. (D) Families with children who are receiving child protective services or are at risk of being neglected or abused, regardless of family income. (2) Notwithstanding any other law, the implementation of paragraph (1) of this subprovision is not subject to the appeal and resolution procedures for agencies that contract with the State Department of Social Services for the provision of childcare services or the due process requirements afforded to families that are denied services specified in Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. (3) The reimbursement for meals served in childcare centers and homes shall be $0.2160 per meal. 16. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), up to $9,440,000 shall be available for the child nutrition program state match for the program. 17. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (3) for accounts payable, upon notification from the State Department of Social Services, to reimburse for actual and allowable costs incurred to Child Care and Development Programs, as defined in Section 10213.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 18. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for increased costs related to the reimbursement of stolen food and cash benefits. 19. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), up to $30,091,000 is available to all programs funded by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Chapter 3 ( commencing with Section 10225), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250), Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260), and Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8 of, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of, Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for implementation costs associated with paying child care and development providers prospectively, based on enrollment, pursuant to Section 10280 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Section 8242 of the Education Code. Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Social Services may provide written directives for the amount and manner of reimbursement for these costs and the manner of implementation. Expenditures for this purpose shall be exempt from the administrative costs limit set forth in Section 10302 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 20. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3), up to $70,000,000 is available to alternative payment programs funded by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225) or Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8 of, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of, Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to provide resources to alternative payment program agencies for administration and support costs associated with implementing ongoing provisions of the Memorandum of Understanding with Child Care Providers United. Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Social Services may provide written directives for the amount and manner of reimbursement for these costs and the manner of implementation. 21. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $36,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the CalFresh Fruit and Vegetable Pilot Program. 22. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $72,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the CalFood Program. 23. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $7,400,000 shall be available to the State Department of Social Services to provide allocations to the following organizations for diaper and wipe distribution to low-income families with infants or toddlers: (1) Community Action Partnership of Orange County, (2) Community Partnership of San Bernardino, (3) Central California Food Bank, (4) Help a Mother Out (located in the San Francisco Bay Area), (5) Los Angeles Regional Food Bank, (6) Redwood Empire Food Bank, (7) Sacramento Food Bank and Family Services, (8) Jacobs and Cushman San Diego Food Bank, (9) Food Share Ventura County, (10) Second Harvest Food Bank of Santa Cruz, and (11) Food Bank of Contra Costa and Solano. 24. (a) Of the amount appropriated in this item. $7,500,000 shall be available to the State Department of Social Services for the YMCA of Metropolitan Los Angeles for Food Assistance and Legal Aid Services. (b) The State Department of Social Services shall determine the best method for allocation of this funding. (c) Notwithstanding any other law, the department’s allocation of funds pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the review or approval of the Department of General Services. 25. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for the CalWORKs Housing Support Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for state operations. Funds transferred for state operations pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2028. 26. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds appropriated in Schedule (1) of this Item for the CalWORKs Housing Support Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for state operations. Funds transferred for state operations pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2028. 27. If full ratification of the tentative agreement reached between the state and Child Care Providers United on August 7, 2025 is not achieved by September 30, 2025, the Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in Schedule (3) for administrative costs associated with the agreement related to the reimbursement provided under all programs funded pursuant to Sections 10280 and 10374.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Section 8242 of the Education Code, subject to a ratified agreement, and subject to future legislation providing for appropriations related to the budget bill. 28. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, the amount in Schedule (3) may be increased as follows to restore the balances of the Child Care Providers United—California (CCPU) funds within 90 days of receiving the annual report from CCPU detailing the distribution of funds from the prior year and any remaining balance, pursuant to the agreement entered into by the Governor and CCPU: (a) Up to $100,000,000 for the CCPU Workers Health Care Fund. (b) Up to $80,000,000 for the CCPU Retirement Trust. (c) Up to $15,000,000 for the CCPU Training Partnership Fund. SEC. 188. Item 5180-141-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5180-141-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services ........................ 1,460,852,000 Schedule: (1) 4270037-County Administration and Automation Projects ........................ 1,678,275,000 (2) Reimbursements to 4270037-County Administration and Automation Projects ........................ −217,423,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, a loan not to exceed $140,000,000 shall be made available from the General Fund, from funds not otherwise appropriated, to cover the federal or reimbursable share, or both, of costs of a program or programs when the federal funds or reimbursements have not been received by this state prior to the usual time for transmitting state payments for the federal or reimbursable share of costs. This loan from the General Fund shall be repaid when the federal share of costs or the reimbursements for the program or programs become available. 2. In the event of a declared disaster and upon county request, the State Department of Social Services may act in the place of any county and assume direct responsibility for the administration of eligibility and grant determination. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds from this item and Item 5180-141-0890 to Items 5180-001-0001 and 5180-001-0890, for this purpose. 3. Provision 1 of Item 5180-101-0001 also applies to this item. 4. Pursuant to public assistance caseload estimates reflected in the annual Governor’s Budget, the Department of Finance may approve expenditures in those amounts made necessary by a court action or changes in caseload that are in excess of amounts appropriated in this act. If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditures authorized for this item, the department shall so report to the Legislature. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made by this item shall be increased by the amount of the excess unless and until otherwise provided by law. 5. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item which have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 6. This item may be increased by order of the Department of Finance to address system changes necessary to implement the requirements of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (P.L. 111-148). The Director of Finance shall provide notification in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of any expenditure approved under this provision not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of the approval. 7. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for the State Department of Social Services in order to fund the administrative costs to prepare for and respond to a declaration of a major disaster by the President of the United States and to maximize the amount of assistance requested and received through the federal Disaster Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and other federally funded nutrition assistance programs. 8. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for the costs associated with an updated project schedule, clarified requirements, and negotiated vendor costs for the California Statewide Automated Welfare System project, upon notification from the Office of Systems Integration. Any such increase shall be authorized not less than 30 days following written notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or a lesser period if requested by the department and approved by the chairperson or the chairperson’s designee. 9. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $121,649,000 is for the support of activities related to the Child Welfare Services-California Automated Response and Engagement System (CWS-CARES) project. Expenditure of these funds is contingent upon the CWS-CARES project receiving project continuation approval from the Department of Technology. This amount may be augmented up to $36,641,000 by the Department of Finance. Additionally, this amount may be augmented from unspent appropriations and augmentation amounts authorized in prior years upon approval by the Department of Finance. In providing approval of any augmentation, the Department of Finance, in consultation with the Department of Technology, shall consider verified satisfactory progress toward milestones associated with the CWS-CARES Product Roadmap, product adoption, and the roadmap change management process. Satisfactory progress shall be defined as: (1) The completion of planned product milestones including all planned data conversion, hardening, and testing without significant deviation from the baseline project cost, schedule, and scope in the most recent Special Project Report; (2) Incorporation of relevant end user feedback into product design, development, and implementation, to the extent possible, without significant increases in the total CWS-CARES project cost, schedule, and scope; (3) Demonstrable progress made towards user adoption that is consistent with the project’s strategic plan for user engagement, communication, and adoption, including clearly defined processes that measure and report on stakeholder engagements with the project (such as, for example, stakeholder impact assessments). Such an augmentation shall be aligned with planned project activities and shall not be used to increase total project costs. Any such augmentation shall be authorized no less than 30 calendar days following written notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or a lesser period if requested by the Department of Finance and approved by the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee. The Department of Finance’s written notification shall include, at a minimum, its consideration of verified satisfactory progress as defined above. (b) The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds appropriated for the CWS-CARES project in Schedule (1) to Item 5180-001-0001, for project-related activities, including, but not limited to, necessary personal services expenditures, interagency agreements, and contracts. (c) Of the amount appropriated in this item, $100,000 is available to fund reimbursements to Indian tribes, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or the tribe’s designee, for costs associated with participating with the State Department of Social Services to guide the development of an automated system used for Child Welfare Services. Notwithstanding any other law, the amount and manner of reimbursements shall be determined by the State Department of Social Services in written directives. (d) By August 15, 2025, the Department of Social Services, in coordination with the Department of Finance, shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, relevant fiscal and policy committee staff, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office any changes in CWS-CARES project funding resulting from the federal Administration for Children and Families’ determination of the project’s Comprehensive Child Welfare Information System claiming status. (e) The Department of Social Services, in coordination with the Department of Finance and the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration, shall provide written notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, relevant fiscal and policy committee staff, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office if the scheduled implementation of any child welfare program changes will be delayed due to changes in CWS-CARES project schedule. The Department of Social Services shall provide this written notification no later than 30 days after its determination that project schedule changes will delay program changes. 10. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $2,000,000 shall be available for the State Department of Social Services for the purpose of updating public benefit program forms, notices, or reports necessary to maintain compliance with federal regulation or state law. 11. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts in this item to Item 5180-001-0001 in order to fund the costs of administration and implementation of the SUN Bucks California program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code. 12. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for increased costs related to the reimbursement of stolen food and cash benefits. 13. Notwithstanding any other law, for the purpose of administering and implementing the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code, any contract or grants entered into by the State Department of Social Services shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the review or approval of the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology. 14. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item for any unanticipated automation and county administrative costs resulting from the United States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service’s determination of the state’s Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program’s Standard Utility Allowance methodology update. 15. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $20,100,000 shall be used for CalFresh Payment Error Rate Mitigation and automation for implementation of Public Law 119-21. 16. The Department of Finance may augment this item for the purpose of implementing requirements and guidance from the federal government resulting from provisions of Public Law 119-21 and shall provide notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee at least 10 days in advance of doing so. Total augmentations authorized by this provision shall not exceed $15,000,000, and funds allocated pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 17. The Department of Finance may augment this item for the purpose of county administration to address provisions related to Able-Bodied Adults Without Dependents of Public Law 119-21 and shall provide notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee at least 10 days in advance of doing so. Total augmentations authorized by this provision shall not exceed $20,000,000, and funds allocated pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. SEC. 189. Item 5180-141-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5180-141-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 2,002,084,000 Schedule: (1) 4270037-County Administration and Automation Projects ........................ 2,002,084,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 2, 3, 4, 6, 7, 8, 9, and 11 of Item 5180-141-0001 also apply to this item. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, for the purpose of administering and implementing the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code, any contract or grants entered into by the State Department of Social Services shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the review or approval of the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology. 3. Upon notification by the Department of Social Services, the Controller is authorized to transfer funds from this item to the CalFresh E&T Workers’ Compensation Fund in accordance with Section 18926.8 of the Welfare Institutions Code. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $24,400,000 shall be used for CalFresh Payment Error Rate Mitigation and automation for implementation of Public Law 119-21. 5. The Department of Finance may augment this item for the purpose of implementing requirements and guidance from the federal government resulting from provisions of Public Law 119-21 and shall provide notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee at least 10 days in advance of doing so. Total augmentations authorized by this provision shall not exceed $15,000,000, and funds allocated pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 6. The Department of Finance may augment this item for the purpose of county administration to address provisions related to Able-Bodied Adults Without Dependents of Public Law 119-21 and shall provide notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee at least 10 days in advance of doing so. Total augmentations authorized by this provision shall not exceed $20,000,000, and funds allocated pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. SEC. 190. Item 5180-151-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5180-151-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services ........................ 861,009,000 Schedule: (1) 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ 1,199,335,000 (2) 4275028-Special Programs ........................ 218,571,000 (3) Reimbursements to 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ −534,397,000 (4) Reimbursements to 4275028-Special Programs ........................ −22,500,000 Provisions: 1. Provision 1 of Item 5180-101-0001 also applies to this item. 2. Notwithstanding Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and pursuant to Section 30029.8 of the Government Code, a loan not to exceed $50,000,000 shall be made available from the General Fund, from funds not otherwise appropriated, to cover the federal share or reimbursable share, or both, of costs of a program or programs when the federal funds or reimbursements have not been received by the state prior to the usual time for transmitting state payments for the federal or reimbursable share of costs. The loan from the General Fund shall be repaid when the federal or reimbursable share of costs for the program or programs becomes available. 3. The Department of Finance may authorize the establishment of positions and transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0001, in order to allow the state to perform the facilities evaluation function of the Community Care Licensing Division in the event the counties fail to perform that function. 4. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item that have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 5. The Department of Finance may authorize the establishment of positions and transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0001 in order to allow the state to perform the adoptions function in the event that a county notifies the State Department of Social Services that it intends to cease performing that function. 6. Funds appropriated in this item for the Commercially Sexually Exploited Children Program required by Chapter 5.2 (commencing with Section 16524.6) of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be appropriately reduced by the Department of Finance to the extent any activities for which funding is included are also required by the federal Preventing Sex Trafficking and Strengthening Families Act (P.L. 113-183). 7. Of the total amount appropriated in this item, up to $4,000,000 shall be available for a county-optional block grant program, for allocation to local agencies to fund activities the Commission on State Mandates identified as reimbursable state mandates in the Interagency Child Abuse and Neglect Investigation Reports (CSM-00-TC-22) mandate. A local agency that receives funding according to this item shall not be eligible to submit claims to the Controller for reimbursement under Section 17560 of the Government Code for any costs related to the reimbursable state-mandated activities identified in CSM-00-TC-22 incurred in the same fiscal year during which the local agency received funding according to this item. The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties, shall develop an allocation methodology for the purpose of distributing these funds to participating counties. Block grant funding apportioned according to this item is subject to annual financial and compliance audits. 8. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $7,000,000 shall be available for contracts under the authority of Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code with organizations qualified pursuant to that chapter, to provide legal services to persons on California State University campuses. Use of these funds shall be reported in updates provided to the Legislature on the State Department of Social Services’ immigration programs. 9. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $87,000 shall be available to eligible federally recognized Indian tribes or tribal agencies to purchase Live Scan machines and receive ongoing reimbursements for fingerprinting costs, other maintenance and operation items, or related activities necessary to enable the tribes or tribal agencies to complete background checks for the purpose of approving tribally approved homes for the placement of Indian children into foster or adoptive care pursuant to Section 10553.12 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (b) The funding in subdivision (a) shall be available to the tribes or tribal agencies currently approved by the Department of Justice to receive state and federal level summary criminal history information pursuant to Section 11105.08 of the Penal Code. (c) Of the funding in subdivision (a), the amount that each tribe or tribal agency can utilize for the purposes specified in subdivision (a) will be determined in consultation with, and subject to review and approval by, the State Department of Social Services. 10. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $18,146,000 shall be available to support enhanced care planning and assessment services, exceptional care and supervision needs for a child in a licensed setting, or other exceptional community, educational, or family supports that have been identified by a qualified individual or a child and family team, as necessary to meet the needs of a child in the least restrictive setting. The State Department of Social Services shall allocate funds through contracts with community-based providers or entities or through local assistance allocations to counties that support new or expanded programs, services, and practices that ensure the provision of the high-quality continuum of care that is designed to support foster children in the least restrictive setting, consistent with a child’s permanency plan. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $4,145,000 shall be available for the State Department of Social Services to provide funding to support legal counsel to represent an Indian tribe in California juvenile court proceedings contingent upon the enactment of statutory changes detailing objectives, implementation design and timelines, data collection, and outcome measurements for these activities. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $4,777,000 shall be available for the State Department of Social Services to provide financial assistance with recruiting and approving homes for the purpose of foster or adoptive placement of an Indian child contingent upon the enactment of statutory changes detailing objectives, implementation design and timelines, data collection, and outcome measurements for these activities. The department shall seek federal approvals or waivers necessary to claim federal reimbursement under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) in order to maximize funding for the purpose described in this section. 13. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $10,000,000 shall be available for legal services pursuant to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for, but not limited to, unaccompanied undocumented minors and other minors in removal proceedings, and current or past beneficiaries of federal temporary protected status, to be allocated at the discretion of the State Department of Social Services. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2028, and expenditure until June 30, 2030. Use of these funds shall be reported in updates provided to the Legislature on the department’s immigration programs. 14. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $83,800,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Home Safe Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. Upon order of the Department of Finance, up to five percent of the amount appropriated for the Home Safe Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for administrative costs for the program, including, but not limited to, the technical assistance and outcomes tracking referenced in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Funds transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 shall also be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. All funds expended towards the purposes described in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be subject to subdivision (f) of that section. 15. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $81,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Bringing Families Home Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. Upon order of the Department of Finance, up to five percent of the amount appropriated for the Bringing Families Home Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for administrative costs for the program, including, but not limited to, the technical assistance and outcomes tracking referenced in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Funds transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 shall also be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. All funds expended towards the purposes described in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be subject to subdivision (f) of that section. 16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $44,600,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Housing and Disability Advocacy Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. Upon order of the Department of Finance, up to five percent of the amount appropriated for the Housing and Disability Advocacy Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for administrative costs for the program, including, but not limited to, the technical assistance and outcomes tracking referenced in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Funds transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 shall also be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. All funds expended towards the purposes described in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be subject to subdivision (f) of that section. 17. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $10,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Children’s Holistic Immigration Representation Project and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 18. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $14,500,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Holocaust Survivors Assistance Program to continue to provide services through the 2025–26 fiscal year and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 19. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $600,000 shall be allocated for the first year of a multi-year effort to develop, no later than July 1, 2027, a standardized curriculum for mandated reporters, consistent with statutory changes made to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 18950) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code accompanying this act. 20. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $23,000,000 shall be provided to the State Department of Social Services to distribute to eligible licensed foster family agencies that experienced a documented increase in the costs of liability insurance. This funding shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (b) The State Department of Social Services shall administer the funding described in subprovision (a) to eligible licensed foster family agencies using criteria and a methodology determined by the department in written directives, developed in consultation with the California Alliance of Child and Family Services and the County Welfare Directors Association of California. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, information notices, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. 21. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $15,000,000 shall be available for grants or contracts, and state operations, under the authority of Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code with organizations qualified pursuant to that chapter, to provide immigration-related services, including removal defense. (b) Upon approval of the Department of Finance, funds made available pursuant to subprovision (a) may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 to implement and administer immigration-related services. (c) Following the award of funding made available pursuant to subprovision (a), the State Department of Social Services shall provide written notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee on the distribution of funds made available pursuant to subprovision (a). The notification shall include, at a minimum, the grant awardees, grant amounts, and grant period, and the amount and intended purpose of any funds transferred pursuant to subprovision (b). 22. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds appropriated in Schedule (1) and Schedule (2) of Item 5180-151-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45. and 249, Stats. 2022) for the Home Safe, Bringing Families Home, and the Housing and Disability Income Advocacy Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for state operations. Funds transferred for state operations pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2028. 23. Upon approval by the Department of Finance, funds appropriated in Schedule (1) and Schedule (2) of this item for the Home Safe, Bringing Families Home, and the Housing and Disability Income Advocacy Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for state operations. Funds transferred for state operations pursuant to this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2028. 24. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $250,000 shall be allocated to the County of Marin for the Marin County Foster Care Association for resources and support for children and youth in foster care and adoptive care. 25. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be allocated to the County of Sacramento for onsite child care facilities at the Sacramento International Airport for airport employees. 26. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be allocated to the Kern County Department of Human Services for Child Protective Services support. 27. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $250,000 shall be allocated to the City and County of San Francisco for accessibility improvements to Wah Mei Child Development Center. 28. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $8,750,000 shall be allocated for Immigration Legal Services, of this amount: $2,750,000 is for the Sierra Health Foundations for immigrant services; $1,500,000 for Catholic Charities for immigration related services on the Central Coast; $1,500,000 to Catholic Charities for immigration related services in Orange County; $1,000,000 to Salva for immigration related services in Los Angeles County and San Bernadino County; $1,000,000 to Bet Tzedek Legal Services for legal services for children and families related to immigration, gender affirming documents, and accessing public benefits and resources; and $1,000,000 for Public Counsel for civil rights impact litigation and other legal services to undeserved communities. 29. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be allocated to the Child Development Institute, a nonprofit child care center in the San Fernando Valley. SEC. 191. Item 5180-151-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5180-151-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,727,051,000 Schedule: (1) 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ 1,724,801,000 (2) 4275028-Special Programs ........................ 2,250,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1, 3, and 5 of Item 5180-151-0001 also apply to this item. 2. Upon request by the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer funds between this item and Item 5180-101-0890 as needed to reflect the estimated expenditure amounts for counties receiving funds provided by the federal Family First Transition Act (Sec. 602, P.L. 116-94). The Department of Finance shall report to the Legislature the amount to be transferred pursuant to this provision. The transfer shall be authorized at the time the report is made. 3. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $8,500,000 shall be provided to the State Department of Social Services to distribute to eligible licensed foster family agencies that experienced a documented increase in the costs of liability insurance. This funding shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (b) The State Department of Social Services shall administer the funding described in subprovision (a) to eligible licensed foster family agencies using criteria and a methodology determined by the department in written directives, developed in consultation with the California Alliance of Child and Family Services and the County Welfare Directors Association of California. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, information notices, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. SEC. 192. Item 5180-491 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5180-491—Reappropriation, State Department of Social Services. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $1,850,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) of Item 5180-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35 and, 994, Stats. 2024) for Zero Trust Architecture and Multifactor Authentication planning. (2) Up to $1,100,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for the 2025–26 fiscal year for direct deposit to childcare contractors pursuant to Provision 11 of Item 5180-001-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (3) Up to $301,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) of Item 5180-151-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for the County Welfare Department Offices Physical Accessibility Review. (4) Up to $40,000,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-151-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) to increase the use of home-based family care and the provision of services and supports to children in foster care and their foster caregivers. (5) Up to $80,000,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) of Item 5180-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for the State Supplemental Grant Program. (6) Up to $25,000,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-141-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) to develop an interface with the Child Welfare Services-California Automated Response and Engagement System. (7) Up to $1,820,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-141-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for automation in the California Statewide Automated Welfare System to support implementation of the foster care Tiered Rate Structure. (8) Up to $2,531,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-141-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for automation in the Child Welfare Services-California Automated Response and Engagement System to support implementation of the foster care Tiered Rate Structure. 0890—Federal Trust Fund (1) Up to $2,531,000 of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 5180-141-0890, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for automation in the Child Welfare Services-California Automated Response and Engagement System to support implementation of the foster care Tiered Rate Structure. SEC. 193. Item 5225-017-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5225-017-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4590-Rehabilitative Programs-Cognitive Behavioral Therapy and Reentry Services ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for state operations or local assistance, and shall be used to establish the Rehabilitative Investment Grants for Healing and Transformation (RIGHT) Grant 3.0 to support community based, nonprofit organizations for the purpose of delivering trauma-informed, rehabilitative and/or restorative justice programming in California prisons. RIGHT Grant 3.0 funds shall not be used for the provision of college educational programming. This funding may be used to sustain or expand currently existing programs. To the extent the organizations seek to utilize funds to provide a new program in institutions where the program is not currently offered, or to significantly expand a currently existing program, the organization must receive approval from the warden of the applicable institution. This funding shall be allocated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to each organization that meets the following requirements: (1) The organization is in good standing as a 501(c)(3) nonprofit community- based organization or is a nonprofit community-based organization that is fiscally sponsored by a fiscal agent with nonprofit status, (2) has a preexisting record of providing in-prison rehabilitative programming within the department during at least two of the five years preceding their application, and (3) is providing an existing rehabilitative program. The department shall post the notice by October 1, 2025, and applications shall be submitted within 60 days from the date posted. Following receipt of applications, the department shall determine eligibility and provide notice to organizations regarding their eligibility determination within 90 days. In all cases where a program is determined to not meet the eligibility requirements, the department shall offer a 30-day window in which the community-based organization may resubmit their proposed program for a possible later determination of eligibility. After this 30-day period, the department shall then issue grant funds to eligible grantees within 90 days. 2. Individual grant amounts shall be subject to the total number of qualifying applications that are received by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. 4. No more than 3 percent of the amount appropriated in this item may be used by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to administer this grant. 7. Qualifying organizations shall be awarded grants based on their current organizational budget, or the average budget of the last two years, whichever is greater, as follows: (a) Organizations with budgets under $250,000 shall be awarded one qualifying point. (b) Organizations with budgets between $250,000 and $500,000, inclusive, shall be awarded two qualifying points. (c) Organizations with budgets above $500,000 shall be awarded three qualifying points. 8. Priority shall be given to programs operating in women’s institutions and underserved institutions, as follows: organizations applying to provide existing programs in underserved institutions may be awarded an additional one-half point. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation will provide a list of underserved institutions defined by a lack of community-based programming services available relative to other institutions. Priority shall also be given to programs serving special populations, including Women’s Prisons, Restricted Housing Units, and Enhanced Outpatient Programs/Mental Health Crisis Beds, as follows: organizations applying to provide programs to these special populations may be awarded an additional one-half point. 9. The total funding available shall be divided by the total points awarded to all applicants as specified above, resulting in a dollar amount for each point. Each qualifying organization may be awarded more than one additional point total for providing programming outlined in the section above. Each qualifying organization will then receive the value of the total points that organization was awarded based on the size of their annual budget and additional proposed programming options. All of the funds available shall be distributed based on this system. 12. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance and expenditure until December 1, 2028. Each grant recipient shall submit to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation a report that details the expenditures of their grant, including a summary of how the resources enhanced their ability to deliver in-prison programming, by December 1, 2029. The department may require of all funded organizations an annual report detailing the use of the funds by each recipient. 13. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit a report to the budget committees of each house of the Legislature no later than April 1, 2030, detailing how the funds for the RIGHT Grant 3.0 program were distributed and how they were spent by recipients. The report shall include copies of all reports submitted by all organizations receiving RIGHT Grant 3.0 funds. This report may be combined with the report required under Provision 10 of Item 5225-017-0001 of the Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). SEC. 194. Item 5227-493 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 5227-493—Reappropriation, Board of State and Community Corrections. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citation is extended to June 30, 2027. 0001—General Fund (1) Item 5227-103-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) SEC. 195. Item 6100-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-001-0001—For support of State Department of Education ........................ 118,460,000 Schedule: (1) 5205010-Curriculum Services ........................ 85,130,000 (1.5) 5210048-After School Programs ........................ 1,583,000 (2) 5210066-Special Program Support ........................ 42,442,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 59,601,000 (4) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −59,601,000 (5) Reimbursements to 5205010-Curriculum Services ........................ −9,729,000 (6) Reimbursements to 5210066-Special Program Support ........................ −966,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 33190 of the Education Code or any other law, the State Department of Education shall not expend funds to prepare a statewide summary of pupil performance on school district proficiency assessments or a compilation of information on private schools with five or fewer pupils. 2. Funds appropriated in this item may be expended or encumbered to make one or more payments under a personal services contract of a visiting educator pursuant to Section 19050.8 of the Government Code, a long-term special consultant services contract, or an employment contract between an entity that is not a state agency and a person who is under the direct or daily supervision of a state agency, only if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The person providing service under the contract provides full financial disclosure to the Fair Political Practices Commission in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission. (b) The service provided under the contract does not result in the displacement of any represented civil service employee. (c) The rate of compensation for salary and health benefits for the person providing service under the contract does not exceed by more than 10 percent the current rate of compensation for salary and health benefits determined by the Department of Human Resources for civil service personnel in a comparable position. The payment of any other compensation or any reimbursement for travel or per diem expenses shall be in accordance with the State Administrative Manual and the rules and regulations of the California Victim Compensation Board. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be expended for the development or dissemination of program advisories, including, but not limited to, program advisories on the subject areas of reading, writing, and mathematics, unless explicitly authorized by the State Board of Education. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $206,000 shall be available as matching funds for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to provide coordinated services to disabled pupils. 5. By October 31 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance a file of all charter school average daily attendance (ADA) and state and local revenue associated with charter school general purpose entitlements as part of the P2 Local Control Funding Formula File. By March 1 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance a file of all charter school ADA and state and local revenue associated with charter school general purpose entitlements as part of the P1 Local Control Funding Formula File. It is the expectation that such reports will be provided annually. 6. On or before April 15 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance an electronic file that includes complete district- and county-level state appropriations limit information reported to the State Department of Education. The State Department of Education shall make every effort to ensure that all districts have submitted the necessary information requested on the relevant reporting forms. 7. The State Department of Education shall make information available to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the budget committees of each house of the Legislature by October 31, March 31, and May 31 of each year regarding the amount of Proposition 98 savings estimated to be available for reversion by June 30 of that year. 8. Reimbursement expenditures pursuant to this item resulting from the imposition by the State Department of Education of a commercial copyright fee shall not be expended sooner than 30 days after the State Department of Education submits to the Department of Finance a legal opinion affirming the authority to impose such fees and the arguments supporting that position against any objections or legal challenges to the fee filed with the State Department of Education. Any funds received pursuant to imposition of a commercial copyright fee may only be expended as necessary for outside counsel contingent on a certification of the Superintendent of Public Instruction that sufficient expertise is not available within departmental legal staff. The State Department of Education shall not expend greater than $300,000 for such purposes without first notifying the Department of Finance of the necessity therefor, and upon receiving approval in writing. 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $1,011,000 is available for dispute resolution services, including mediation and fair hearing services, provided through contract for special education programs. 10. Of the reimbursement funds appropriated in this item, at least $612,000 is provided to the State Department of Education for the oversight of State Board of Education-authorized charter schools. The Department of Finance may administratively establish up to 2.0 positions for this purpose as workload materializes. 11. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $109,000 shall be for 1.0 position within the State Department of Education to support activities associated with the Clean Energy Job Creation Fund. 12. Of the amount appropriated in this item, at least $852,000 and 6.0 positions are provided to support the Local Control Funding Formula administration pursuant to Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2013. These funds and positions shall be used by the State Department of Education to support the apportionment of, and fiscal oversight of, funding pursuant to the Local Control Funding Formula. 13. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $115,000 and 1.0 position shall be available for the State Department of Education to support activities associated with charter school appeals as required under subdivision (k) of Section 47605 of the Education Code. 14. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $1,140,000 and 8.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of the Local Control Funding Formula accountability system pursuant to Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2013. 15. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $120,000 and 1.0 permanent position are provided to support implementation of the Local Control Funding Formula, such as providing unduplicated pupil counts, matching foster data received from the State Department of Social Services, and meeting foster youth reporting requirements. 16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $271,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to continue the development and maintenance of the state and federal accountability systems. 17. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $129,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position for workload associated with school district reorganizations. 18. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $108,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position to assist local educational agencies applying for a universal meal service program, pursuant to Chapter 724 of the Statutes of 2017. 19. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $128,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position to complete additional education equity compliance reviews, pursuant to Chapter 493 of the Statutes of 2017. 20. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $252,000 shall be used to support the development and maintenance of a computer-based English Language Proficiency Assessment for California (ELPAC) and a computer-based alternative ELPAC for students with disabilities. 21. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $257,000 is provided to support 2.0 existing positions for the coordination of a centralized Uniform Complaint Procedures process and database to improve the administration and resolution of Uniform Complaint Procedures complaints and appeals received by the State Department of Education; to standardize Uniform Complaint Procedures policies, procedures, and templates departmentwide; and to provide a report by January 31 of each year with a summary of the number of days for completion of appeals by complaint type and program area, including the rationale for complaints that exceeded 60 days. 23. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $600,000 is provided to support 2.0 existing positions and workload related to school-based comprehensive sexual health education. 24. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $105,000 and 1.0 position are to support increases in emergency average daily attendance waiver requests. 25. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $452,000 is provided for 3.0 positions to support compliance workload within the State Department of Education’s Special Education Division. 26. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $275,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program and the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program. Availability of these funds is contingent upon the State Department of Education fully supporting no fewer than 6.0 full-time regional program consultants in agricultural career technical education in the Agricultural Education Unit of the Career and College Transition Division using federal Perkins V Act funding. If the State Department of Education is unable to support at least 6.0 full-time regional program consultants in agricultural career technical education with federal Perkins V Act funding, $142,000 and 1.0 position provided in this item to support the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program and the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program shall be redirected for that purpose. As a condition of receiving this funding, the State Department of Education shall make information available to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the budget committees of each house of the Legislature by October 31 of each fiscal year regarding the split of the federal Perkins V Act funding between the State Department of Education and the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges. This information shall include, but is not limited to, the maximum set-asides allowable for state administration and state leadership activities, the minimum amount required for local program distribution, as well as a breakdown of how the State Department of Education is utilizing the funds in each category. 27. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $303,000 is provided to support 2.0 positions for the joint interagency resolution team and foster youth coordinated services pursuant to Chapter 815 of the Statutes of 2018. 28. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $77,000 is provided to support 0.5 existing position to update existing, and develop new, resources and strategies, and in-service teacher training to support lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, and questioning students, pursuant to Chapter 775 of the Statutes of 2019. 29. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $77,000 is provided to support 1.0 position to provide appropriate language access in American Sign Language. 30. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $696,000 and 3.0 positions are available for the department to collect data to track the implementation of the changes for charter school petitions and renewals, pursuant to Chapter 486 of the Statutes of 2019. 31. Of the amount provided in this item, $192,000 reimbursements are provided on an ongoing basis to support the administration of the California High School Proficiency Examination. 32. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $264,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to establish a state education disaster team to support activities related to disaster planning, preparedness, and response for schools as part of California’s Disaster Preparedness, Response, and Recovery efforts. 33. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $336,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support new ongoing workload for the School Fiscal Services Division related to deferrals and average daily attendance changes pursuant to Chapter 24 of the Statutes of 2020. 34. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $136,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support workload related to creating a school emergency reporting system. 35. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $12,598,000 is provided to support 52.8 existing positions in the Nutrition Services Division, and 30.0 positions in the Early Education Division to support remaining early learning workload after the transition of childcare programs to the State Department of Social Services. 36. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $376,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to support increased workload in the accounting office. 38. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $3,403,000 is provided to support existing authorized administrative positions. 39. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,960,000 is provided to support existing authorized administrative positions. 40. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $700,000 is provided to support 5.0 new positions and 1.0 existing position for the State Department of Education to establish the Office of School-Based Health. 41. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $250,000 and 1.0 permanent position are provided to establish the California Computer Science Coordinator. The coordinator shall provide statewide coordination in implementing the computer science content standards developed pursuant to Section 60605.4 of the Education Code and lead the implementation of the computer science strategic implementation plan adopted by the State Board of Education. 42. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $425,000 and 2.5 positions are available to support workload associated with expanded Transitional Kindergarten programs. 43. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $437,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support early learning workload in the Child Development and Nutrition Fiscal Services Division. 44. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,670,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support early learning workload in the Early Education Division. 45. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,583,000 and 11.7 positions are provided to support early learning workload. 46. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $143,000 and 1.0 position are available for a Medi-Cal billing coordinator to serve as a liaison with the State Department of Health Care Services, stakeholders, and others with respect to Medi-Cal billing options, the school-based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities Program, and medically necessary federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment Benefits. 47. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $467,000 and 4.0 positions are provided for the School Fiscal Services Division to support workload related to state apportionment calculations, review of average daily attendance waivers, technical assistance, and implementation of grant programs. 48. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,653,000 and 14.0 positions are provided for the Expanded Learning Division to provide students in classroom-based instructional programs with access to comprehensive after school and intersessional expanded learning opportunities. 49. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $130,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support implementation of the Standardized Account Code Structure web-based application. 50. Of the amount appropriated in this item, at least $286,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support professional development programs, including, but not limited to, the National Board Certification Incentive Grant, the Educator Effectiveness Block Grant, Professional Development on Social Emotional Learning and Trauma Informed Practices, Professional Development for Reading Instruction and Intervention, Training for Youth Mental and Behavioral Health, and other teacher professional development. 51. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $286,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of the universal school meals program. 52. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $561,000 and 4.0 positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division for work related to the Expanded Learning and Transitional Kindergarten Programs. 53. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $425,000 and 3.0 positions are provided for additional new formula-driven program implementation. 54. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $155,000 and 1.0 position are provided to the Technology Services Division for Transitional Kindergarten average daily attendance data collection. 55. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $742,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to support the Community Schools Partnership Grant Program. 56. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $143,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the California Healthy Kids Survey and social-emotional learning professional development. 57. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $143,000 and 1.0 position are provided for the Early Education Division to address increased workload in the California State Preschool Program. 58. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $130,000 and 1.0 position are provided for the Fiscal and Administrative Services Division to address increased workload in the California State Preschool Program. 61. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $201,000 is provided for 2.0 positions in the Office of School Transportation. 62. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the Supporting Inclusive Practices Grant. 63. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $690,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to improve transitions from Part C Early Intervention Services to Part B Special Education Services. 64. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $266,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support increased departmental information technology needs and workload. 65. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,681,000 is provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year to continue supporting departmental information security infrastructure. Of this amount, $2,632,000 and 6.0 positions are provided on an ongoing basis to support replacement of aging hardware, maintaining already implemented cybersecurity technical capabilities, and implementing the remaining cybersecurity technical capabilities to achieve full compliance with the Department of Technology’s Cal-Secure Information Security Roadmap. 66. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,702,000 and 9.0 positions are provided to support implementation and ongoing workload for the Cradle-to-Career Data System. 69. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $383,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to the Budget Management Office to effectively support new and expanded programs and address increased workload due to Fi$Cal implementation. 70. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $159,000 and 1.0 position are provided to coordinate improved access to early intervention services for children prior to entering kindergarten. 71. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $458,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of Chapter 498 of the Statutes of 2021 (AB 1363). 72. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $633,000 and 4.0 positions are provided for the programmatic monitoring of the California State Preschool Program. 73. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $119,000 and 1.0 position are appropriated for the fiscal monitoring of the California State Preschool Program. 74. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $436,000 and 2.5 positions are provided to support the implementation of Universal Transitional Kindergarten. 75. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $90,000 and 0.5 position are provided to support fiscal compliance monitoring reviews of program funds. 76. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $122,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support fund reconciliation workload. 77. Of the funds appropriated in this item, 1.0 position is provided to support an increase in legal workload related to new and expanded programs including Universal Transitional Kindergarten and the California State Preschool Program. 78. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $167,000 is provided for Zoom licenses to host webinars and online meetings. 81. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $350,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support increased workload related to operating the information technology systems used by the State Department of Education’s early education programs. 82. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $276,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to incorporate early identification for learning disabilities into the State Department of Education’s preschool assessment tools, and to provide training for educators on effective use of those tools. 83. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $612,000 and 4.0 positions are provided to support increased workload related to administering the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program. 84. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $769,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to support increased workload related to revising California State Preschool Program policies. 85. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $356,000 and 2.5 positions are provided to support workload associated with expanded Transitional Kindergarten programs. 87. Of the amount provided in this item, $75,000 reimbursements is provided through the 2026–27 fiscal year for state operations support of Fresno Unified School District in facilitation of grant funds from the Wallace Foundation. 88. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the development and expansion of California Science Test (CAST) and the California Alternate Assessment (CAA) for Science within the Assessment Development and Administration Division. 89. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the development and expansion of English Language Proficiency Assessments for California (ELPAC) and the California Spanish Assessment (CSA) within the Assessment Development and Administration Division. 90. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $140,000 is provided through June 30, 2027, to provide technical assistance and support to local educational agencies in hiring and training literacy coaches and reading specialists through the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program, pursuant to Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2022. 92. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,069,000 and 8.0 positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division for workload related to the Local Control Funding Formula declining enrollment protection proposal, AB 602 Special Education formula changes, and other fiscal-related workload for new programs. 93. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $250,000 is available to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for fiscal oversight of county offices of education and the seven school districts in the state that share the same governing board as their county office of education for the services of a fiscal expert or adviser pursuant to Section 1630 of the Education Code or to compensate members of a Budget Review Committee established pursuant to Education Code Sections 1623 or 42127.1. The State Department of Education shall notify and receive approval from the Director of Finance in advance of retaining the services of a fiscal expert or fiscal adviser. 94. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $150,000 and 1.0 position are provided to the School Health and Safety Office to support LGBTQ+ initiatives and best practices. 95. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $160,000 is provided for Education Commission of the States membership dues. 96. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,232,000 and 8.0 positions are provided to the Analysis, Measurement, and Accountability Reporting Division to establish a Data Science Office for the purposes of collecting new one-time or short-term data, providing contextual analysis to measure priority initiatives and programs, and providing timely data and information directly to policymakers including the State Board of Education and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days. 97. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,276,000 is available in fiscal years 2024–25 and 2025–26, for the State Department of Education to contract with a vendor to provide direct deposit to State Preschool contractors, beginning November 1, 2023. Contracts awarded pursuant to this provision shall allow for advance payment, and the department is hereby authorized to provide advance payment in order to implement direct deposit to State Preschool contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of this provision, the department is exempt from the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code. Funds provided pursuant to this provision are available for encumbrance through June 30, 2026. 101. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $152,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support workload associated with the Quality Rating and Improvement System (QRIS) Block Grant. 102. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $645,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to support workload related to implementing Classroom Assessments Scoring System (CLASS) for all California State Preschool Program (CSPP) providers. 103. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $740,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to support workload associated with implementing the requirements of Chapter 915 of the Statutes of 2022 which revised provisions related to the suspension and expulsion of children from the CSPP and increased the requirements for early childhood mental health consultation services. 104. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,932,000 and 9.0 positions are provided to support workload associated with collecting student and teacher level data from California State Preschool Programs (CSPPs) that are operated by a local educational agency pursuant to Chapter 901 of the Statutes of 2022. 105. Of the funds provided in Schedule (2), $449,000 is provided in the 2024–25 fiscal year and 3.0 positions, and $164,000 ongoing to support the development of the Whole Child Equity Framework and the Whole Child Community Equity Screening Tool, pursuant to Chapter 699 of the Statutes of 2022. 106. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $138,000 and 1.0 position are provided to the Office of School Transportation for the data processing workload associated with the Home-to-School Transportation program. 107. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $164,000 General Fund and 1.0 position are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division for the additional data processing workload associated with the Home-to-School Transportation program. 108. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,316,000 and 7.0 positions are provided to support improved Teacher Assignment Monitoring Outcomes data collection and reporting through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System and partnership with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing and the California Statewide Assignment Accountability System. 109. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $300,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to the Analysis, Measurement and Accountability Reporting Division for workload related to the California School Dashboard state indicator data and the timelines associated with the collection of data through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System. 110. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $473,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services and Curriculum Frameworks and Instruction Resources Divisions, for workload related to the implementation of Proposition 28, and schoolsite level data collection workload related to the equity multiplier allocation. 111. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $380,000 is available on an ongoing basis for warranty support for network equipment and to upgrade server software at the State Special Schools and Diagnostic Centers. 113. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (5), $152,000 is provided to support the State Department of Education’s Broadband Coordinator position. 114. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $321,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support new ongoing workload associated with the implementation of Chapter 342 of the Statutes of 2023. 115. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $392,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support new ongoing workload associated with the implementation of Chapter 229 of the Statutes of 2023. 116. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $102,000 is available for the 2025–26 fiscal year to support 1.0 existing position to convene the Classified Employee Staffing Ratio Workgroup, pursuant to Chapter 364 of the Statutes of 2023. 117. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), 1.0 position, and $182,000 ongoing are provided to support new ongoing workload associated with the implementation of Chapter 435 of the Statutes of 2023. 118. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $57,000 is provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year on a one-time basis to support temporary workload associated with developing evidence-based best practices for extreme weather guidance and safety on school campuses pursuant to Chapter 463 of the Statutes of 2024. 119. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $77,000 is provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year on a one-time basis to support temporary workload associated with updating guidelines, trainings and other resources for School Food Authorities as it relates to newly prohibited substances and food dye information pursuant to Chapter 914 of the Statutes of 2024. 120. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $328,000 is provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year, of which $164,000 is one-time to support the temporary workload with developing the statewide English Learner Roadmap Policy and $164,000 and 1.0 position is ongoing to support the statewide implementation of the English Learner Roadmap Policy pursuant to Chapter 946 of the Statutes of 2024. 121. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,000,000 is provided on a one-time basis for attorney fees associated with the Cayla J. v. State of California settlement. 122. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $730,000 is provided on a one-time basis in the 2025–26 fiscal year to support acquisition of a vendor contract to design and develop a replacement Principal Apportionment Application, and $541,000 and 3.0 permanent positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division in the 2025–26 fiscal year, of which $538,000 is ongoing to facilitate the migration to the new application, ongoing maintenance, operation, and programming updates. 123. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,437,000 and 9.0 positions are available to support the development of an updated Form J-90 and associated data collection, pursuant to Chapter 345 of the Statutes of 2024, in the 2025–26 fiscal year. $1,408,000 and 9.0 positions shall be available for this purpose in the 2026–27 fiscal year, and $1,239,000 and 8.0 positions shall be available for this purpose in the 2027–28 fiscal year, and ongoing. 124. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $141,000 and 1.0 position are available to support ongoing workload associated with the District of Choice program. 125. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $150,000 in reimbursements is provided on a one-time basis to fund an independent cybersecurity assessment at the state special schools and diagnostic centers. 126. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $500,000 in reimbursement authority is provided on a one-time basis for the 2025–26 fiscal year to support monitoring of nonpublic agencies. 127. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $385,000 is available to support the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer Program. 128. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $437,000 in reimbursements is provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year to expend the fees collected from publishers for instructional materials adoptions. 129. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,092,000 and 8.0 positions are available to support the California State Preschool Program in the 2025–26 fiscal year and ongoing. 130. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $380,000 in reimbursement authority is provided to support the implementation of the requirements of Section 33319.6 of the Education Code. SEC. 196. Item 6100-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 6100-001-6093—For support of State Department of Education, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 1,050,000 Schedule: (1) 5205010 - Curriculum Services ........................ 1,050,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are available contingent upon the enactment of Assembly Bill 1486 of the 2025–26 Regular Session. SEC. 197. Item 6100-001-8141 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 6100-001-8141—For support of State Department of Education, payable from the Electronic Cigarette Settlements Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 5205026-Tobacco Use Prevention and Reduction Program ........................ 0 SEC. 198. Item 6100-101-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 6100-101-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education ........................ 750,000 Schedule: (1) 5200115—School Improvement Activities ........................ 750,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this Item, $500,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis to the Career Technical Education Foundation of Sonoma County to support the North Bay Construction Corps Mendocino Willits Cohort. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this Item, $250,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis to the Ukiah Unified School District to support the outdoor modernization project at the Grace Hudson Language Academy. SEC. 199. Item 6100-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 6100-101-6093—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 13,838,000 Schedule: (1) 5205223 – Supplemental Grants ........................ 13,838,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available to the State Department of Education, in consultation with the Department of Food and Agriculture, for grants to public postsecondary educational institutions that are designated as Agricultural Experiment Stations or Agricultural Research Institutes, to develop research farms to improve climate resiliency. 2. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and liquidation until June 30, 2031, and are available contingent upon the enactment of Assembly Bill 1486 of the 2025–26 Regular Session. SEC. 200. Item 6100-101-8141 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-101-8141—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Electronic Cigarette Settlements Fund ........................ 3,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5205026-Tobacco Use Prevention and Reduction Program ........................ 3,000,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this Item shall be used to support youth education and outreach activities related to tobacco prevention including the Youth Vaping Alternative Prevention Education, the Stanford Tobacco Prevention Toolkit, mass mailings to families in California with student-aged children, and expansion of the Rural Initiative grant program. 2. Funds appropriated in this Item shall be available for expenditure or encumbrance until June 30, 2028. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, upon the order of the Department of Finance, up to $300,000 may be transferred to Item 6100-001-8141 to support state-level activities and administration related to tobacco prevention. SEC. 201. Item 6100-110-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-110-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), Expanded Learning Opportunities Program ........................ 4,606,827,000 Schedule: (1) 5200010-School Apportionment ........................ 4,606,827,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be allocated to school districts and charter schools to increase access to comprehensive before school or after school and intersessional expanded learning opportunities, in addition to expanded learning opportunities on nonschooldays pursuant to Section 46120 of the Education Code. 2. It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies that receive funding from this item pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Education Code Section 46120 have a per-unit rate of no less than $1,575. SEC. 202. Item 6100-119-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-119-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 827,000 Schedule: (1) 5200137-Title I: Program for Neglected and Delinquent Children ........................ 827,000 SEC. 203. Item 6100-125-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-125-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 281,579,000 Schedule: (1) 5200111-Title I, Elementary and Secondary Education Act, Migrant Education ........................ 116,553,000 (2) 5205015-ESEA Title I, Migrant Education State Level Activities ........................ 13,261,000 (3) 5205019-Title III, Language Acquisition ........................ 151,765,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), the State Department of Education shall use no less than $6,500,000 and up to $8,000,000 for the Mini-Corps Program. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $7,526,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support the existing program. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $6,998,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support the existing program. SEC. 204. Item 6100-134-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-134-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 2,482,363,000 Schedule: (1) 5200103-Statewide System of School Support ........................ 5,000,000 (2) 5200135-Title I, Elementary and Secondary Education Act ........................ 2,314,245,000 (3) 5200120-Title IV, Student Support and Academic Enrichment ........................ 163,118,000 Provisions: 1. In administering the accountability system required by this item, the State Department of Education shall align the forms, processes, and procedures required of local educational agencies so that duplication of effort is minimized at the local level. 2. The State Department of Education shall provide to the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance a letter by April 15, of each year, reporting expenditures and anticipated savings for each schedule, based on available information. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be considered offsetting revenues within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code for any reimbursable mandated cost claim for activities that result from implementation of the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). Local educational agencies accepting funding from this item shall reduce any estimated and actual mandate reimbursement claims by the amount of funding provided to them from this item. 4. The State Department of Education shall submit an expenditure plan prior to the expenditure of funds to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee that includes the use of federal funds pursuant to the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 5. As a condition of receipt of funds appropriated in this item, the local educational agency’s plan for use of federal funds required pursuant to Section 1112 of Part A of Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6312) shall be approved by the State Board of Education. Approval of such plans shall be contingent on the local educational agency’s demonstration that its planned use of the federal funds will supplement and enhance local priorities or initiatives funded with state funds, as reflected in the local educational agency’s local control and accountability plan. 6. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), no less than $147,214,000 is available for purposes of providing grants to local educational agencies with schools identified as requiring support, consistent with the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). The State Department of Education shall develop and administer a process for providing grants from these funds on a formula basis to local educational agencies with schools identified as requiring support. Local educational agencies shall use the funds for the development of strategies to improve pupil performance at schools identified as requiring support that are aligned to goals, actions, and services identified in the local educational agency’s local control and accountability plan. Such funds shall not be expended to hire additional permanent staff. 7. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be allocated to county offices of education for the purposes of supporting development and implementation of comprehensive support and improvement (CSI) plans in coordination with the statewide system support for local educational agencies established in the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). The State Department of Education shall develop, in consultation with the Executive Director of the State Board of Education and with the approval of the Department of Finance, the method of allocation for these funds, which shall be based on a formula that considers the number of schools within a county that are identified for additional support consistent with the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 8. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) are available on a one-time basis, and shall be used in accordance with Part A of Title IV of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 9. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be allocated to local educational agencies pursuant to Section 4105 of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 7115), as reauthorized by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 10. For purposes of performing the calculation to ensure that no less than 95 percent of the state’s reserve is being allocated as grants to local educational agencies, pursuant to Section 1003 of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95), the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) and the amount specified in Provision 6 shall be added together. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $5,000,000 shall be allocated to county offices of education for the purposes of review and approval of comprehensive support and improvement (CSI) plans through the CSI prompts in the local control and accountability plan. The method of allocation shall be the same as the one developed and approved pursuant to Provision 7. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $70,000,000 is provided in one-time federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95), Title I, carryover funds to support the existing program. 13. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $5,000,000 is provided in one-time federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95), Title IV, carryover funds to support the existing program. SEC. 205. Item 6100-136-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-136-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 15,014,000 Schedule: (1) 5200139-McKinney-Vento Homeless Children Education ........................ 15,014,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $668,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support the existing program. SEC. 206. Item 6100-137-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-137-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 5,507,000 Schedule: (1) 5205023-Rural and Low-Income Schools Grant ........................ 5,507,000 SEC. 207. Item 6100-156-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-156-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 126,204,000 Schedule: (1) 5200162-Adult Education ........................ 126,204,000 Provisions: 1. The State Department of Education shall reimburse claims on a quarterly basis from qualifying community-based organizations that provide adult basic education under this item. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, all nonlocal educational agencies (non-LEAs) expending greater than $1,000,000 in a fiscal year pursuant to this item shall submit an annual organizational audit, as specified, to the State Department of Education, Office of External Audits. All audits shall be performed by one of the following: (1) a certified public accountant possessing a valid license to practice within California, (2) a member of the department’s staff of auditors, or (3) in-house auditors, if the entity receiving funds pursuant to this item is a public agency, and if the public agency has internal staff that performs auditing functions and meets the tests of independence found in Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States. The audit shall be in accordance with State Department of Education audit guidelines and the Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards (2 C.F.R. Part 200). Non-LEA entities receiving funds pursuant to this item shall submit the annual audit no later than six months from the end of the agency fiscal year. If, for any reason, the contract is terminated during the contract period, the audit shall cover the period from the beginning of the contract through the date of termination. Non-LEA entities receiving funds pursuant to this item shall be held liable for all department costs incurred in obtaining an independent audit if the contractor fails to produce or submit an acceptable audit. 3. The State Department of Education shall continue to ensure that outcome measures for State Department of State Hospitals and State Department of Developmental Services clients are set at a level where these clients will continue to be eligible for adult education services in the current fiscal year and beyond to the full extent authorized under federal law. The State Department of Education shall also consult with the State Department of State Hospitals, State Department of Developmental Services, and Department of Finance for this purpose. 4. When the State Department of Education Request for Application (RFA) is publicly available, the RFA for these funds shall include the incorporation of core federal performance metrics, including placement in postsecondary education, transition into employment, and retention of employment included in the performance targets of participating agencies. The RFA shall also request information regarding the extent to which applicants are coordinating services as part of consortia established pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 84830) of Chapter 5 of Part 50 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code and indicate that priority will be given to applicants that provide evidence of demonstrated effectiveness through performance data on its record of improving skills of eligible individuals, particularly those who have low levels of literacy. The Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act California state plan shall serve as the source document of the RFA. 5. Of the funds appropriated in this item $16,000,000 in one-time federal carryover is available to support the existing program. SEC. 208. Item 6100-161-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-161-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund, Special Education Programs for Exceptional Children ........................ 1,478,647,000 Schedule: (1) 5200203-Local Agency Entitlements, IDEA Special Education ........................ 1,327,839,000 (2) 5200209-State Level Activities, IDEA Special Education ........................ 91,617,000 (3) 5200211-Preschool Grant Program, IDEA Special Education ........................ 40,452,000 (4) 5200213-State Improvement Grant, IDEA Special Education ........................ 2,444,000 (5) 5200215-Family Empowerment Centers, IDEA Special Education ........................ 16,197,000 (6) 5205231-Supplemental Grants: Newborn Hearing Screening Grants ........................ 98,000 Provisions: 1. In accordance with federal law, the funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be distributed to local and state agencies on the basis of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) permanent formula. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $1,950,000 shall be used to develop and test procedures, materials, and training for alternative dispute resolution in special education. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3) for the Preschool Grant Program, $1,228,000 shall be used for in-service training and shall include a parent training component and may, in addition, include a staff training program. These funds may be used to provide training in alternative dispute resolution and the local mediation of disputes. This program shall include state sponsored and local components. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,120,000 is available for local assistance grants to monitor local educational agency compliance with state and federal laws and regulations governing special education. This funding level is to be used to continue the facilitated reviews and, to the extent consistent with State Performance Plan/Annual Performance Report Indicators developed by the State Department of Education, these activities shall focus on local educational agencies identified by the United States Department of Education’s Office of Special Education Programs. Of this amount, no less than $1,400,000 shall be used for the Supporting Inclusive Practices Grant. 5. The funds appropriated in Schedule (5) shall be used for the purposes of Family Empowerment Centers on Disability pursuant to Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021. 6. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $69,000,000 shall be available only for the purpose of providing educationally related mental health services, including out-of-home residential services for emotionally disturbed pupils, required by an individualized education program pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and as described in Section 56363 of the Education Code. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate these funds to local educational agencies based upon an equal rate per pupil using the methodology specified in Section 56836.07 of the Education Code. 7. The funds appropriated in Schedule (4) are provided for scientifically based professional development as part of the State Personnel Development grant. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (4), $356,000 is available in one-time carryover funds. 8. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $3,894,000 shall be available for transfer to the state special schools for student transportation allowances. 9. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $3,861,000 in federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) funds shall be available for the State Department of Education to provide accessible instructional materials to local educational agencies. 10. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $500,000 is provided to develop resources and provide technical assistance to local educational agencies for implementation of the State Systemic Improvement Plan. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), no less than $500,000 shall be used for the Supporting Inclusive Practices Grant. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $8,250,000 is available in one-time carryover funds. 13. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $6,000,000 is available in one-time carryover funds for the State Performance Plan Technical Assistance Project. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2028. 14. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,750,000 is available in one-time carryover funds for the expansion and increased resources of the California Technical Assistance Network. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2028. 15. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $542,000 is provided in fiscal years 2025–26 and 2026–27 for the expansion of the California Technical Assistance Network servers and optimization of search capabilities. 16. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (5), $2,165,000 is available in one-time carryover funds. SEC. 209. Item 6100-194-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-194-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education, for allocation by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to school districts, county offices of education, and other agencies for the California State Preschool Program and other preschool programs included in this item, in lieu of the amount that otherwise would be appropriated pursuant to any other statute ........................ 1,022,262,000 Schedule: (1) 5210027-State Preschool Non-Local Educational Agencies ........................ 1,022,262,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, families shall be disenrolled from subsidized childcare services consistent with the priorities for services specified in Sections 8210 and 8211 of the Education Code. Families shall be disenrolled in the following order: (a) families with the highest income below 85 percent of the State Median Income (SMI) adjusted for family size, (b) of families with the same income level, those that have been receiving childcare services for the longest period of time, (c) of families with the same income level, those that have a child with exceptional needs, and (d) families with children who are receiving child protective services or are at risk of being neglected or abused, regardless of family income. 2. Funds in Schedule (1) shall be allocated to both the part-day and full-day California State Preschool Program for nonlocal educational agencies. 3. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item that have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize a cash loan from the General Fund for cashflow purposes, in an amount not to exceed $20,000,000, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from a delay in the receipt of reimbursements from the California State Preschool Program or the general childcare program funds. (b) The loan is for a short-term need and shall be repaid within 90 days of the loan’s origination date. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to Section 16314 of the Government Code. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $312,000 is available for funding a tool to strengthen teacher-child interactions and support quality improvement. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $14,041,000 is available for the family fee policy to reduce childcare fees to 1 percent of monthly income for families with adjusted monthly income at or above 75 percent of the state median family income pursuant to Section 8252 of the Education Code. 7. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $35,135,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to augment their contracts due to projected increases in the number of three-year-old children served. 8. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $10,172,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors as an increase to their cost of care reimbursement rates. 9. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,730,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to assist local contractors with the implementation of Prospective Pay. Expenditures for this purpose shall be exempt from the administrative costs limit set forth in Section 8258 of the Education Code. 10. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $336,000 is available on a one-time basis for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to assist local contractors with automation related to Prospective Pay. Expenditures for this purpose shall be exempt from the administrative costs limit set forth in Section 8258 of the Education Code. 11. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $15,568,000 is available on a one-time basis, to provide per-child stabilization payments to support California State Preschool providers. SEC. 210. Item 6100-195-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-195-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, Part A of Title II of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6621 et seq.; Preparing, Training, and Recruiting High Quality Teachers, Principals or Other School Leaders), payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 229,028,000 Schedule: (1) 5205168-Supporting Effective Instruction Local Grants ........................ 212,590,000 (2) 5205150-California Subject Matter Projects ........................ 3,410,000 (3) 5205180-Supporting Effective Instruction State Level Activity Grants ........................ 13,028,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be transferred to the University of California, which shall use the funds for the subject matter projects pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 99200) of Chapter 5 of Part 65 of Division 14 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $12,828,000 in ongoing federal funds shall be used to support the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy pursuant to Section 44690 of the Education Code. Specifically, this amount reflects $7,523,000 in ongoing federal Title II funds, and $5,305,000 in ongoing federal Title IV funds, transferred to Title II, consistent with the California State Plan adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to the Every Student Succeeds Act. This program shall be implemented pursuant to Title II of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6601 et seq.) and consistent with the statewide system of support pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $200,000 is available from federal Title II funds for the State Department of Education to contract with the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence to assist the State Department of Education in administering the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy. Of these funds, $25,000 shall be for the Marin County Office of Education and $175,000 shall be for the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence to assist the State Department of Education in administering the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy. The collaborative shall participate in selecting grantees, determining allocation of funding, and managing and directing grantees to ensure that grant activities are provided consistent with the statewide system of support pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code. Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 52074 of the Education Code, the State Department of Education, with the support of the Department of General Services, shall enter into a contract with the Marin County Office of Education as the administrative agent no later than August 31, of each year, and complete the transfer of funds to the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence no later than December 15, of each year. SEC. 211. Item 6100-196-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-196-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), for allocation by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to school districts, county offices of education, and other agencies for the purposes of California state preschool programs pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8207) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code funded in this item, in lieu of the amount that otherwise would be appropriated pursuant to any other statute and the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 8337) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code ........................ 1,835,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5210020-State Preschool—​Local Educational Agencies ........................ 1,785,000,000 (2) 5210010-Child Development, Quality Rating Improvement System Grants ........................ 50,000,000 Provisions: 1. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item that have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $5,000,000 is available for the family literacy supplemental grant provided to California state preschool programs pursuant to Section 8221 of the Education Code. 3. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) is available for Quality Rating and Improvement System grants provided to California state preschool programs pursuant to Section 8203.1 of the Education Code. 4. Funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be allocated to both the part-day and full-day California State Preschool Program for local educational agencies. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $763,000 is available for funding a tool to strengthen teacher-child interactions and support quality improvement. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $15,833,000 is available for the family fee policy to reduce childcare fees to 1 percent of monthly income for families with adjusted monthly income at or above 75 percent of the state median family income pursuant to Section 8252 of the Education Code. 7. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $63,475,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to augment their contracts due to projected increases in the number of three-year-old children served. 8. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $19,296,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors as an increase to their cost of care reimbursement rates. 9. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $5,720,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to assist local contractors with the implementation of Prospective Pay. Expenditures for this purpose shall be exempt from the administrative costs limit set forth in Section 8258 of the Education Code. 10. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $704,000 is available on a one-time basis for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to assist local contractors with automation related to Prospective Pay. Expenditures for this purpose shall be exempt from the administrative costs limit set forth in Section 8258 of the Education Code. 11. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $37,014,000 is available on a one-time basis, to provide per-child stabilization payments to support California State Preschool providers. SEC. 212. Item 6100-197-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-197-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund, 21st Century Community Learning Centers Program ........................ 300,050,000 Schedule: (1) 5210050-21st Century Community Learning Centers ........................ 300,050,000 Provisions: 1. For the 2025–26 fiscal year, the daily per pupil funding provided to local educational agencies participating in the 21st Century Community Learning Centers Program shall be $10.18. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $145,500,000 in federal carryover is provided on a one-time basis to support the existing 21st Century Community Learning Centers Program. SEC. 213. Item 6100-220-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-220-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program ........................ 90,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5205042-Summer Assistance Program ........................ 90,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be used for the Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program as specified in Section 45500 of the Education Code. 2. The funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30,2027. SEC. 214. Item 6100-488 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-488—Reappropriation, State Department of Education. Notwithstanding any other law, the balances from the following appropriations are available for reappropriation for the purposes specified in the provisions below: 0001—​General Fund (1) $200,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Special Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-161-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (2) $15,166,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California State Preschool Program in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-196-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (3) $3,651,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for After School Programs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-149-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (4) $1,169,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for charter school apportionments in Chapter 48 of the Statutes of 2023. (5) $5,040,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Child Nutrition Programs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-203-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (6) $1,200,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Special Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-161-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (7) $1,697,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Special Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs in Schedule (1) of item 6100-161-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (8) $691,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-168-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (9) $11,218,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Child Nutrition Programs in Schedule (1) of item 6100-203-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (10) $46,078,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program in Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021. (11) $60,000,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program in Schedule (1) of item 6100-110-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (12) $1,606,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the K-12 Mandated Programs Block Grant in Schedule (1) of item 6100-296-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (13) $4,000,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Instructional Continuity Best Practices Grant in Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2024. (14) $2,000,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California School for the Deaf in Fremont, in Provision 1 of Item 6100-006-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (15) $5,594,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-220-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (16) $600,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the translation of the digitized state standardized individualized education program template in Chapter 8 of the Statutes of 2025. Provisions: 1. The sum of $19,331,000 is hereby appropriated to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for allocation to school districts and charter schools in the 2023–24 fiscal year pursuant to Section 42238.02 of the Education Code pursuant to the provisions provided in the 2023 Education Omnibus trailer bill for this purpose. 2. The sum of $520,000 is hereby appropriated to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for allocation to local educational agencies for the Student Support and Professional Development Discretionary Block Grant pursuant to provisions provided in the education finance omnibus trailer bill identified in Section 39.00 of this act for this purpose. 3. The sum of $131,865,000 is hereby appropriated to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for allocation to school districts and charter schools in the 2025–26 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (j) of Section 14041.6 of the Education Code. 4. The sum of $2,000,000 of the unexpended balance identified in Schedule (14) is hereby reappropriated to the California School for the Deaf in Fremont for one-time expenditure for the same purposes as funds appropriated for Provision 1 of Item 6100-006-0001 in the Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189 Stats. 2023). 5. The sum of $5,594,000 of the unexpended balance identified in Schedule (15) is hereby reappropriated for the Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program as specified in Section 45500 of the Education Code. These funds shall be available for liquidation through June 30, 2026. 6. The sum of $600,000 of the unexpended balance identified in Schedule (16) is hereby reappropriated to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for allocation to Marin County Office of Education to support the implementation of the requirements of Section 33319.6 of the Education Code. SEC. 215. Item 6120-011-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6120-011-0001—For support of California State Library and California Library Services Board ........................ 28,115,000 Schedule: (1) 5310-State Library Services ........................ 22,751,000 (2) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 2,105,000 (3) 5314-Information Technology Services ........................ 3,559,000 (4) Reimbursements to 5310-State Library Services ........................ −300,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $500,000 shall continue to be provided to the Braille Institute of America in Los Angeles. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $800,000 shall be available on a one-time basis to support Braille Institute programming. SEC. 216. Item 6120-011-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6120-011-0890—For support of California State Library, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 8,506,000 Schedule: (1) 5310-State Library Services ........................ 5,137,000 (2) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 3,078,000 (3) 5314-Information Technology Services ........................ 291,000 SEC. 217. Item 6120-211-0890 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 6120-211-0890—For local assistance, California State Library, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 9,870,000 Schedule: (1) 5312- Library Development Services ........................ 9,870,000 SEC. 218. Item 6120-212-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is repealed. SEC. 219. Item 6120-495 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 6120-495—Reversion, California State Library. As of September 5, 2025, the remaining unliquidated balances specified below of the appropriation provided in the following citation shall revert to the balances in the funds from which the appropriation was made. 0001—General Fund (1) The remaining balance of $68,200,000, appropriated for costs associated with the Statewide Imagination Library in Schedule (1) of Item 6120-161-0001, Budget Act of 2022, (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) as reappropriated by Item 6120-488, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (2) Pursuant to this provision, the California State Library shall recoup unspent funds from contractors or any California nonprofit entities engaged in statewide activities supported by the appropriations cited in Schedule (1). SEC. 220. Item 6360-001-0407 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6360-001-0407—For support of Commission on Teacher Credentialing, payable from the Teacher Credentials Fund ........................ 33,346,000 Schedule: (1) 5381-Preparation and Licensing of Teachers ........................ 19,747,000 (2) 5382-Attorney General Legal Services ........................ 5,400,000 (3) 5383-Accreditation Streamline Project ........................ 310,000 (4) 5399-Administration ........................ 8,214,000 (5) Reimbursements to 5381-Preparation and Licensing of Teachers ........................ −325,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may be increased based on increases in credential applications, increases in first-time credential applications requiring fingerprint clearance, unanticipated costs associated with certificate discipline cases, or unanticipated costs of litigation, subject to approval of the Department of Finance, not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 2. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall submit biannual reports to the chairpersons and vice chairpersons of the budget committees of each house of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance on the minimum, maximum, and average number of days taken to process: (a) renewal and university-recommended credentials, (b) out-of-state and special education credentials, (c) service credentials and supplemental authorizations, (d) adult and career technical education certificates and child center permits, (e) temporary permits for statutory leave and 30-day substitute permits, (f) provisional intern permits, (g) short-term staff permits, and (h) the percentage of renewals and new applications completed online. The report should also include information on the total number of each type of application and the hours of staff time utilized to process the different types of credentials. The biannual reports shall be submitted on October 1 and March 1 of each year, and shall include historical data as well as data from the most recent six months. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $308,000 is provided from federal Title II funds through an interagency agreement with the State Department of Education to support Teacher Misassignment Monitoring, pursuant to Section 44258.9 of the Education Code. These funds shall be used to reimburse county offices of education for costs associated with monitoring public schools and school districts for teacher misassignments. Funds shall be allocated on a basis determined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. Districts and county offices receiving funds for credential monitoring will provide reasonable and necessary information to the commission as a condition of receiving these funds. 4. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall submit biannual reports to the chairpersons and vice chairpersons of the budget committees of each house of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance on the workload of the Division of Professional Practices (DPP) and the status of the teacher misconduct caseload. The report shall include information on the DPP’s workload and the timeliness of completing key steps in reviewing teacher misconduct cases that are under the control of the commission. The workload report shall include the number of cases opened by case type and the average number of days and targets for each key step in the misconduct review process, including: (a) intake of new cases and documents, (b) assignment of cases to staff and gathering of needed documents for investigation, (c) investigation and notification of allegations to individuals charged with an offense, (d) review of cases by the commission, (e) implementation of final discipline decisions by the commission, (f) monitoring during the probationary period, and (g) response to violation of probationary period. The biannual reports shall be submitted by October 1 and March 1 of each year. All reports shall include historical data as well as data from the most recent six months. 5. (a) The Attorney General shall submit a biannual report to the chairpersons and vice chairpersons of the budget committees of each house of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance concerning the status of the teacher misconduct discipline caseload and other cases being handled by the Attorney General for the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. The biannual report shall be submitted by August 30 and February 28 of each year for the previous corresponding fiscal quarters. (b) Each report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following for teacher discipline matters: (1) The number of matters with the Attorney General at the beginning of the reporting period. (2) The number of matters for which further investigation was requested by the Attorney General. (3) The number of matters for which further investigation was received by the Attorney General. (4) The number of matters adjudicated by the Attorney General. (5) The number of matters with the Attorney General at the end of the reporting period. (6) The minimum, maximum, and median number of days from the date the Attorney General receives an accusation or statement of issues referral from the commission to the commencement of a hearing at the Office of Administrative Hearings for cases adjudicated during this period. (c) To determine the average cost of the Attorney General to adjudicate a case representing the commission, each report shall provide the following information for cases adjudicated in the reporting period specified in subdivision (a): (1) The average and median number of hours worked by the staff of the Attorney General to adjudicate accusation and statement of issues matters. (2) The average and median fees charged by the Attorney General to the commission to adjudicate accusation and statement of issues matters. (3) The average and median litigation costs to adjudicate accusation and statement of issues matters. (d) To determine the total activities conducted by the Attorney General to represent the commission for each period, the Attorney General shall report the following: (1) The total hours worked during the period by staff of the Attorney General for representation of the commission in teacher discipline matters. (2) The total fees charged during the period by the Attorney General to the commission for representation in teacher discipline matters. (3) The total hours worked during the period by staff of the Attorney General for representation of the commission unrelated to teacher discipline matters. (4) The total fees charged during the period by the Attorney General to the commission for representation unrelated to teacher discipline matters. (e) This information shall be provided with the intent that recipients shall be able to determine the caseload input and output of the Attorney General in relation to representation of the commission in teacher discipline cases, especially as it relates to determining the average case processing time for accusation and statement of issues representation and adjudication, and proper funding level for handling the teacher discipline caseload and other legal work for the commission. Staff from the Attorney General shall provide timely followup information to staff from the offices identified in subdivision (a) upon request if further explanation or information is required. 6. (a) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing and the State Department of Education (SDE) shall maintain a data-sharing agreement to provide the commission with certificated employee assignment data necessary to annually identify misassignments, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 33126 of the Education Code, at school districts and county offices of education. The data-sharing agreement shall also require the commission to make teacher credential, misassignment, and other relevant data available to the SDE to support federally required reporting consistent with the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95) approved by the State Board of Education. (b) The commission shall use the nonpersonally identifiable educator identification number required by Section 44230.5 of the Education Code for the purpose of sharing data with local educational agencies and the SDE pursuant to this provision. 7. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall submit an annual report to the Department of Finance in September of each year detailing changes to contracts with examination providers, changes in examination fees, teacher examination validation, equating, or alignment studies, and teacher examination development conducted during the previous fiscal year. 8. Funds appropriated in Schedule (2) may be used to fund costs incurred from the administration and adjudication of cases, which include court reporter fees and representation from the Attorney General and the administrative hearing process through the Office of Administrative Hearings. 9. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $583,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support Teacher Performance Assessment Workgroup activities, pursuant to Chapter 889 of the Statutes of 2024. 10. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,101,000 is available on a one-time basis to support the Commission on Teacher Credentialing’s leasing costs at the May Lee State Office Complex. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $253,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support administrative activities. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $412,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support workload related to increased teacher credential application volume. 13. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $130,000 and 1.0 position is available to support workload related to adding supplementary and subject matter authorizations to a teaching credential, pursuant to Chapter 831 of the Statutes of 2024. 14. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $200,000 is available to align state operational costs with current staffing levels. 15. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $455,000, of which $133,000 is available on a one-time basis for purposes of convening a workgroup, and 2.0 positions are to support the Professional Services Division with workload associated with updating and adding a non-teaching pathway to the Administrative Services Credential. 16. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (4), $727,000, of which $717,000 is ongoing beginning in 2026–27, and 4.0 positions are available to support the IT Branch with addressing various IT workload issues. 17. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $422,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support legal staffing needs in the Division of Professional Practices. SEC. 221. Item 6440-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6440-001-0001—For support of University of California ........................ 4,779,991,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 4,779,991,000 Provisions: 1. This appropriation is exempt from Sections 6.00 and 31.00. 2. (a) The Regents of the University of California shall implement measures to reduce the university’s cost structure. (b) The Legislature finds and declares that many state employees hold positions with comparable scope of responsibilities, complexity, breadth of job functions, experience requirements, and other relevant factors to those employees designated to be in the Senior Management Group pursuant to existing Regents Policy. (c) (1) Therefore, at a minimum, the Regents shall, when considering compensation for any employee designated to be in the Senior Management Group, use a market reference zone that includes state employees. (2) At a minimum, the Regents shall include in a market reference zone all comparable positions from the lists included in subdivision (l) of Section 8 of Article III of the California Constitution and Article 1 (commencing with Section 11550) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 2.1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may reduce funds appropriated in this item by an amount equal to the estimated Cal Grant and Middle Class Scholarship Program cost increases caused by a 2025–26 academic year increase in systemwide tuition. No reduction may be authorized pursuant to this provision sooner than 30 days after the Director of Finance provides notice of the intended reduction to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 3. (a) The Controller shall transfer funds from this appropriation upon receipt of a report from the Department of Finance indicating the amount of debt service anticipated to become due and payable in the fiscal year associated with state general obligation bonds issued for university projects. (b) The Controller shall return funds to this appropriation upon receipt of a report from the Department of Finance. 4. Payments made by the state to the University of California for each month from July through April shall not exceed one-twelfth of the amount appropriated in this item, less the amount that is expected to be transferred pursuant to Provision 3. Transfers of funds pursuant to Provision 3 shall not be considered payments made by the state to the university. 5. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $15,800,000 shall be available to support meal donation programs, food pantries serving students, CalFresh enrollment, and other means of directly providing nutrition assistance to students. All monetary assistance provided to students pursuant to this subprovision shall be distributed to the student by the campus financial aid office. The funds described in this subprovision may also be used for any of the following: (1) To assist homeless and housing-insecure students in securing stable housing. (2) To supply students with personal hygiene products. (3) To establish basic-needs centers as a centralized location on campus where students experiencing basic-needs insecurity can be identified, supported, and linked to on- and off-campus resources to support timely program completion. Campus basic-needs centers may use funds for operations of the center. (4) To designate or hire dedicated basic-needs coordinators for the basic-needs centers who will serve as a single point of contact for students. (b) The University of California shall report to the Department of Finance and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by February 1 of each year regarding the use of funds specified in subdivision (a) and Provision 7. The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information for the preceding fiscal year and estimates of all of the following for the current fiscal year: (1) The amount of funds distributed to campuses, and identification of which campuses received funds. (2) For each campus, a programmatic budget summarizing how the funds were spent. The budget shall include any other funding used to supplement the General Fund. (3) A description of the types of programs in which each campus invested. (4) A list of campuses that accept or plan to accept electronic benefits transfer. (5) A list of campuses that participate or plan to participate in the CalFresh Restaurant Meals Program. (5.5) The number of students who first started receiving CalFresh benefits in the preceding year as well as the total number of students in the preceding year receiving CalFresh. (5.8) The number of campuses that have a data-sharing agreement with the relevant county operating the CalFresh program with the purpose of identifying new, continuing, and returning students who are potentially eligible for CalFresh benefits, or efforts underway to enact such an agreement. (6) A list of campuses that offer or plan to offer emergency housing or assistance with long-term housing arrangements. (7) A description of how campuses leveraged or coordinated with other state or local resources to address housing and food insecurity, and student mental health. (7.1) The number of students receiving mental health services on campus, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, age group, and type of service received. (7.2) The average wait time for initial routine mental health counseling appointments. (7.3) The average number of campus mental health counseling appointments per student. (7.4) The number of students referred to off-campus providers for mental health services. (7.5) The number of student mental health staff by provider type and the counselor-to-student ratio. (7.6) Total spending on student mental health services, by fund source, including spending covered by insurance providers. (8) An analysis describing how funds reduced food insecurity and homelessness among students, increased student mental health, and, if feasible, how funds impacted student outcomes such as persistence or completion. (9) Other findings and best practices implemented by campuses. 6. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $21,300,000 shall be available to increase student mental health resources. 7. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,700,000 shall be available to support rapid rehousing efforts assisting homeless and housing-insecure students. All monetary assistance to students shall be distributed to the student by the campus financial aid office. (b) Campuses shall establish ongoing partnerships with community organizations that have a tradition of helping populations experiencing homelessness to provide wraparound services and rental subsidies for students. Funds appropriated in this item may be used for, but authorized uses are not limited to, the following activities: (1) Connecting students with community case managers who have knowledge and expertise in accessing safety net resources. (2) Establishing ongoing emergency housing procedures, including on-campus and off-campus resources. (3) Providing emergency grants that are necessary to secure housing or to prevent the imminent loss of housing. (c) Funding shall be allocated to campuses based on demonstrated need. (d) The terms “homeless” and “housing insecure” shall be defined as students who lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. This includes students who are: (1) Sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason. (2) Living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping grounds due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations. (3) Living in emergency or transitional shelters. (4) Abandoned in hospitals. (5) Living in a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings. (6) Living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings. (e) The University of California shall submit a report to the Director of Finance and, in conformity with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature by February 1 of each year regarding the use of these funds, for the preceding fiscal year and estimates for the current fiscal year, for information including the number of coordinators hired, number of students served by campus, distribution of funds by campus, a description of the types of programs funded, and other relevant outcomes, such as the number of students that were able to secure permanent housing, and whether students receiving support remained enrolled at the institution or graduated. This report may be submitted jointly with other basics needs reporting due to the Legislature. 8. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $12,900,000 shall be available to support and expand existing UC Programs in Medical Education and to establish a new UC Program in Medical Education focused on Native American communities. These funds may also be available to establish additional UC Programs in Medical Education that are state priorities. The University of California is encouraged to use these funds to support UC Programs in Medical Education that would serve underrepresented areas of the state. (b) One-third of the funds appropriated in this provision shall be used to augment need-based financial aid for UC Programs in Medical Education students. (c) The University of California shall report the following information about UC Programs in Medical Education program outcomes to the Department of Finance and the Legislature annually by March 1, until March 1, 2027: (1) Enrollment numbers and student demographics in each program. (2) A summary of each program’s current curriculum. (3) Graduation and residency placement rates for each program. (4) To the extent feasible, postgraduate data on where each program’s graduates currently practice and the extent to which they serve the populations and communities targeted by the program in which they participated. 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,823,000 shall be used for legal services for undocumented and immigrant students, faculty, and staff. 10. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,000,000, of which $1,000,000 is available on a one-time basis for the 2025–26 fiscal year, shall be used for the University of California Firearm Violence Research Center. It is the intent of the Legislature that these funds be directly allocated by the University of California to the University of California Firearm Violence Research Center, and that the University of California and the University of California, Davis, campus shall not assess administrative costs or charges against these funds. 11. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be used for the Institute on Global Conflict and Cooperation. 12. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,000,000 shall be used by the University of California to provide summer-term financial aid to any student who is eligible for state financial aid and is a California resident, including students receiving an exemption for nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 of the Education Code. These funds shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing funds provided by the University of California for summer-term financial aid. The Legislature finds and declares that this provision is a state law within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code. 13. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support foster youth programs pursuant to Section 92663 of the Education Code. 14. By November 1 each year, the University of California shall report key information regarding UCPath to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. At a minimum, the report shall include UCPath’s staffing levels, funding by source, and spending by function. The funding source data shall summarize fund sources used by campuses to cover any campus assessment. The report shall include actual data for the prior fiscal year, budgeted data for the current fiscal year, and projected data for the coming fiscal year. The report shall include any cost savings resulting from the UCPath project at the campus level. 15. To provide for legislative oversight, the Office of the President of the University of California shall report to the Legislature and the Department of Finance, by September 30 each year, all of the following information for the preceding fiscal year and estimates of all of the following for the current fiscal year: (a) The amount of any campus assessments charged to support the Office of the President of the University of California, reflecting amounts contributed by each campus and the fund source or sources from which those amounts were paid. (b) The total budget of the Office of the President of the University of California. (c) A categorized list of actual and planned budgetary expenditures for the Office of the President of the University of California. (d) Factors contributing to any year-over-year change in the budget of the Office of the President of the University of California. (e) The amount of the budget of the Office of the President of the University of California that either passes through to recipients across the state or supports fee-for-service activities aligned with the university’s mission. (f) Information on reserves and fund balances held by the Office of the President of the University of California. 16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $650,000 shall be available to support the integration of Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities members onto the ASSIST platform. 17. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support the California Vectorborne Disease Surveillance Gateway. 18. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,000,000 shall be available to the University of California on an ongoing basis for disbursement to all undergraduate-serving University of California campuses, after consultation with Underground Scholars directors and coordinators, to establish and sustain Underground Scholars programs as a centralized location on campus where incarcerated, formerly incarcerated, and system-impacted students can be provided with recruitment programs, retention services, advocacy, and wellness programs to support admission to the University of California system and timely program completion. Campuses shall share best practices for program operations annually with other University of California campuses for purposes of developing spending plans to serve incarcerated, formerly incarcerated, and system-impacted students. Each undergraduate-serving University of California campus shall have one or more dedicated Underground Scholars directors and coordinators who will serve as a point of contact for students. 19. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis for the University of California to establish and operate student services programs on each campus to serve undocumented students. 20. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $22,500,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support Student Academic Preparation and Educational Partnerships programs. 21. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $75,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support the University of California, Los Angeles Anderson School of Management to include climate change economic impacts by California region in the UCLA Anderson Forecast economic forecasting model for California. 22. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $21,000,000 shall be available to the University of California to support UC Medical School Projects at UC Merced and UC Riverside. 23. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $13,000,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support research, education, and public engagement on labor issues in California. The funds shall be allocated as follows: (a) $3,000,000 to the University of California, Berkeley Labor Center. (b) $3,000,000 to the University of California, Los Angeles Labor Center. (c) $3,000,000 to the University of California, Merced Community and Labor Center. (d) $500,000 to the University of California, Berkeley Labor Occupational Health Program. (e) $500,000 to the University of California, Los Angeles Labor Occupational Safety and Health Program. (f) $3,000,000 to be allocated to support a multicampus initiative as determined by a five-member committee comprising the directors of the centers specified in subprovisions (a), (b), and (c), or their designees, as well as two members appointed by the California Federation of Labor. The committee shall allocate these funds based on proposals submitted by the University of California’s Davis, Irvine, Riverside, San Diego, Santa Barbara, and Santa Cruz campuses. The committee shall determine the criteria and timeline to submit proposals, as well as how to allocate funds among eligible proposals. 24. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $49,701,000 ongoing General Fund moneys shall be allocated to support approved UC Higher Education Student Housing Grant Program projects. 25. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $33,300,000 ongoing General Fund moneys shall be allocated to support UC Merced and UC Riverside Campus Expansion Project and the UC Berkeley Clean Energy Campus Project. 26. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 ongoing General Fund moneys shall be allocated to support the UC Riverside School of Medicine. 27. It is the intent of the Legislature to defer an ongoing base increase of $240,773,000 from 2025–26, as follows: (a) In 2026–27, $96,309,000 of the 2025–26 compact payment will be provided on an ongoing basis. In 2027–28, a one-time back payment of $240,773,000 will be made for the deferral made in 2025–26. In 2028–29, the remaining $144,464,000 of the compact payment originally scheduled for 2026–27 will be provided on an ongoing basis. 28. It is the intent of the Legislature to defer $129,692,000 one-time from the General Fund from 2025–26 until 2026–27. 29. For 2025–26, the Director of Finance may authorize a no-interest, short-term loan from General Fund resources, upon the request of the University of California, to assist cash flow resources for purposes of remediating state payment deferrals. (a) A loan may be authorized pursuant to this section no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time that notification the chairperson of that joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 30. (a) As specified in Section 93000 of the Education Code, it is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California replace an additional 902 nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent students annually from 2022‒23 through 2026‒27 with an equal number of resident undergraduate full-time equivalent students combined at the Berkeley, Los Angeles, and San Diego campuses. The total combined annual replacement of nonresident students should be 902 full-time equivalent students, with Berkeley, Los Angeles, and San Diego each contributing towards the 902 full-time equivalent student replacement total annually. If the University of California replaces more than 902 nonresident undergraduate full-time students in the 2025‒26 enrollment target, those additional students can be counted towards the 2026‒27 target. Nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent student replacement above that annual 902 target from 2022–23, 2023–24, and 2024–25 can be counted towards the replacement of 902 nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent students in 2025–26. (b) If the actual reduction in nonresident undergraduate enrollment in 2025‒26 at these campuses is fewer than 902 full-time equivalent students, the Director of Finance shall reduce funding for the University of California by the portion of the appropriation in the deferred allocation that is attributable to each student under the target reduction level, as specified in Section 93000 of the Education Code. (c) It is the intent of the Legislature to defer ongoing nonresident replacement funding of $31,000,000 from 2025–26 to 2026–27. In 2027–28, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide a one-time back payment of $31,000,000. 31. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California shall increase resident undergraduate enrollment by 2,947 full-time equivalent students (FTES) in 2025–26 over the estimated 2024–25 baseline level of 206,588 FTES to a total enrollment of 209,535. (b) If the University of California enrolls fewer resident undergraduate FTES than specified in subdivision (a), the Director of Finance may reduce funding proportional to each student under the specified level. Funding shall be reduced at the 2025–26 state marginal cost rate of $11,640 per FTES. If the University of California enrolls more resident undergraduate FTES than specified in subdivision (a), those additional students will be counted towards the 2026–27 target. (c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California also increase resident undergraduate enrollment by 2,968 FTES in 2026–27, for a total level of 212,503 resident undergraduate FTES in 2026–27. (d) The systemwide growth identified in this provision is inclusive of the additional 902 resident undergraduate FTES resulting from the replacement of nonresident undergraduate FTES identified in Provision 30 of this item. 32. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support students with disabilities. This funding shall supplement, not supplant, core funds the University of California spends to support these students. The University of California shall allocate these funds to campuses based upon their number of students with disabilities. Campuses shall use these funds to improve services for these students, with a focus on increasing the number of professional staff serving them, thereby reducing their associated caseload. 33. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 ongoing General Fund shall be available to support the University of California, Los Angeles Ralph J. Bunche Center for African American Studies. 34. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $430,000 ongoing General Fund shall be available to support the California Newspaper Projects at the University of California, Riverside. 35. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $15,000,000 shall be provided on a one-time basis to the Journalism Fellowship Program at the University of California, Berkeley. (b) The University of California, Berkeley, may use up to 5 percent of this allocation to administer the program. 36. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 one-time General Fund shall be available on a one-time basis to support the Cal-Bridge Initiative. These funds can be used to support fellowships, undergraduate research, salaries and benefits for post doctoral students, scholarships for students prior to their first Ph.D. year, faculty professional development, and administration of the program. 37. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,800,000, one-time General Fund, shall be available to expand the University of California, Los Angeles First Star Foster Youth Program and to establish at least one additional First Star Foster Youth Cohort at University of California campuses to be selected through a competitive grant process by the Office of the President of the University of California. When selecting the participating campuses, the Office of the President shall consider, at least, the following factors: the foster youth population density around each proposed campus location, possible partnerships with other organizations assisting the foster youth population, public transportation accessibility, and ability to leverage other funding sources or in-kind resources to support program implementation. 38. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California, San Diego, to develop a bachelor's degree program in public health in South San Diego. 39. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $750,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California, Los Angeles, to research social media. 40. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,800,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California, San Francisco, to establish a dentistry pilot program. 41. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California menopause programs. Funds shall be distributed to University of California academic health centers for the establishment or expansion of a menopause program. Each participating campus shall collaborate to ensure standardization and each program shall be modeled after the existing UCLA Comprehensive Menopause Program and under the direction of a menopause expert. Funds shall be used to facilitate the specialized care and treatment for perimenopause and menopause. 42. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,500,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California, San Diego, for the ALERTCalifornia program. 43. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,600,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California, Office of the President, for campus climate and antidiscrimination efforts. 44. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be made available to support the PRIME Central Coast program at the University of California, Davis School of Medicine, in collaboration with the University of California, Santa Cruz. These funds shall be available for encumbrance and expenditure through July 1, 2030. 45. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,500,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California Institute for Transportation Studies. 46. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 in one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California, Los Angeles Center for Reproductive Health, Law, and Policy. 47. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $250,000 one-time General Fund shall be provided to the City of Chula Vista for purposes of establishing the South County Higher Education Planning Task Force to develop governance and financing structures for a mixed-use intersegmental education facility in the City of Chula Vista. SEC. 222. Item 6610-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6610-001-0001—For support of California State University ........................ 4,965,068,000 Schedule: (1) 5560-Support ........................ 4,965,068,000 Provisions: 1. This appropriation is exempt from Sections 6.00 and 31.00. 2. (e) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,500,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support the estimated costs of an expanded fee waiver for Medal of Honor recipients, children of Medal of Honor recipients, and dependents of service-injured veterans attending the California State University. (f) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $12,000,000 shall be available to support foster youth programs pursuant to Section 89348 of the Education Code. 2.1. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $15,800,000 shall be available to increase student mental health resources. (b) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $26,300,000 is available for the Graduation Initiative to sustain and expand the California State University Basic Needs Initiative. (c) The California State University shall report to the Department of Finance and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by March 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, regarding the use of funds specified in subdivisions (a) and (b). The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information: (1) The amount of funds distributed to campuses, and identification of which campuses received funds. (2) For each campus, a programmatic budget summarizing how the funds were spent. The budget shall include any other funding used to supplement the General Fund. (3) A description of the types of programs in which each campus invested. (4) A list of campuses that accept or plan to accept electronic benefits transfer. (5) A list of campuses that participate or plan to participate in the CalFresh Restaurant Meals Program. (5.5) The number of students who first started receiving CalFresh benefits in the preceding year as well as the total number of students in the preceding year receiving CalFresh. (5.8) The number of campuses that have a data-sharing agreement with the relevant county operating the CalFresh program with the purpose of identifying new, continuing, and returning students who are potentially eligible for CalFresh benefits, or efforts underway to enact such an agreement. (6) A list of campuses that offer or plan to offer emergency housing or assistance with long-term housing. (6.1) The number of students receiving mental health services on campus, disaggregated by race and ethnicity, gender, age group, and type of service received. (6.2) The average wait time for initial routine mental health counseling appointments. (6.3) The average number of campus mental health counseling appointments per student. (6.4) The number of students referred to off-campus providers for mental health services. (6.5) The number of student mental health staff by provider type and the counselor-to-student ratio. (6.6) Total spending on student mental health services, by fund source, including spending covered by insurance providers. (7) A description of how campuses leveraged or coordinated with other state or local resources to address housing and food insecurity and student mental health. (8) An analysis describing how funds reduced food insecurity and homelessness among students, increased student mental health, and, if feasible, how funds impacted student outcomes such as persistence or completion. (9) Other findings and best practices implemented by campuses. 2.2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $25,000,000 is provided to support the transition of Humboldt State University into a polytechnic university. 2.3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $35,000,000 is provided on an ongoing basis to support the Graduation Initiative 2025. This funding shall be used exclusively to support efforts to close equity gaps in graduation rates for low-income students and historically underrepresented students. California State University shall report on the activities it is undertaking to close equity gaps, how it is evaluating the result of these activities, the most important lessons it has learned to date, and what changes it needs to make moving forward to eliminate these gaps. The California State University also shall report systemwide and campus graduation rates for all students, low-income students, and historically underrepresented students, disaggregated by race. All of this information may be included in its annual report required by Section 89295 of the Education Code. 2.35. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to support the Mervyn M. Dymally African American Political and Economic Institute at the California State University, Dominguez Hills. 2.4. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $11,300,000 is provided to support ongoing implementation of the Project Rebound programs for formerly incarcerated students at participating California State University campuses. Funds shall be distributed to campuses using a funding formula that provides campuses with (1) standard baseline operating funds, (2) augmented baseline funding based on matriculated student enrollment headcounts in individual campus programs, and (3) annually recurring equity allocations for student basic needs relative to the indices of student need among program participants in individual campus programs, such as number of Pell Grant recipients, students who have exhausted their lifetime Pell Grant eligibility, students eligible for tuition exemptions pursuant to Chapter 814 of the Statutes of 2001 (Assembly Bill 540 of the 2001–02 Regular Session), and student parents of minor children. Model programming shall incorporate the following program components: (1) Admissions supports, including, but not limited to: (I) permitting eligible students to apply after the application initial filing period, (II) utilizing general exceptions as an educational opportunity program pursuant to Section 40900 of the California Code of Regulations and subdivision (c) of Section 66022.5 of the Education Code; and (III) facilitating the seamless transfer from one California State University to another of students enrolled in California State University degree programs while incarcerated who are released from custody prior to degree completion. (2) Comprehensive support to assist students with the transition to on-campus higher education, including (I) wraparound student support services that address needs such as books and supplies, tuition, scholarships, housing, food, and transportation; and (II) collaboration with offices of financial aid to provide individualized cost of attendance adjustments to minimize the impacts of program basic needs supports on student financial aid eligibility. (3) Staffing and space commitments, including: (I) dedicated staffing of a program coordinator or director, dedicated academic adviser or retention specialist, and student peer navigators with preference for staff with lived experience in the criminal justice system; (II) dedicated space on the university campus for the program that allows for both privacy and community; (III) use of the Federal Work-Study Program to provide eligible students with employment and professional development opportunities; and (IV) formal partnerships with California Community Colleges to build transfer pathways, and with other key stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, probation departments, and community-based organizations. (b) As a condition of receiving the $11,300,000 specified in this provision, the California State University shall, no later than April 1, 2026, and annually each year thereafter, report to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature regarding the California State University’s use of these funds, program enrollment, and student outcomes. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (1) A description of educational and support services each Project Rebound campus provides to students and potential students. (2) A description of outreach, orientation, and transfer support services the Project Rebound Consortium provides to students and potential students in the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. (3) Student enrollment in Project Rebound, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, and age, as well as first-time freshmen, transfer students, undergraduate students, and graduate students, as well as students with prior foster care system involvement, prior juvenile justice involvement, and students that are parents of minor children. (4) Outcomes associated with the program, disaggregated by campus, including, but not limited to, student retention, graduation, and recidivism rates. (5) Any plans to expand Project Rebound to other California State University campuses. 2.45. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to support students with disabilities. This funding shall supplement, not supplant, California State University core expenditures to support these students. The California State University shall allocate these funds to campuses based upon the number of students with disabilities. Campuses shall use these funds to improve services for these students, with a focus on increasing the number of professional staff serving them, thereby reducing their associated caseload. 2.5. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,800,000 shall be available to support rapid rehousing efforts assisting homeless and housing-insecure students. (b) Campuses shall establish ongoing partnerships with community organizations that have a tradition of helping populations experiencing homelessness to provide wraparound services and rental subsidies for homeless and housing-insecure students. Funds appropriated in this item may be used for, but are not limited to, the following authorized activities: (1) Connecting students with community case managers who have knowledge and expertise in accessing safety net resources. (2) Establishing ongoing emergency housing procedures, including on-campus and off-campus resources. (3) Providing emergency grants that are necessary to secure housing or to prevent the imminent loss of housing. (c) Funding shall be allocated to campuses based on demonstrated need. (d) For the purposes of this item, “homeless” and “housing insecure” mean students who lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. This includes students who are: (1) Sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason. (2) Living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping grounds due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations. (3) Living in emergency or transitional shelters. (4) Abandoned in hospitals. (5) Living in a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings. (6) Living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings. (e) The California State University shall annually submit a report to the Director of Finance and, in conformity with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature regarding the use of these funds, including the number of coordinators hired, the number of students served by campus, the distribution of funds by campus, a description of the types of programs funded, and other relevant outcomes, such as the number of students who were able to secure permanent housing, and whether students receiving support remained enrolled at the institution or graduated. 2.6. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be used by the California State University to provide summer-term financial aid to any student who is eligible for state financial aid and who is a California resident, including students who receive an exemption from nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 of the Education Code. These funds shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing funds provided by the California State University for summer-term financial aid. The Legislature finds and declares that this provision is a state law within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code. 2.65. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $8,000,000 is provided on an ongoing basis to support the Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander Student Achievement Program pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 89297) of Chapter 2 of Part 55 of Division 8 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 3. (a) The Controller shall transfer funds from this appropriation as follows: (1) For base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the Department of Finance. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related facility lease or indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and to pay base rental in full when due. (2) For additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $49,000 of the amount appropriated in this item to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. (3) This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. (4) For debt service anticipated to become due and payable in the fiscal year associated with state general obligation bonds issued for university projects upon receipt of any report from the Department of Finance. (b) The Controller shall return funds to this appropriation if directed pursuant to a report from the Department of Finance. 3.1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may reduce funds appropriated in this item by an amount equal to the estimated Cal Grant and Middle Class Scholarship program cost increases caused by a 2025–26 academic year increase in systemwide tuition. A reduction shall not be authorized pursuant to this provision sooner than 30 days after the Director of Finance provides notice of the intended reduction to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 4. Payments made by the state to the California State University for each month from July through April shall not exceed one-twelfth of the amount appropriated in this item, less than the amount that is expected to be transferred pursuant to Provision 3. Transfers of funds pursuant to Provision 3 shall not be considered payments made by the state to the university. 5. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University increase resident undergraduate enrollment by 7,152 full-time equivalent FTES in 2025–26 over the estimated 2024–25 level of 342,847 FTES for total resident undergraduate enrollment of 349,999 FTES in 2025–26 at the California State University. (b) If the California State University enrolls fewer resident undergraduate FTES in 2025–26 than specified in subprovision (a), the Director of Finance may reduce funding proportional to each student under the specified level. Funding shall be reduced at the 2025–26 state marginal cost rate of $10,983 per FTES. (c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University also increase resident undergraduate enrollment in 2026–27. It is the expectation of the Legislature that the California State University increase resident undergraduate enrollment by an additional 10,161 FTES in 2026–27 for total resident undergraduate enrollment of 360,160 FTES. 6. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to defer $143,839,000 one-time General Fund from the 2025–26 fiscal year to the 2026–27 fiscal year. (b) It is the intent of the Legislature to defer an ongoing base increase of $252,255,000 from the 2025–26 fiscal year as follows: (1) In the 2026–27 fiscal year , $100,902,000 of the 2025–26 compact payment will be provided on an ongoing basis. In 2028-29, the remaining $151,353,000 of the 2025–26 compact payment originally scheduled for the 2026–27 fiscal year will be provided on an ongoing basis. In the 2027–28 fiscal year, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide a one-time back payment of $252,255,000 from the deferral made in the 2025–26 fiscal year. 7. For the 2025–26 fiscal year, the Director of Finance may authorize a no-interest short-term loan from General Fund resources, upon request of the university, to assist cash flow resources for purposes of remediating state payment deferrals. A loan may be authorized pursuant to this section not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 8. Each California State University campus that has experienced sustained enrollment declines shall submit a turnaround plan to the California State University Chancellor’s Office by December 31, 2025. Campuses shall consult with the community and campus stakeholders as they prepare the plan. Each turnaround plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: (1) A list of strategies the campus has decided to implement to increase student demand and enrollment; the expected outcomes of each strategy, including any results to date; an implementation timeline for each strategy, including actions taken to date; and the cost of each strategy (one time, ongoing, and total). Comparable information shall also be provided for any other strategies that the campus is seriously considering to increase its enrollment, even if the campus has not yet finalized or begun implementing them. (2) Enrollment projections for each of the next five years. (3) A list of cost-saving strategies the campus has decided to implement; the amount of associated savings (one time, ongoing, and total) expected to be achieved as a result of each strategy, including any savings achieved to date; and an implementation timeline for each strategy, including actions taken to date. Comparable information shall also be provided for any other strategies that the campus is seriously considering to reduce its costs, even if the campus has not yet finalized or begun implementing them. The Chancellor’s Office shall review and compile these plans into a consolidated report. The Chancellor’s Office shall include in the consolidated report strategies for reducing systemwide costs, particularly through management efficiencies and improved or innovative coordination. The consolidated report also shall include strategies for increasing student demand and enrollment systemwide. For these systemwide strategies, the Chancellor’s Office shall include comparable information as delineated in requirements (1) and (2). The Chancellor’s Office shall submit the consolidated report to the Department of Finance and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by March 1, 2026. 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $806,000 shall be provided on a one-time basis to support Cal State Northridge Student Success and Inclusion Center infrastructure. 10. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be provided on a one-time basis to the California State University for purposes of implementing legislation related to genealogy determination. 11. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be provided on a one-time basis to the Tides Foundation to educate Californians on the findings of the California Reparations Task Force report. 12. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 shall be provided on a one-time basis to the California State University Foundation for the Customer Relations Management (CRM) Software and essential advancement infrastructure. SEC. 223. Item 6870-119-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 6870-119-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges ........................ 5,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5675010-Special Services and Operations ........................ 5,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis to Mendocino College to support the Mendocino College Fire Academy. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis to Santa Rosa Junior College to support the Fire Academy Training Tower project. SEC. 224. Item 6870-301-6095 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6870-301-6095—For capital outlay, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, payable from the 2024 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund ........................ 142,190,000 Schedule: (1) 0014718-El Camino Community College District, El Camino College: Hydronic Line Replacement ........................ 813,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 515,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 298,000 (2) 0014719-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles Pierce College: Sewer Replacement ........................ 692,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 446,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 246,000 (3) 0014720-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles Valley College: Sewer Replacement ........................ 591,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 389,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 202,000 (4) 0014721-Merced Community College District, Merced College: Music, Art, Theater Complex ........................ 1,469,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 773,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 696,000 (5) 0014722-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles City College: Kinesiology Replacement ........................ 1,294,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 655,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 639,000 (6) 0014723-Mendocino-Lake Community College District, Willits Center: Willits Center Phase II ........................ 1,343,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 665,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 678,000 (7) 0014724-Hartnell Community College District, Hartnell College: Buildings F, G & H Renovation ........................ 1,764,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 959,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 805,000 (8) 0014725-State Center Community College District, Reedley College: Agriculture Complex ........................ 1,295,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 616,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 679,000 (9) 0014726-Riverside Community College District, Ben Clark Training Center: Education Building 2 Phase 1 ........................ 1,335,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 770,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 565,000 (10) 0014727-Coast Community College District, Golden West College: Gym Replacement ........................ 2,002,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,001,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 1,001,000 (11) 0014728-Kern Community College District, Bakersfield College: Center for Student Success ........................ 1,934,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 954,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 980,000 (12) 0014729-North Orange Community College District, Fullerton College: STEM Vocational Center ........................ 1,922,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,077,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 845,000 (14) 0014731-Peralta Community College District, Merritt College: Buildings E & F Replacement ........................ 1,676,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 857,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 819,000 (15) 0014732-Riverside Community College District, Moreno Valley College: Library Learning Resource Center ........................ 2,997,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,567,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 1,430,000 (16) 0014733-Imperial Community College District, Imperial Valley College: Gym Modernization ........................ 1,039,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 579,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 460,000 (17) 0014734-Coast Community College District, Orange Coast College: Skills Lab Replacement ........................ 1,110,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 588,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 522,000 (18) 0014735-Riverside Community College District, Riverside City College: Cosmetology Building ........................ 1,617,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 913,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 704,000 (19) 0014747-Long Beach Community College District, Liberal Arts Campus: Building B Replacement ........................ 382,000 (a) Performance criteria ........................ 382,000 (20) 0014748-Citrus Community College District, Citrus College: New Career Technical Education Building ........................ 3,226,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,602,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 1,624,000 (21) 0014749-Mt. San Antonio Community College District, Mt. San Antonio College: Library Replacement ........................ 3,896,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,928,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 1,968,000 (22) 0014750-Los Angeles Community College District, Los Angeles Trade-Technical College: Advanced Transportation & Manufacturing Replacement ........................ 6,047,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 2,961,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 3,086,000 (23) 0014751-Rio Hondo Community College District, Rio Hondo College: Business & Art Building Replacement ........................ 1,594,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 892,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 702,000 (24) 0014752-Riverside Community College District, Norco College: Library Learning Resource Center & Student Services ........................ 2,512,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,334,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 1,178,000 (25) 0014753-Foothill-De Anza Community College District, De Anza College: Physical Education Complex Renovation ........................ 3,386,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 1,693,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 1,693,000 (26) 0014754-Shasta-Tehama-Trinity Community College District, Shasta College: Life Sciences Building 1600 Renovation ........................ 680,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 325,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 355,000 (27) 0014755-State Center Community College District, Clovis College: Kinesiology & Wellness Center ........................ 1,682,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 821,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 861,000 (28) 0014756-San Mateo Community College District, Skyline College: Boiler Plant Replacement ........................ 454,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 204,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 250,000 (29) 0014645-Antelope Valley Community College District, Antelope Valley College: Gymnasium Replacement ........................ 1,622,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 823,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 799,000 (30) 0015365-Los Rios Community College District, American River College: Davies Hall Replacement ........................ 4,329,000 (a) Preliminary plans ........................ 2,092,000 (b) Working drawings ........................ 2,237,000 (31) 0015915-Cabrillo Community College District, Cabrillo College: Cabrillo College UCSC Intersegmental Student Housing Project ........................ 87,487,000 (a) Design - Build ........................ 87,487,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the amount appropriated in Schedule (31) of this item shall be exempt from Sections 13332.11 and 13332.19 of the Government Code. SEC. 225. Item 6980-101-8099 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6980-101-8099—For local assistance, Student Aid Commission, payable from the Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Account ........................ 1,159,000 Schedule: (1) 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ 1,159,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031, and liquidation through June 30, 2033, to align with the expenditure timeline pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 69740) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. SEC. 226. Item 7600-001-3418 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 7600-001-3418—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount, Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account ........................ 1,601,000 Schedule: (1) 6275 - Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 1,061,000 SEC. 227. Item 7760-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 7760-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of General Services ........................ 42,885,000 Schedule: (1) 6320019-Public School Construction ........................ 3,000,000 (2) (9900100-Administration) ........................ 39,885,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be used to fund the STEM Teacher Recruitment Grant at EnCorps, Inc. Notwithstanding any other law, funds provided in this provision may be transferred to Item 6350-601-0001 for distribution by the Office of Public School Construction, Department of General Services. This amount shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through the 2027–28 fiscal year. 2. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be used to fund the California iteration of Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of General Services may allocate funds as direct payment to the Dollywood Foundation for this purpose. The amount appropriated shall be allocated to the Dollywood Foundation by no later than 45 days after the enactment of the act adding this provision. 3. It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) to fund the California iteration of Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library shall align to the total reverted fund balance in Item 6120-495 for the California State Library. SEC. 228. Item 8120-490 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 8120-490—Reappropriation, Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. The amount specified in the following citations is reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 8120-002-0903, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). SEC. 229. Item 8570-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 8570-001-0001—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture ........................ 165,420,000 Schedule: (1) 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ 129,744,000 (2) 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ 41,176,000 (3) 6580-Assistance to Fair and County Agricultural Activities ........................ 3,017,000 (4) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 43,882,000 (5) 9900100-Administration ........................ 40,202,000 (6) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −40,023,000 (7) Reimbursements to 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ −5,644,000 (8) Reimbursements to 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ −12,414,000 (9) Reimbursements to 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ −34,341,000 (10) Reimbursements to 9900100-Administration ........................ −179,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item for an agreement with the Regents of the University of California to operate poultry and livestock disease laboratories shall be adjusted annually, as necessary, for University of California negotiated employee compensation and benefit adjustments. 2. Of the funds appropriated in this Item, $24,900,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2030, for the Farm to School Program. SEC. 230. Item 8570-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 8570-001-6093—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 23,630,000 Schedule: (1) 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ 19,850,000 (2) 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ 1,050,000 (3) 6580- Assistance to Fair and County Agricultural Activities ........................ 700,000 (4) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 2,030,000 SEC. 231. Item 8570-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 8570-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Food and Agriculture ........................ 10,010,000 Schedule: (1) 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ 6,405,000 (2) 6580-Assistance to Fair and County Agricultural Activities ........................ 3,605,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,000,000 shall be available for Lake County Fairgrounds maintenance. SEC. 232. Item 8570-101-3228 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 8570-101-3228—For local assistance, Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 7,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 7,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $7,000,000 is for the Livestock Methane Reduction program. Up to 5 percent of this amount may be used for administrative costs. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and liquidation until June 30, 2030. SEC. 233. Item 8570-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 8570-101-6093—For local assistance, Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 145,750,000 Schedule: (1) 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ 36,950,000 (2) 6580- Assistance to Fair and County Agricultural Activities ........................ 36,900,000 (3) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 71,900,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1): (a) $9,250,000 is available for Certified Mobile Farmers’ Markets. (b) $9,250,000 is available for Year-Round Certified Farmers’ Markets. (c) $18,450,000 is available for Urban Agriculture Projects. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2): (a) $36,900,000 is available for Fairground Upgrades. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (3): (a) $35,000,000 is available for the Healthy Soils Program. (b) $36,900,000 is available for the State Water Efficiency and Enhancement Program. SEC. 234. Item 8940-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 8940-001-0001—For support of Military Department ........................ 150,413,000 Schedule: (1) 6911-National Guard ........................ 143,934,000 (2) 6912-Youth & Community Programs ........................ 23,659,000 (3) Reimbursements to 6911-National Guard ........................ −17,070,000 (4) Reimbursements to 6912-Youth & Community Programs ........................ −110,000 Provisions: 1. Expenditures shall not be made from the funds appropriated in this item as a substitution for personnel, equipment, facilities, or other assistance, or for any portion thereof, that, in the absence of the expenditure, or of this appropriation, would be available to the Adjutant General, the California State Military, or the State Military Reserve from the federal government. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $480,000 shall be for military retirements, in accordance with Sections 228 and 256 of the Military and Veterans Code. 3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,805,000 shall be used to provide mandatory employee compensation increases for state active duty employees. The funds provided in this provision shall be expended pursuant to Sections 320 and 321 of the Military and Veterans Code, which require state active duty employees to receive the same compensation increases as their counterparts on federal active duty. Any unspent funds subject to this provision shall revert to the General Fund. 4. Annually on March 1, the Military Department shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature for the Job ChalleNGe Program with the following: (a) the program completion rate; (b) the rate of job placement in the field of study; and (c) the rate of continued employment 12 months after completion of the program based on responses from program graduates. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedules (1) and (2), $37,000,000 is available for payments made in advance of offsets from Federal Trust Fund recoveries. The Military Department shall separate this amount from its operating budget in its accounting system and provide quarterly reports to the Department of Finance that reflect the updated appropriation authority for operations. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $1,301,000 shall be used for the California Cybersecurity Integration Center. 7. Information sharing by the California Cybersecurity Integration Center shall be conducted in a manner that protects the privacy and civil liberties of individuals, safeguards sensitive information, preserves business confidentiality, and enables public officials to detect, investigate, respond to, and prevent cyberattacks that threaten public health and safety, economic stability, and national security. 8. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund to the Military Department for cashflow purposes in an amount not to exceed $30,000,000, subject to the following conditions: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from a delay in reimbursements. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid upon order of the Director of Finance. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) Within 15 days of authorizing the loan, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees in each house that consider appropriations. 9. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $15,000,000 shall be available for Counterdrug Task Force drug interdiction activities supporting local, state, federal, and tribal law enforcement agencies. Priority shall be given to activities targeting heroin, fentanyl, methamphetamine, cocaine, and other illegal drugs that can cause overdose deaths. The Military Department shall submit a report on how this funding was used on an annual basis, beginning October 1, 2025, until all funds have been spent. For each request, the report shall provide, at minimum, the name of the requesting agency, the type of illicit substances targeted, the level and type of resources requested, reasons for denying or partially approving a request, and the outcomes achieved, including the amount of illicit substances seized. 10. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in Schedules (1) and (2) may be augmented by an amount sufficient for the Military Department to cover cost increases for pay, basic allowances for housing and subsistence, cost-of-living, and salary driven benefit adjustments for state active duty employees following passage of a federal active duty compensation increase in the federal budget. Any augmentation shall be made no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature, or no sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. Any notification made pursuant to this provision shall include the fiscal assumptions used to calculate the necessary augmentation, including, but not limited to, information on how the Military Department calculated the cost increases for the Basic Allowance for Housing and Cost of Living Adjustments for state active duty employees. 11. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount available for expenditure in Schedule (1) may be augmented by up to $4,750,000 if the Military Department receives a federal match for three armory deferred maintenance projects. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $475,000 shall be available for the Sunburst Youth Challenge Academy. SEC. 235. Section 3.61 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 3.61. Contribution to Prefund Other Postemployment Benefits. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the employers’ contribution for prefunding other postemployment benefits for the 2025–26 fiscal year that are chargeable to any item with respect to each state officer and employee who is a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, the Judges’ Retirement System, the Judges’ Retirement System II, or the Legislators’ Retirement System and who is in that employment or office shall be the monthly dollar amount or the percentage of pensionable compensation by bargaining unit, retirement category, fund source, or state office, department, division, board, bureau, commission, organization, or agency, as follows: Bargaining Units 1, 3, 4, 11, 14, 15, 17, 20, and 21, Service Employees International Union ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 2, California Attorneys, Administrative Law Judges, and Hearing Officers in State Employment ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 5, California Association of Highway Patrolmen ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 6, California Correctional Peace Officers Association ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 7, California Statewide Law Enforcement Association ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 8, California Department of Forestry Firefighters ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 9, Professional Engineers in California Government ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 10, California Association of Professional Scientists ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 12, International Union of Operating Engineers ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 13, International Union of Operating Engineers ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 16, Union of American Physicians and Dentists ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 18, California Association of Psychiatric Technicians ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Bargaining Unit 19, American Federation of State, County, and Municipal Employees ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. Exempt and excluded employees with a collective bargaining identification designation of “E” ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. State employees of the Judicial Branch (excluding justices) ........................ 0.0% of pensionable compensation. The Director of Finance may adjust amounts in any appropriation item, or in any category thereof, as a result of changes from amounts budgeted for the employers’ contributions for prefunding other postemployment benefits for the 2025–26 fiscal year to achieve the percentages specified in this subdivision. (b) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of calculating the “appropriations subject to limitation” as defined in Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution, the appropriations shall be deemed to be the amounts remaining after the adjustments required by subdivision (a) are made. (c) The Director of Finance may adjust the percentage levels of the employers’ contribution for prefunding other postemployment benefits listed in subdivision (a) in accordance with either of the following: (1) Labor agreements or other legislation approved by the Legislature. (2) For employees excluded from collective bargaining, in accordance with salary and benefit schedules established by the Department of Human Resources. (d) The Director of Finance shall notify the Controller by executive order of adjustments made pursuant to subdivision (c). The executive order shall be submitted not sooner than 30 days after notification of the adjustments in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. (e) (1) In addition to the employers’ prefunding of other postemployment benefits listed in subdivision (a), the Department of Finance may direct the Controller to transfer up to the amount identified for appropriation pursuant to subclause (IV) of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution equivalent to the amount described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 35.50 for the prior fiscal year or the current fiscal year. (2) The Director of Finance shall direct the Controller to transfer the amount specified in paragraph (1) to the California Employers’ Retiree Benefit Trust Fund. The Director of Finance shall provide the Controller a schedule of the timing and amounts to be used for purposes of this subdivision. SEC. 236. Section 4.12 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 4.12. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, each item of appropriation from the General Fund, Motor Vehicle Account, Radiation Control Fund, Environmental License Plate Fund, Secretary of State’s Business Fees Fund, the Public Resources Account within the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund, Board of Podiatric Medicine Fund, Private Postsecondary Education Administration Fund, Real Estate Fund, Real Estate Appraisers Regulation Fund, Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund, Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund, Structural Pest Control Fund, Managed Care Fund, and Industrial Hemp Enrollment and Oversight Fund provided in this act, with the exception of those for the California State University, the University of California, the University of California College of the Law, San Francisco, the Legislature, the Legislative Counsel Bureau, and the Judicial Branch, shall be adjusted, as appropriate, to achieve savings associated with vacant positions identified pursuant to Section 4.12 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), as specified in the May 14, 2025, notification letter titled “Amendment to Various Budget Bill Items Pursuant to Section 4.05—Ongoing Reductions to State Operations and Section 4.12—Vacant Positions Funding Reduction and Position Elimination” and identified in “Attachment 4: Section 4.12 Vacant Position Elimination Detail Fiscal Year 2025–26.” The Director of Finance shall determine the amount and direct the Controller to make the necessary adjustment to each item of appropriation from the General Fund or other spending authority to reflect savings for the 2025–26 fiscal year. (2) The position authority associated with the reductions provided in paragraph (1) shall be eliminated effective January 1, 2026, as provided in subdivision (b). (b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), the elimination of position authority for the positions identified pursuant to Section 4.12 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), as specified in the May 14, 2025 notification letter titled “Amendment to Various Budget Bill Items Pursuant to Section 4.05—Ongoing Reductions to State Operations and Section 4.12—Vacant Positions Funding Reduction and Position Elimination” and identified in “Attachment 4: Section 4.12 Vacant Position Elimination Detail Fiscal Year 2025–26” is effective on January 1, 2026. Each item of appropriation associated with the eliminated position authority, as specified in the aforementioned May 14, 2025, notification letter, shall also be adjusted upon the elimination of the position authority to reflect such elimination, except for items of appropriation already adjusted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). (c) (1) No later than September 30, 2025, the Department of Finance shall provide the Joint Legislative Budget Committee with a list of positions proposed for elimination that were authorized to implement legislation pursuant to Budget Change Proposals included in Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) and Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), and the enacted legislation associated with the positions, except as provided in subdivision (a). (2) If the Department of Finance fails to meet the September 30, 2025 deadline specified in paragraph (1), the Department of Finance shall not eliminate any vacant positions intended for elimination pursuant to Section 4.12 in the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), as specified in the May 14, 2025 notification letter titled “Amendment to Various Budget Bill Items Pursuant to Section 4.05—Ongoing Reductions to State Operations and Section 4.12—Vacant Positions Funding Reduction and Position Elimination” and identified in “Attachment 4: Section 4.12 Vacant Position Elimination Detail Fiscal Year 2025–26” until the Legislature determines in the Budget Act of 2026 whether to include these actions. (3) The Joint Legislative Budget Committee has until January 1, 2026, to review the list and nonconcur with the elimination of specific positions proposed for elimination that were authorized for the purposes of implementing legislation pursuant to Budget Change Proposals in the 2023–24 and 2024–25 fiscal years, if the Joint Legislative Budget Committee determines the elimination of the positions would have an impact on a state agency’s ability to implement the enacted legislation. (d) (1) The following state agencies shall continue to maintain vacant positions intended for elimination pursuant to Section 4.12 in the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) until January 1, 2026: (A) 0552 – Office of Inspector General. (B) 3600 – Department of Fish and Wildlife. (C) 3790 – Department of Parks and Recreation. (D) 3930 – Department of Pesticide Regulation. (E) 3940 – State Water Resources Control Board. (F) 3960 – Department of Toxic Substances Control. (G) 7350 – Department of Industrial Relations. (H) 8570 – Department of Food and Agriculture. (I) 8955 – Department of Veteran Affairs. (2) The Joint Legislative Budget Committee has until January 1, 2026, to review and nonconcur with the elimination of specific positions on the list of positions intended to be eliminated after assessing the potential long-term impact the eliminations would have on regulatory activities, public health and safety, and the protection of natural and environmental resources. SEC. 237. Section 39.00 of the Budget Act of 2025is amended to read: SEC. 39.00. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the following bills are other bills providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution: AB 116, AB 117, AB 118, AB 119, AB 120, AB 121, AB 122, AB 123, AB 124, AB 125, AB 126, AB 127, AB 128, AB 129, AB 130, AB 131, AB 132, AB 133, AB 134, AB 135, AB 136, AB 137, AB 138, AB 139, AB 140, AB 141, AB 143, AB 144, AB 145, AB 146, AB 147, AB 148, AB 149, AB 150, AB 151, AB 152, AB 153, AB 154, AB 155, AB 156, AB 157, AB 158, AB 159, AB 160, AB 161, AB 162, SB 116, SB 117, SB 118, SB 119, SB 120, SB 121, SB 122, SB 123, SB 124, SB 125, SB 126, SB 127, SB 128, SB 129, SB 130, SB 131, SB 132, SB 133, SB 134, SB 135, SB 136, SB 137, SB 138, SB 139, SB 140, SB 141, SB 143, SB 144, SB 145, SB 146, SB 147, SB 148, SB 149, SB 150, SB 151, SB 152, SB 153, SB 154, SB 155 SB 156, SB 157, SB 158, SB 159, SB 160, SB 161, and SB 162. SEC. 238. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2025 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 101). (b) Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 102). (c) Chapter 77 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 104). SEC. 239. Section 91.00 is added to the Budget Act of 2025, to read: SEC. 91.00. (a) (1) The Department of Finance, in consultation with the Transportation Agency, shall examine loan or other financing options that might be used to provide sufficient short-term state financial assistance for local transit agencies. The Department of Finance shall complete this process by January 10, 2026, and if there are proposals developed, those may be included as part of the 2026–27 Governor’s Budget, which the Legislature may act upon in early 2026. (2) Any loan or other financing options developed shall, at a minimum, require full repayment of the loan principal with an agreed-upon interest rate, pursuant to a clearly defined repayment schedule, and a guaranteed repayment mechanism to ensure that any funding provided under this section is repaid from a reliable and predictable revenue source. (3) For purposes of this section, “local transit agencies” means the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, San Francisco Municipal Transportation Agency, Peninsula Corridor Joint Powers Board, and Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District. (b) (1) The Department of Finance shall examine loan or financing options that might be used to provide short-term state financial assistance for local government entities, including, but not limited to, the County of Los Angeles, the Los Angeles County Office of Education, and cities, special districts, school districts, and community college districts located in Los Angeles County, if the entity has significant responsibilities for recovery from the January 2025 wildfires in that county. The Department of Finance shall complete this process by January 10, 2026, and if there are proposals developed, those may be included as part of the 2026–27 Governor’s Budget, which the Legislature may act upon in early 2026. (2) Any loan or other financing options developed shall, at a minimum, require full repayment of the loan principal with an agreed-upon interest rate, pursuant to a clearly defined repayment schedule, and a guaranteed repayment mechanism to ensure that any funding provided under this section is repaid from a reliable and predictable revenue source. SEC. 240. Section 92.00 is added to the Budget Act of 2025, to read: SEC. 92.00. The Director of Finance shall augment the amount of any appropriation for any state department or agency from the General Fund or any other available source of funding to provide personnel and other resources necessary to implement Assembly Bill 715 of the 2025–26 Regular Session and Senate Bill 48 of the 2025–26 Regular Session, if those bills are enacted into law. The Department of Finance may create new items or schedules as necessary to facilitate the expenditure of funds augmented pursuant to this section. SEC. 241. Section 99.50 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: INDEX FOR CONTROL SECTIONS SEC. 99.50. The following is an index to the general sections of this act. These sections serve to define terms and identify restrictions concerning the appropriations contained in this act. 1.00 Budget Act Citation 1.50 Intent and Format 1.51 Citations to Prior Budget Acts 1.80 Availability of Appropriations 2.00 Items of Appropriation 3.00 Defines Purposes of Appropriations 3.10 Subschedule Transfers for Capital Projects 3.50 Benefit Charges Against Salaries and Wages 3.60 Contribution to Public Employees’ Retirement Benefits 3.61 Contribution to Prefund Other Postemployment Benefits 3.90 Reduction for Employee Compensation 4.05 Budget Adjustment Authority 4.11 Position Vacancy Report 4.12 Vacant Position Elimination 4.13 AB 85 Repayments to Counties 4.20 Contribution to Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve  Fund 4.30 Lease-Revenue Payment Adjustments 4.72 Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure 4.75 Statewide Surcharge 4.80 State Public Works Board Interim Financing 4.90 Architectural Revolving Fund Transfer 4.95 Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account Transfer 5.25 Attorney’s Fees 6.00 Project Alterations Limits 8.00 Antiterrorism Federal Reimbursements 8.50 Federal Funds Receipts 8.51 Federal Funds Accounts 8.52 Federal Reimbursements 8.53 Notice of Federal Audits 8.54 Enforce Recovery of Federal Funds for Statewide Indirect  Costs 8.75 Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act 9.30 Federal Levy of State Funds 9.50 Minor Capital Outlay Projects 11.00 Information Technology Reporting Requirements 11.10 Reporting of Statewide Software License Agreements 11.11 Privacy of Information in Pay Stubs 11.25 Artificial Intelligence Projects in State Departments 11.96 Coronavirus Fiscal Relief 11.97 State Appropriation Limit Excludable Federal Fund  Appropriations for Capital Outlay 12.00 State Appropriations Limit (SAL) 12.30 Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties 12.32 Proposition 98-Funding Guarantee 12.35 Financial Aid Policy Change Requirements 12.45 June to July Payroll Deferral 13.00 Legislative Counsel Bureau 13.30 Emergency Loans for Local Entities 13.40 Budgetary Loan Borrowing from Special Funds 14.00 Special Fund Loans Between Boards of the Department of  Consumer Affairs 15.14 Allocation of Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund 15.25 Data Center Rate Adjustment 15.45 Trial Court Funding Offsets 19.56 Appropriations for Legislative Priorities 19.57 Encumbrance Deadline Extension Authority 20.00 Reappropriations and Reversions 24.00 State School Fund Allocations 24.03 Reading Control 24.30 Transfer School Building Rental Income to the General  Fund 24.60 Report of Lottery Funds Received 24.70 Local Educational Agency Fiscal Accountability 25.40 Contracted Fiscal Services Costs 25.50 SCO Apportionment Payment System Assessments 26.00 Intraschedule Transfers 28.00 Program Change Notification 28.30 Federal Funds Realignment 28.31 Short-Term Cash Loans Due to Delay in Federal Funds 28.50 Agency Reimbursement Payments 29.00 Position Estimates of Governor’s Budget, May Revision,  and Final Change Book 30.00 Continuous Appropriations 31.00 Budget Act Administrative Procedures for Salaries and Wages 32.00 Prohibits Excess Expenditures 33.00 Item Veto Severability 34.00 Constitutional Severability 35.21 Application of Net Final Payment Accrual Methodology 35.35 FI$Cal—​Short-Term Cash Loans 35.50 Estimated General Fund Revenues and Various Estimates  Related to the Budget Stabilization Account 38.00 Provides That This Bill Is a Budget Bill 39.00 Identification of Bills Related to the Budget Bill 39.10 List of Budget Act Statutes 90.00 Los Angeles County Response and Recovery Costs 91.00 Loans for Specific Local Governments 92.00 Augmentations for Particular Bills 99.00 Alphabetical Organization Index 99.50 Numerical Control Section Index SEC. 242. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately.